In the name of Allah, the Most Compassionate, the Most Merciful.
All praise is for Allah, Lord of the worlds,
the Most Compassionate, the Most Merciful,
Master of the Day of Judgment.
You alone we worship and You alone we ask for help.
Guide us to the straight path,
the path of those You have blessed; not of those who incurred Your Wrath, or of those who are astray.
Alif Lām Mīm.
This is the Book about which there is no doubt, a guidance for the righteous,
who believe in the unseen, establish prayer, and spend out of what We have provided for them,
and those who believe in what has been sent down to you [O Prophet] and in what was sent down before you, and believe with certainty in the Hereafter.
It is they who are upon guidance from their Lord, and it is they who are truly successful.
Those who persist in disbelief, it is the same whether you warn them or not, they will not believe.
Allah has sealed their hearts and their hearing, and their sight is covered; and for them there will be a massive punishment.
There are some among people who say, “We believe in Allah and the Last Day,” whereas they are not believers.
They seek to deceive Allah and those who believe, while they deceive none but themselves, but they do not realize it.
In their hearts is a sickness, and Allah increased their sickness, and they will have a painful punishment for their persistent lying.
When it is said to them, “Do not spread corruption in the land,” they say, “We are only reformers.”
Indeed, it is they who who spread corruption, but they do not realize it.
When it is said to them, “Believe as the people have believed,” they say, “Shall we believe as the fools have believed?” Indeed, it is they who are the fools, but they do not know.
When they meet those who believe, they say, “We believe.” But when they are alone with their evil ones, they say, “We are certainly with you; we were only mocking.”
Allah will mock them and prolong them to wander blindly in their transgression.
They are those who purchased misguidance for guidance, but their trade was profitless, and they were not guided.
Their likeness is that of someone who kindles a fire. When it illuminates all around him, Allah takes away their light, leaving them in utter darkness, unable to see.
Deaf, dumb, and blind; they will not return [to the straight path].
Or like a downpour from the sky accompanied by darkness, thunder, and lightning. They put their fingers into their ears out of thunderclaps, for fear of death. But Allah encompasses the disbelievers.
The lightning almost snatches away their eyesight. Every time lightning strikes, they walk in its light, but when it becomes dark, they stand still. If Allah had willed, He would have taken away their hearing and their sight; for Allah is Most Capable of all things.
O mankind, worship your Lord, Who created you and those before you, so that you may become righteous;
He Who made the earth a resting-place for you, and the sky a canopy; and sends down rain from the sky, and brings forth fruits thereby as a provision for you. So do not set up rivals to Allah while you know.
If you are in doubt concerning that which We have sent down upon Our slave, then produce a chapter like it and call upon your helpers other than Allah, if you are truthful.
But if you did not do it, and you can never do it; then beware of the Fire whose fuel will be people and stones, which is prepared for the disbelievers.
And give glad tidings to those who believe and do righteous deeds that they will have gardens under which rivers flow. Every time they are provided with a provision of fruit therefrom, they will say, “This is what we were provided with before,” for they will be given fruit that resemble one another. They will have purified spouses, and they will abide therein forever.
Allah is not ashamed to give a similitude of a mosquito or even something less [significant]. As for those who believe, they know that this is the truth from their Lord; but those who disbelieve, they say, “What does Allah mean by this similitude?” He causes many to go astray thereby and guides many thereby, but He causes none to go astray except the evildoers –
those who break the covenant of Allah after it has been ratified, sever bonds that Allah has commanded to be maintained, and spread corruption in the land. It is they who are the losers.
How can you disbelieve in Allah, when you were lifeless then He gave you life, then He will cause you to die, then He will bring you back to life again, then to Him you will be returned?
It is He Who created for you all that is in the earth, then He turned towards the heaven and made them seven heavens, and He is All-Knowing of every thing.
And [remember] when your Lord said to the angels, “I am going to appoint a vicegerent on earth.” They said, “Will You appoint on it someone who will spread corruption therein and shed blood, while we glorify You with Your praises and proclaim Your holiness?” He said, “I know that which you do not know.”
And He taught Adam the names of everything; then He presented them to the angels, and said, “Tell Me the names of these, if what you say is true?”
They said, “Glory be to You! We have no knowledge except what You have taught us. Indeed, it is You Who are the All-Knowing, All-Wise.”
He said, “O Adam, inform them of their names.” When he informed them of their names, Allah said, “Did I not tell you that I know the unseen of the heavens and earth, and I know what you reveal and what you conceal?”
And when We said to the angels, “Prostrate before Adam,” and they prostrated except Iblīs; he refused and was arrogant, and was one of the disbelievers.
We said, “O Adam, dwell in Paradise, you and your wife; and eat pleasantly from wherever you wish, but do not approach this tree, or else you will both become the wrongdoers.”
Then Satan tempted them and drove them out of the state they were in, and We said, “Go down [to the earth], as enemies to one another. You will have abode on earth and provision for an appointed time.”
Then Adam received some words from his Lord, and He accepted his repentance. He is the Accepter of repentance, Most Merciful.
We said, “Go down all of you from here! Then when My guidance comes to you; whoever follows My guidance, they will have no fear, nor will they grieve.
But those who disbelieve and reject Our signs, they are the people of the Fire; they will abide therein forever.”
O children of Israel, remember My favor that I bestowed upon you, and fulfill My covenant and I will fulfill your covenant, and fear none but Me.
And believe in what I have sent down which confirms that [Scripture] which is with you, and do not be the first to disbelieve in it, nor trade my verses for a small price, and fear Me alone.
And do not mix the truth with falsehood, nor conceal the truth knowingly.
And establish prayer, give zakah, and bow [to Allah] with those who bow.
Do you enjoin righteousness upon people while you forget yourselves, even though you recite the Scripture? Do you not understand?
Seek help through patience and prayer. It is strenuous except for the humble,
those who are sure that they are going to meet their Lord, and that they will return to Him.
O Children of Israel, remember My blessing which I bestowed upon you and that I favored you over the worlds.
And fear a Day when no soul will avail another anything, nor intercession will be accepted, nor compensation taken, nor will they be helped.
And [remember] when We saved you from Pharaoh’s people, who were inflicting dreadful torment upon you: slaughtering your sons and sparing your women. That was a great trial from your Lord.
And [remember] when We parted the sea for you and saved you, while We drowned the people of Pharaoh while you were looking on.
And [remember] when We appointed for Moses forty nights. Then you took the calf [for worship] in his absence, while you were wrongdoers.
Yet We pardoned you after that, so that you may be grateful.
And [remember] when We gave Moses the Scripture and the criterion, so that you may be guided.
And [remember] when Moses said to his people, “O my people, you have wronged yourselves by taking the calf [for worship]. So repent to your Creator and kill yourselves [the guilty among you]; that is best for you with your Creator.” Then He accepted your repentance, for He is the Accepter of Repentance, Most Merciful.
And [remember] when you said, “O Moses, we will never believe you until we see Allah openly,” but a thunderbolt struck you while you were looking on.
Then We raised you back to life after your death, so that you may be grateful.
And We shaded you with clouds and sent down to you manna and quails, [saying], “Eat of the good things We have provided for you.” They did not wrong Us, but they wronged themselves.
And [remember] when We said, “Enter this town [of Jerusalem] and eat freely from wherever you wish, and enter the gate bowing down humbly and say, ‘Absolve us.’ We will forgive you your sins and increase [the reward of] those who do good.”
But the wrongdoers changed the words to other than what they were told; so We sent down upon the wrongdoers a torment from the heaven for their rebelliousness.
And [remember] when Moses asked for water for his people, and We said, “Strike the rock with your staff,” Then twelve springs gushed forth from it; each tribe knew its drinking place. “Eat and drink from Allah’s provision, and do not spread corruption in the land.”
And [remember] when you said, “O Moses, we cannot bear the same meal. So call upon your Lord to bring forth for us from what the earth produces – its herbs, cucumbers, garlic, lentils, and onions.” Moses said, “Would you exchange what is better for what is inferior? Go down to any town and you will have what you have asked for.” They were struck with humiliation and destitution, and incurred the wrath of Allah. That was because they used to reject the signs of Allah and kill the prophets unjustly. That was because they disobeyed and were transgressors.
The believers and those who were Jews, Christians, and the Sabians [before Muhammad] – whoever believed in Allah and the Last Day and did righteous deed, they will have their reward with their Lord, and they will have no fear, nor will they grieve.
And [remember] when We took your covenant [O Children of Israel] and raised above you the mountain [saying], “Hold firmly to what We have given you and observe its teachings, so that you may become righteous.”
But then you turned away after that. If it had not been for the grace and mercy of Allah upon you, you would have surely been among the losers.
And you know about those among you who broke the Sabbath, whereupon We said to them, “Be apes, despised.”
So We made it a deterrent punishment for those alive and for those who succeeded them, and an admonition for the righteous.
And [remember] when Moses said to his people, “Allah commands you to slaughter a cow.” They said, “Are you mocking us?” Moses said, “I seek refuge in Allah from being so ignorant!”
They said, “Call upon your Lord to make clear to us what [type of cow] it is.” He said, “Allah says, ‘It is a cow that is neither too old nor too young, but somewhere in between. So do as you are commanded!’”
They said, “Call upon your Lord to show us its color.” He said, “Allah says, ‘It is a yellow cow, bright in color – pleasing to the beholders.’”
They again said, “Call upon your Lord to make clear to us what it is. All cows look alike to us. If Allah wills, we will surely be guided.”
He said, “Allah says, ‘It is a cow neither trained to plow the earth nor water the field; sound, without blemish.’” They said, “Now you have come with the truth.” Then they slaughtered it, yet they were hesitant.
And [remember] when you [Israelites] slew a man and disputed as to who the killer was, but Allah exposed what you were concealing.
We said, “Strike the slain with a piece of it.” This is how Allah brings the dead to life and shows you His signs, so that you may understand.
Then your hearts became hardened after that, like rocks or even harder. There are rocks from which rivers gush forth, and there are others that split open from which water comes out, while others fall down out of humility to Allah. And Allah is not unaware of what you do.
Do you [O believers] hope that they would respond to your call to believe, while a party of them used to hear the word of Allah then distort it knowingly after understanding it?
And when they meet the believers they say, “We believe.” But when they meet one another in private they say, “Are you telling them what Allah has revealed to you [about Mohammad], so that they may argue against you before your Lord? Have you no sense?”
Do they not know that Allah knows what they conceal and what they reveal?
And among them there are illiterate people, who know nothing of the Scripture except wishful thinking, and they do nothing but guesswork.
So woe to those who write the Scripture with their own hands, and then say, “This is from Allah,” in order to trade it for a small price. Woe to them for what their hands have written, and woe to them for what they earn.
And they say, “The Fire will never touch us except for a few days.” Say, “Have you taken a covenant from Allah; for Allah will never break His covenant, or are you saying about Allah what you do not know?”
No indeed! Those who do evil and are surrounded by their sins – they are the people of the Fire; they will abide therein forever.
But those who believe and do righteous deeds – they are the people of Paradise; they will abide therein forever.
And [remember] when We took a covenant from the Children of Israel, “Do not worship except Allah; be kind to parents and kindred, and to orphans and those in need; speak good words to people; establish prayer; and give Zakah.” But then you turned away paying no heed, except a few of you.
And [remember] when We took a covenant from you that you should neither shed blood of one another, nor expel one another from your homes. Then you acknowledged it, and you bear witness to it.
Then here you are, killing one another and expelling a group of your people from their homes, aiding one another against them in sin and aggression. And if they come to you as captives, you ransom them, although their expulsion was forbidden to you. Do you then believe in part of the Scripture and deny another part? Then what is the recompense for those who do so among you except disgrace in this life, and on the Day of Resurrection they will be subjected to the severest torment? For Allah is not unaware of what you do.
These are the people who have purchased the life of this world for the Hereafter; their punishment will not be lightened, nor will they be helped.
We gave Moses the Scripture and sent a succession of messengers after him. We gave Jesus, the son of Mary, clear signs and strengthened him with the Holy Spirit. Is it that every time a messenger comes to you [O Israelites] with something against your desires, you become arrogant; some of them you rejected, and others you killed?
They say, “Our hearts are wrapped.” Nay, Allah has cursed them for their disbelief, little is it that they believe.
Now that there has come to them a Book from Allah, confirming that which is with them – although they used to pray for victory over the disbelievers in the past. But when there came to them what they recognize [to be true], they rejected it. May the curse of Allah be upon the disbelievers!
How miserable is the price for which they sold their souls – disbelieving in Allah’s revelation out of jealous hatred that Allah would send down His grace to whom He wills of His slaves. Thus they have incurred wrath upon wrath, and for the disbelievers there will be a disgracing punishment.
When it is said to them, “Believe in what Allah has sent down,” they say, “We only believe in what was sent down to us,” and they deny what came afterwards, although it is the truth confirming that which is with them. Say, “Then why did you kill the prophets of Allah before, if you were truly believers?”
Moses came to you with clear signs, yet you took the calf [for worship] in his absence, while you were wrongdoers.
And [remember] when We took a covenant from you and We raised above you the mountain [saying], “Hold firmly to what We have given you and obey,” they said, “We hear and disobey.” The love of [worshiping] the calf was engraved in their hearts because of their disbelief. Say, “How wretched is what your faith enjoins you, if you are believers!”
Say, “If the Home of the Hereafter with Allah is only for you [O Israelites] among all humans, then wish for death if you are truthful.”
But they will never wish for that because of what their hand have sent forth. And Allah is All-Knowing of the wrongdoers.
And you will surely find them the most greedy people for life, even more than the polytheists. Each one of them wishes to have a life of a thousand years. Even if they were granted such a long life, it would not save them from the punishment; for Allah is All-Seeing of what they do.
Say [O Prophet], “Whoever is an enemy to Gabriel – it is he who brings down this [Qur’an] to your heart by Allah’s permission, confirming what came before it, and a guidance and glad tiding for the believers.”
Whoever is an enemy to Allah and His angels and messengers, and to Gabriel and Michael – then Allah is indeed an enemy to the disbelievers.
We have sent down to you clear proofs, and none will reject them except the evildoers.
Is it that every time they ratify a covenant, a party of them cast it aside? In fact, most of them do not believe.
And when a messenger from Allah came to them – confirming what was with them, a party of the People of the Book cast Allah’s Scripture behind their backs as if they did not know.
They followed what was recited by the devils during the kingdom of Solomon. It was not Solomon who disbelieved, but the devils disbelieved, teaching people magic and that which was revealed to the two angels Hārūt and Mārūt in Babylon. But these two angels did not teach anyone without telling them, “We are only a test, so do not disbelieve.” Yet they would learn from them what would cause separation between a man and his wife. But they could not harm anyone except by Allah’s permission. They learn what harmed them and did not benefit them, although they already knew that whoever gets into it would not have any share in the Hereafter. How terrible was the price for which they sold themselves, if only they knew!
If only they had believed and feared Allah, they would have a better reward from Allah, if only they knew!
O you who believe, do not say, “Rā‘inā.” [consider our situation!] But say, “Unzhurnā,” [wait for us!] and listen. And for the disbelievers there will be a painful torment.
Neither those who disbelieved from the People of the Book nor the polytheists wish that your Lord sends down any good to you [O Muslims]. But Allah chooses for His mercy whom He wills, for Allah is the possessor of great bounty.
We do not abrogate a verse or cause it to be forgotten except that We bring a better one or similar to it. Do you not know that Allah is Most Capable of all things?
Do you not know that to Allah belongs the dominion of the heavens and earth, and that you have no protector or supporter besides Allah?
Or would you like to question your Messenger as Moses was questioned before? Whoever exchanges faith for disbelief has indeed strayed from the sound path.
Many of the people of the Book wish they could turn you back to disbelief after you have believed, out of the envy in their hearts, after the truth has become evident to them. But pardon and overlook until Allah passes His decree, for Allah is Most Capable of all things.
And establish prayer and give zakah. Whatever good you send forth for yourselves, you will find it with Allah, for Allah is All-Seeing of what you do.
And they say, “None will enter Paradise except a Jew or a Christian.” That is their wishful thinking. Say, “Produce your proof, if you are truthful.”
On the contrary, whoever submits himself to Allah and is a doer of good will have his reward with his Lord. They will have no fear, nor will they grieve.
The Jews say, “The Christians have nothing to stand on” and the Christians say, “The Jews have nothing to stand on,” although they both recite the Scripture. And those [pagans] who have no knowledge say something similar. Allah will judge between them on the Day of Resurrection concerning that over which they used to differ.
Who is more unjust than the one who prevents Allah’s name to be mentioned in His mosques and strives for their destruction? Such people do not deserve to enter them except in fear. There is a disgrace for them in this world and a great punishment in the Hereafter.
To Allah belong the east and the west; wherever you turn, there is the Face of Allah. For Allah is All-Encompassing, All-Knowing.
They say, “Allah has taken a son.” Glory be to Him! Rather, to Him belongs all that is in the heavens and earth – all are devoutly obedient to Him.
The Originator of the heavens and earth. When He decrees a matter, He only says to it, “Be,” and it is.
Those who have no knowledge say, “If only Allah would speak to us or a sign be given to us.” Those who came before them said similar words. Their hearts are all alike. We have made the signs clear to people who have sure faith.
We have sent you with the truth [O Prophet] as a bearer of glad tidings and a warner, and you will not be questioned about the people of the Blazing Fire.
The Jews and the Christians will never be pleased with you until you follow their religion. Say, “The guidance of Allah is the [true] guidance.” If you were to follow their desires after the knowledge that has come to you, then you would have no protector or helper against Allah.
Those to whom We have given the Book recite it as it should be recited, it is they who believe in it. As for those who disbelieve in it, it is they who are the losers.
O Children of Israel, remember My blessings that I bestowed upon you, and that I favored you over all other people.
And beware of the Day when no one will avail another in any way; no compensation will be accepted, and no intercession will benefit it, nor will they be helped.
And [remember] when Abraham was tested by his Lord with certain words, which he fulfilled. Allah said, “I will make you a leader for mankind.” He said, “And from among my descendants?” Allah said, “My covenant does not include the wrongdoers.”
And [remember] when We made the House [Ka‘ba] a focal point and a sanctuary for the people. “[O believers], take the Station of Abraham as a place for prayer.” We charged Abraham and Ishmael to purify My House for those who perform circumambulation or stay for worship, or those who bow down and prostrate.
And [remember] when Abraham said, “My Lord, make this city [of Makkah] a sanctuary and provide its people with fruits – those among them who believe in Allah and the Last Day.” [Allah] said, “As for those who disbelieve, I will grant them enjoyment for a short while, then I will force them into the punishment of the Fire. What a terrible destination!”
And [remember] when Abraham was raising the foundations of the House and Ishmael, [saying], “Our Lord, accept this from us, for You are the All-Hearing, All-Knowing.
Our Lord, make us both submitted to You and from our descendants a nation submitted to You; and show us our rituals and accept our repentance. You are the Accepter of Repentance, Most Merciful.
Our Lord, send among them a messenger to recite to them Your revelations, teach them the Book and wisdom, and purify them. You are the All-Mighty, All-Wise.”
Who would forsake the religion of Abraham except a fool! We have chosen him in this world, and in the Hereafter he will be among the righteous.
When his Lord said to him, “Submit,” he said, “I have submitted to the Lord of the worlds.”
This was the enjoined by Abraham and Jacob to their offspring, “O my children, Allah has chosen for you this religion; so do not die except as Muslims.”
Or were you present when death approached Jacob, when he said to his children, “What will you worship after me”? They said, “We will worship your God and the God of your fathers – Abraham, Ishmael, and Isaac – the One God. And to Him we submit.”
That was a nation which has passed; they will have what they earned and you will have what you earned, and you will not be questioned concerning what they used to do.
They say, “Be Jews or Christians to be guided.” Say, “Rather the religion of Abraham, the monotheist, and he was not one of the polytheists.”
Say [O believers], “We believe in Allah and what has been sent down to us; and what was sent down to Abraham, Ishmael, Isaac, Jacob, and the descendants [of Jacob]; and what was given to Moses and Jesus; and what was given to the prophets from their Lord. We make no distinction between any of them, and to Him we have submitted.”
If they believe as you have believed, then they are guided. But if they turn away, then they are in plain dissension. Allah will suffice you against them, and He is the All-Hearing, All-Knowing.
This is the natural religion of Allah. Who is better than Allah in [enjoining a] religion? And it is He Whom we worship.
Say, “Do you [People of the Book] argue with us concerning Allah, when He is our Lord and your Lord? We are responsible for our deeds and you for yours, and we are sincerely devoted to Him.
Or do you say that Abraham, Ishmael, Isaac, Jacob, and the descendants [of Jacob] were Jews or Christians?” Say, “Are you more knowledgeable or Allah?” Who is more unjust than the one who hides a testimony he has from Allah? But Allah is not unaware of what you do.
That was a nation which has passed; they will have what they earned and you will have what you earned, and you will not be questioned concerning what they used to do.
The foolish among the people will say: “What has turned them away from their prayer direction they used to face?” Say: “To Allah belong the east and west: He guides whom He wills to a straight path.”
Thus We made you a balanced nation, so that you may be witnesses over mankind and the Messenger a witness over you. We did not change your former direction of prayer [to the Ka‘ba] except to distinguish those who would follow the Messenger from those who would turn back on their heels. It was surely burdensome except for those whom Allah guided. Allah would never let your [acts of] faith go to waste, for Allah is Most Gracious and Most Merciful to all people.
We see the turning of your face [O Prophet] towards the heaven; We will surely make you turn towards a prayer direction that will please you. So turn your face towards the Sacred Mosque [in Makkah], and wherever you are, turn your faces towards it. Those who were given the Scripture know that this is the truth from their Lord, and Allah is not unaware of what they do.
Even if you were to bring every proof to those who have been given the Scripture, they would not follow your prayer direction, nor would you follow their prayer direction; nor would any of them follow the prayer direction of the other. However, if you were to follow their desires after the knowledge that has come to you, then you would surely be among the wrongdoers.
Those whom We gave the Scripture recognize him [the Prophet] as they recognize their own sons, yet a group of them conceals the truth knowingly.
It is the truth from your Lord; so never be among those who doubt.
Every nation has a direction to which it turns, so compete with one another in good deeds. Wherever you are, Allah will bring you all together, for Allah is Most Capable of all things.
From wherever you set out, turn your face to the direction of the Sacred Mosque [in Makkah]. This is surely the truth from your Lord, and Allah is not unaware of what you do.
From wherever you set out, turn your face towards the Sacred Mosque [Ka‘ba]. Wherever you are, turn your faces towards it, so that the people should not have any proof against you, except for the wrongdoers among them. So do not fear them but fear Me, so that I may complete My favor upon you [all] and that you may be guided.
Just as We have sent you a messenger from among you, reciting to you Our verses, purifying you, and teaching you the Book and Wisdom, and teaching you what you did not know.
Therefore remember Me; I will remember you. Be grateful to Me, and do not be ungrateful.
O you who believe, seek help in patience and prayer, for Allah is with those who are patient.
And do not say that those martyred in Allah’s way are dead. Rather, they are alive, but you do not perceive it.
We will surely test you with something of fear and famine, and loss of property, lives and fruits. But give glad tidings to those who are patient.
Those when afflicted with a disaster, they say, “We belong to Allah, and to Him we will return.”
They are those upon whom are blessings and mercy from their Lord, and it is they who are guided.
Indeed, Safa and Marwah [mounts] are among the symbols of Allah. So whoever performs the pilgrimage or ‘Umra, there is no blame upon him to go between them. And whoever does good voluntarily, then Allah is All-Appreciative, All-Knowing.
Those who conceal the clear proofs and guidance that We have sent down – after We explained it clearly for people in the Scripture – it is they who are cursed by Allah and will be cursed by those who curse.
Except for those who repent, mend their deeds, and clarify the truth; I will surely accept their repentance, for I am the Accepter of Repentance, Most Merciful.
Those who disbelieve and die as disbelievers are cursed by Allah and the angels, and by all people.
They will abide in [the curse] forever. Their punishment will not be lightened, nor will they be granted any respite.
And your god is one God. None has the right to be worshiped except Him – the Most Compassionate, Most Merciful.
Indeed, in the creation of the heavens and earth; the alternation of the night and day; the sailing of the ships in the sea for the benefit of people; the sending down of rain from the sky by Allah, reviving thereby the earth after its death; the spreading of all kinds of creatures therein; the directing of the winds and clouds between the sky and earth – in all these, there are signs for people of understanding.
And among people there are some who take others as equals to Allah: they love them as they should love Allah. But those who believe are stronger in their love for Allah. If only the wrongdoers could see the punishment, they would surely realize that all power belongs to Allah and that Allah is severe in punishment.
[Consider] when those who were followed, they will disown their followers when they see the punishment, and all ties between them will be cut off.
The followers will say, “If only we could have another chance, so we could disown them as they have disowned us.” Thus will Allah show them their deeds as sources of regret, and they will never get out of the Fire.
O mankind, eat from what is lawful and good on earth and do not follow the footsteps of Satan, for he is your sworn enemy.
He only orders you to commit evil and immoral deeds, and to say concerning Allah what you do not know.
When it is said to them, “Follow what Allah has sent down,” they say, “Instead, we follow what we found our forefathers doing.” [Would they do so] even though their forefathers had no understanding, nor were they guided?
The similitude of those who disbelieved is like cattle not understanding the calls of the shepherd except shouts and cries. They are deaf, dumb, and blind; and they understand nothing.
O you who believe, eat of the good things We have provided for you, and be grateful to Allah, if you truly worship Him alone.
He has only forbidden to you carrion, blood, the flesh of swine, and what has been sacrificed to other than Allah. But if someone is compelled by necessity – neither driven by desire nor exceeding immediate need – then there is no sin upon him; for Allah is All-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
Those who conceal the revelation of Allah’s Book and purchase thereby a small price, they consume nothing into their bellies except fire. Allah will not speak to them on the Day of Resurrection nor will He purify them, and for them there will be a painful punishment.
They are those who trade guidance for misguidance and forgiveness for punishment. How patient they must be to withstand the Fire!
That is because Allah has sent down the Book in truth. And those who differ over the Book are surely in extreme dissension.
It is not righteousness to turn your faces towards the east or the west, but righteousness is to believe in Allah, the Last Day, the angels, the Scriptures, and the prophets; and to give charity out of one’s cherished wealth to relatives, orphans, the needy, the wayfarer, beggars, and to free slaves; to establish prayer and give zakah; to fulfill the ratified pledges; to be patient at times of hardship, adversity, and during the battle. Such are the true believers, and such are the righteous.
O you who believe, legal retribution is prescribed for you in cases of murder – a free for a free, a slave for a slave, and a female for a female. But if one is pardoned by the victim’s guardian, then a fair ransom of blood-money should be set and paid in best way. This is a concession and a mercy from your Lord. But whoever transgresses the limits afterwards, will have a painful punishment.
In the legal retribution, there is [saving of] life for you, O people of understanding, so that you may become righteous.
It is prescribed for you that when death approaches one of you – if he leaves behind any wealth – a bequest should be made in favor of parents and immediate family members with fairness, this is a duty upon the righteous.
If someone alters the bequest after hearing it, they will bear the sin of the alteration, for Allah is All-Hearing, All-Knowing.
But if someone fears partiality or injustice from the testator, and puts things right between the parties, then there is no sin upon him, for Allah is All-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
O you who believe, fasting is prescribed upon you as it was prescribed upon those who were before you, so that you may become righteous.
[Fast is for] specific number of days; but if anyone of you is ill or on a journey, he should make up for those days. As for those who can only fast with hardship, a compensation can be made by feeding a needy person [for each day]. But anyone who volunteers to give more, it is better for him. Yet fasting is better for you, if only you knew.
Ramadān is a month in which the Qur’an was sent down as a guidance for mankind and as clear signs that show the right way and distinguish between right and wrong. So whoever of you witnesses this month, should fast. But if anyone is ill or on a journey, he should make up for those days. Allah wants ease for you and does not want hardship for you, so that you may complete the prescribed number of days, and proclaim the greatness of Allah for having guided you, and so that you may be grateful.
When My slaves ask you concerning Me, I am indeed near. I respond to the call of the supplicant when he calls upon Me; so they should respond to Me and believe in Me, so that they may be guided.
It has been made permissible for you to be intimate with your wives on the nights of the fast. They are garment for you just as you are garment for them. Allah knows that you used to deceive yourselves, so He accepted your repentance and pardoned you. So now you may have intimacy with them and seek what Allah has destined for you. And eat and drink until you see the light of dawn distinct from the darkness of night, then complete the fast until nightfall. However, should you be in devotional retreat in the mosques then do not be intimate with them. These are the limits set by Allah, so do not even come near to them. This is how Allah makes His verses clear to people, so that they may become righteous.
Do not consume one another’s property unjustly, nor entice the rulers in order to consume a portion of people’s property wrongfully while you know [it is sin].
They ask you about the phases of the moon. Say, “They are a means for people to determine time and pilgrimage.” It is not righteousness to enter the houses from the rear [in pilgrimage], but righteousness is to fear Allah. So enter the houses through their doors, and fear Allah so that you may succeed.
Fight in the way of Allah against those who fight you, but do not transgress, for Allah does not like transgressors.
And fight them wherever you find them, and drive them out from where they drove you out, for persecution is far worse than fighting. But do not fight them at the Sacred Mosque unless they fight you there. However, if they fight you, then fight them. Such is the recompense of the disbelievers.
But if they desist, then Allah is All-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
Fight them until there is no more persecution and religion is only for Allah. But if they desist, let there be no aggression except against the oppressors.
A sacred month for a sacred month, and violations are subject to retribution. So if anyone commits aggression against you, return the aggressive against him in the same manner as he showed against you. But fear Allah, and know that Allah is with those who fear Him.
Spend in the way of Allah and do not throw yourselves into destruction, and do good, for Allah loves those who do good.
And Complete Hajj and ‘Umrah for Allah. But if you are prevented, then [offer] whatever sacrificial animal is available, and do not shave your heads until the sacrificial animal reaches its place of sacrifice. But if anyone among you is sick or has an ailment of the scalp [and had his head shaved], then he must compensate by fasting, charity, or a sacrificial offering. And when you are safe, then if anyone takes a break between ‘Umrah and Hajj, he must offer a sacrifice of whatever animal is available. However, if he cannot afford an offering, he should fast for three days during Hajj and seven days upon his return [home], making ten days in all. This is for those who are not of the residents of the Sacred Mosque. And fear Allah, and know that Allah is severe in retribution.
The pilgrimage is in known months. Whoever commits himself to perform the pilgrimage, there should be no intimacy, foul language, and arguments during pilgrimage. Whatever good you do, Allah is aware of it. And take provisions for the journey, but the best provision is righteousness. So fear Me, O people of understanding.
There is no blame upon you for seeking the bounty of your Lord [by trading]. But as you leave the plains of ‘Arafāt, remember Allah at the Sacred Site [of Muzdalifah] and remember Him for having guided you, for you were previously among those who had gone astray.
Then move on from where the people move on, and seek Allah’s forgiveness, for Allah is All-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
When you have completed your rites, remember Allah as you used to remember your forefathers, or with even more. There are some people who say, “Our Lord, give us in this world,” but they will have no share in the Hereafter.
And there are others who say, “Our Lord, give us good in this world and good in the Hereafter, and protect us from the punishment of the Fire.”
They will receive their share for what they have earned. And Allah is swift in reckoning.
And remember Allah during the appointed days. But whoever hastens to depart [Mina] on the second day, there is no sin upon him; and whoever delays [until the third], there is no sin upon him for those who fear Allah. So fear Allah, and know that you will be gathered before Him.
There are some [hypocrites] who amaze you with their words in the life of this world and call upon Allah to witness what is in their heart, yet they are the fiercest opponents.
When they leave [you], they strive to spread corruption in the land and destroy crops and livestock, whereas Allah does not like corruption.
When it is said to them, “Fear Allah,” pride takes hold of them to persist in sin. Hellfire is sufficient for them. What a terrible resting place!
But there are some people who sell their souls to seek Allah’s pleasure, and Allah is Most Gracious to His slaves.
O you who believe, enter into Islam completely and do not follow the footsteps of Satan, for He is your sworn enemy.
Should you slip back after the clear signs have come to you, then beware that Allah is All-Mighty, All-Wise.
Are they waiting that Allah should come to them in shadows of clouds, along with the angels? But then the matter would be decided. And to Allah return all matters.
Ask the Children of Israel how many clear signs We have given them. But anyone who substitutes the favors of Allah after receiving it, then Allah is severe in punishment.
The life of this world is made appealing to those who disbelieve, and they ridicule the believers, while those who fear Allah will be above them on the Day of Resurrection. And Allah provides to whom He wills without measure.
Mankind was just one nation. Then Allah sent prophets with glad tidings and warnings, and sent down to them the Scriptures in truth, to judge between people in matters over which they disputed. But none disputed thereafter except out of arrogance after they had received the clear proofs. Then Allah, by His grace, guided those who believed to the truth in which they disputed. For Allah guides whom He wills to a straight path.
Do you think that you will enter Paradise without being tested like those before you who were tested? They were afflicted with poverty and adversity and were shaken until the messenger and the believers with him said, “When will the help of Allah come?” Indeed, the victory of Allah is near.
They ask you what they should spend. Say, “Whatever good you spend should be for parents, relatives, orphans and the needy, and the wayfarer; and whatever good you do, Allah is All-Knowing of it.”
Fighting has been enjoined upon you, even though you dislike it. But it maybe that you dislike something which is good for you, and you like something which is bad for you. Allah knows and you do not know.
They ask you about fighting in the Sacred Months. Say, “Fighting therein is a great sin, but preventing people from the path of Allah, disbelieving in Him, preventing from the Sacred Mosque, and expelling its people from it is a greater sin with Allah, and persecution is far worse than fighting.” They will not cease fighting you until they turn you away from your faith if they can. And if anyone among you renounces his faith and dies as a disbeliever, their deeds will be void in this life and in the Hereafter. They are the people of the Fire; they will abide therein forever.
Those who believed, migrated, and fought for the sake of Allah – it is they who hope for Allah’s mercy, and Allah is All-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
They ask you about intoxicants and gambling. Say, “In both there is a great sin, and some benefits for people, but their sin is far greater than their benefit.” They ask you as to what they should spend. Say, “The surplus”. This is how Allah makes His verses clear to you, so that you may contemplate –
in this life and the Hereafter. They ask you about orphans. Say, “Serving their interests is best. Should you mix your affairs with theirs, then they are your brothers. Allah knows who is dishonest and who is honest. If Allah had willed, He could have made things hard for you. Allah is indeed All-Mighty, All-Wise.”
Do not marry polytheist women until they believe; for a believing slave woman is better than a free polytheist, even though she may attract you. And do not give your women in marriage to polytheist men until they believe, for a believing slave is better than a free polytheist, even though he may attract you. They invite to the Fire while Allah invites to Paradise and to forgiveness by His grace, and He makes His verses clear to people so that they may take heed.
They ask you about menstruation. Say: “It is impurity; so stay away from women during menstruation and do not have intercourse with them until they become pure. When they are cleansed, then have intimacy with them as Allah has commanded you. Allah loves those who frequently repent and He loves those who purify themselves.
Your wives are tillage for you, so come to your tillage as you please, and send forth something good for yourselves. Fear Allah and know that you will meet Him, and give glad tidings to the believers.”
Do not use Allah’s name in your oaths as an excuse for not doing good and fearing Allah, or not making peace between people, for Allah is All-Hearing, All-Knowing.
Allah does not hold you accountable for unintentional oaths, but He holds you accountable for what your hearts have intended. And Allah is All-Forgiving, Most Forbearing.
For those who swear not to have intercourse with their wives is a waiting period of four months. Should they then return [to each other], then Allah is All-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
But if they are determined to divorce, then Allah is All-Hearing, All-Knowing.
Divorced women should wait for three menstrual cycles. It is not permissible for them to hide what Allah has created in their wombs, if they believe in Allah and the Last Day. Their husbands have the greater right to take them back within that period, if they want reconciliation. Women have rights similar to the rights over them in a reasonable manner, although men have a higher degree [of responsibility] over them. And Allah is All-Mighty, All-Wise.
Divorce may be pronounced twice; then either retaining in all kindness, or separating in the best way. It is not lawful for you to take back anything that you have given them [of dowry], except when they both fear that they would not be able to maintain the limits ordained by Allah. So if you fear that they would not be able to maintain the limits set by Allah, then there is no sin upon either of them if she opts to give something for her release. These are the limits ordained by Allah, so do not exceed them; whosoever exceeds the limits ordained by Allah, it is they who are the wrongdoers.
Thereafter, if he divorces her [the third time], it is not lawful for him to remarry her until she marries another man. Should he divorce her, then there is no sin on them to return to each other, provided that they would maintain the limits ordained by Allah. These are the limits ordained by Allah, which He makes clear to people who understand.
When you divorce women and they have completed their waiting period, either retain them with fairness or release them with fairness. Do not retain them in order to harm them, exceeding the limits. Whoever does this, he has wronged himself. Do not make mockery of Allah’s verses, and remember Allah’s grace upon you and what He has sent down to you of the Book and the Wisdom, to exhort you. And fear Allah, and know that Allah is All-Knowing of everything.
When you divorce women, and they have reached the end of their waiting period, do not prevent them from marrying their husbands if they mutually agree with fairness. This advice is for all among you who believe in Allah and the Last Day. This is better and purer for you. And Allah knows, and you do not know.
Mothers may breastfeed their children for two full years, for those who wish to complete the full term of breastfeeding. It is the obligation upon the father of the child that he provides food and clothing [for the mothers] with fairness. No soul is obligated beyond what it can bear. Neither mother nor father should be made to suffer on account of their child, and the same duty is incumbent on the heir. If they both decide on weaning, by mutual consent and consultation, there is no sin on them. And If you wish to provide a wet-nurse to your children, there is no sin on you, if you pay in full what you have agreed upon with fairness. But fear Allah and know that Allah is All-Seeing of what you do.
Those among you who pass away and leave widows behind, they should refrain from remarrying for four months and ten days. When they have completed their waiting period, there is no sin on you concerning what they do for themselves in a reasonable manner. And Allah is All-Aware of what you do.
There is no sin on you if you hint a proposal of marriage or keep it concealed in your hearts. Allah knows that you will make mention of them, but do not make a secret promise with them, except that you may say something appropriate. Do not resolve a marriage contract until the prescribed time is reached. And know that Allah knows what is in your hearts, so be cautious of Him and know that Allah is All-Forgiving, Most Forbearing.
There is no sin on you if you divorce women before you have consummated the marriage or the dowry has been fixed; but give them a compensation – the wealthy according to his means and the poor according to his means – a reasonable compensation is an obligation upon those who do good.
If you divorce them before you have consummated the marriage, but you have already fixed their dowry, then pay half the amount agreed upon, unless the wife graciously waives it or the husband graciously pays it in full, but graciousness is closer to piety. Do not forget to be graceful to one another, for Allah is All-Seeing of what you do.
Be mindful of the prayers, especially the middle prayer; and stand before Allah in complete devotion.
If you are in danger, then pray while walking or riding. But when you are safe, remember Allah as He taught you what you did not know.
Those of you who pass away leaving widows should bequeath in their favor to be maintained for one year without forcing them out. But if they leave, then there is no blame on you for what they reasonably do with themselves. And Allah is All-Mighty, All-Wise.
The divorced women must be paid a reasonable compensation, an obligation upon the righteous.
This is how Allah makes His verses clear to you, so that you may understand.
Have you not seen those who left their homes, while they were in thousands for fear of death? Then Allah said to them, “Die,” then He brought them back to life. For Allah is ever Gracious to people, but most people are ungrateful.
And fight in the way of Allah and know that Allah is All-Hearing, All-Knowing.
Who is it that will lend to Allah a goodly loan, so He will multiply it for him manifold? It is Allah Who withholds and gives in abundance, and to Him you will be returned.
Did you not see the chiefs of the Children of Israel after Moses when they said to their prophet: “Appoint for us a king, so that we fight in the way of Allah.” He said: “How likely is it that if fighting was enjoined upon you that you will not fight?” They said: “How could we not fight in the way of Allah, while we have been driven out of our homes and separated from our children?” However, when fighting was enjoined upon them, they turned away, except a few of them. And Allah is All-Knowing of the wrongdoers.
Their prophet said to them: “Allah has appointed Saul as your king.” They said: “How could he be a king over us when we are more deserving of kingship than him, and he has not been given affluence in wealth?” He said: “Allah has chosen him over you and has increased him abundantly in knowledge and physique. Allah gives kingship to whom He wills, and Allah is All-Encompassing, All-Knowing.”
Their prophet further said to them: “The sign of his kingship is that the Ark will come to you – carried by the angels – having therein tranquility from your Lord and remains of what the House of Moses and the House of Aaron had left. Indeed, there is a sign in this for you, if you are true believers.”
When Saul set out along with the troops, he said: “Allah will test you with a river: whoever drinks from it, he is not from me, and whoever does not drink from it, he is from me, except the one who scoops a little with his hand.” But they all drank from it, except a few of them. When Saul and those who believed with him had crossed the river, they said: “We do not have power against Goliath and his troops today.” But those who were certain that they will meet Allah said: “How often has a small group overcome large groups with Allah’s permission. And Allah is with those who are patient.”
When they faced Goliath and his troops in combat, they said: “Our Lord, shower us with patience, make our feet firm, and give us victory over the disbelieving people.”
Thus they defeated them by Allah’s grace, and David killed Goliath, and Allah gave him the kingdom and wisdom and taught him whatever He willed. Were it not for Allah to repel some people by others, the earth would be filled with corruption, but Allah is All-Gracious to the worlds.
These are the verses of Allah that We recite to you [O Prophet] in truth, and you are truly one of the Messengers.
Those messengers: We favored some over others. There are some to whom Allah spoke, and some He raised high in rank. To Jesus, son of Mary, We gave clear signs and supported him with the Holy Spirit. If Allah had willed, those who came after them would not have fought one another after receiving clear signs. But they differed – some believed and some disbelieved. If Allah had willed, they would not have fought one another, but Allah does what He wills.
O you who believe, spend from what We have provided for you before there comes a day when there will be no trading, friendship, or intercession. It is the disbelievers who are the wrongdoers.
Allah: none has the right to be worshiped except Him, the Ever-Living, All-Sustaining. Neither drowsiness overtakes Him nor sleep. To Him belongs all that is in the heavens and all that is on earth. Who is there that can intercede with Him except with His permission? He knows what was before them and what will be after them, while they encompass nothing of His knowledge, except what He wills. His Kursī [footstool] extends over the heavens and earth, and safeguarding of both does not weary Him, for He is the Most High, Most Great.
There is no compulsion in religion; the truth has been made distinct from falsehood. Whoever rejects Tāghoot [false gods] and believes in Allah, has indeed grasped the strong handhold that never breaks. And Allah is All-Hearing, All-Knowing.
Allah is the Protector of those who believe; He brings them out of the depths of darkness into the light. As for those who disbelieve, their protectors are false gods; they bring them out from the light into the depths of darkness. They are the people of the Fire; they will abide therein forever.
Have you not considered the one who argued with Abraham about his Lord, as Allah had given him kingship? When Abraham said, “My Lord is the One Who gives life and causes death.” He said, “I give life and cause death.” Abraham said, “It is Allah Who brings the sun from the east, so bring it from the west.” Thus the disbeliever was dumbfounded, and Allah does not guide the wrongdoing people.
Or [have you considered] the one who passed by a town in ruins with its roofs collapsed? He said: “How can Allah revive them after their death?” Then Allah caused him to die for a hundred years, then revived him. He said, “How long have you remained [dead]?” He said, “I have remained for a day or part of a day”. He said, “No, but you have remained for a hundred years. Look at your food and your drink; they have not changed. But look at your donkey, so that We make you a sign for people. Look at the bones, how We bring them together then cover them with flesh.” When this was made clear to him, he said: “I know that Allah is Most Capable of all things.”
And [remember] when Abraham said: “My Lord, show me how You give life to the dead.” He said: “Do you not believe?’’ He said: “I do believe, but just to reassure my heart.’’ Allah said: “Then take four birds and cut them into pieces, then put a piece of each of them on each mountain, then call them; they will come swiftly to you. And know that Allah is All-Mighty, All-Wise.’’
The likeness of those who spend their wealth in the way of Allah is like a grain that sprouts seven ears, each ear bearing a hundred grains. And Allah gives multiple [rewards] for whom He wills. And Allah is All-Encompassing, All-Knowing.
Those who spend their wealth for the sake of Allah, then do not follow up their charity with reminders of generosity or hurtful words; they will have their reward with their Lord, and they will have no fear, nor will they grieve.
Kind words and forgiveness are better than charity followed by hurt. And Allah is Self-Sufficient, Most Forbearing.
O you who believe, do not nullify your charities with reminders and hurtful words, like the one who spends his wealth to show off before people, but does not believe in Allah or the Last Day. His likeness is that of a smooth rock upon which is dust, when it is hit by a heavy rain it is left bare. They will gain no reward from their deeds, and Allah does not guide the disbelieving people.
And the likeness of those who spend their wealth, seeking the pleasure of Allah and fortifying their own souls, is that of a garden on a fertile hill; if it is hit by a downpour, it yields double of its harvest. And if it is not hit by a downpour, then a drizzle is sufficient. And Allah is All-Seeing of what you do.
Would any of you wish to have an orchard of date palms and grapevines, under which rivers flow, full of all kinds of fruits; but he grew old and had feeble young children, then it is hit by a fiery whirlwind, burning it all? This is how Allah makes the verses clear to you so that you may reflect.
O you who believe, spend in charity from the good things you have earned and of what We have produced for you from the earth. Do not choose inferior things for charity, which you yourselves would not take except by overlooking. And know that Allah is Self-Sufficient, Praiseworthy.
Satan threatens you with poverty and orders you to commit shameful acts, but Allah promises you forgiveness and bounty from Him. And Allah is All-Encompassing, All-Knowing.
He gives wisdom to whom He wills; and whoever is given wisdom is surely given abundant good, but none will take heed except people of understanding.
Whatever charity you give or vow you make, Allah surely knows it. But the wrongdoers have no helpers.
If you give charity publicly, it is good; but if you give it secretly to the poor, it is better for you, and He will expiate some of your sins. And Allah is All-Aware of what you do.
You are not responsible for their guidance [O Prophet], but Allah guides whom He wills. Whatever wealth you spend in charity, it is for your own good – as long as you do so seeking Allah’s pleasure. And whatever wealth you spend in charity, you will be rewarded in full, and you will not be wronged.
[Charity is] for the poor who are fully occupied in the cause of Allah, unable to move about in the land [for livelihood]; the one who is unaware would think that they are rich because of their self-restraint. You will recognize them by their appearance. They do not ask people importunately. And whatever wealth you give, then Allah is All-Knowing of it.
Those who spend their wealth in charity, day and night, in secret and in public; they will have their reward with their Lord, and they will have no fear, nor will they grieve.
Those who consume usury will not stand [on the Day of Resurrection] except like those being beaten by Satan. That is because they say, “Trade is just like usury.” But Allah has permitted trade and forbidden usury. Whoever desists because of receiving admonition from his Lord may keep his past gains, and his case is left to Allah. But whoever returns to it, they are the people of the Fire; they will abide therein forever.
Allah destroys usury and nourishes charities, and Allah does not like any ungrateful sinner.
Those who believe, do righteous deeds, establish prayer, and give zakah, will have their reward with their Lord; and they will have no fear, nor will they grieve.
O you who believe, fear Allah and give up usury that is still due, if you are truly believers.
But if you do not do it, then beware of a declaration of war from Allah and His Messenger. However, if you repent, you may retain your capital – neither harming nor suffering harm.
If the debtor is in hardship, give him respite until it is easy for him to pay back. But if you waive it as charity, that is better for you, if only you knew.
And fear the Day when you will be brought back to Allah. Then every soul will be rewarded in full for what it has earned, and none will be wronged.
O you who believe, when you contract a debt among yourselves for a fixed period of time, write it down, and let the scribe write it between you with fairness. The scribe whom Allah has taught should not refuse to write, so let him write, and let the debtor dictate, but he should fear Allah his Lord, and not diminish anything out of it. If the debtor is feeble-minded, weak, or unable to dictate, then let his guardian dictate fairly, and bring two witnesses from among your men; if two men are not available, then one man and two women from those whom you accept as witnesses – so that if one of them forgets, the other can remind her. The witnesses should not refuse when they are summoned. Do not be reluctant to write down your debts, whether the amount is small or large, for a fixed period of time; that is more equitable in the sight of Allah, and more supportive as evidence, and more likely to prevent doubts among yourselves. However, if you are conducting a transaction on the spot between yourselves, there is no blame upon you not to write it, but take witnesses whenever you trade with one another. Neither a scribe nor a witness should suffer harm, for if you do cause them harm, it is indeed a sin on your part. So fear Allah, for it is Allah Who teaches you, and Allah is All-Knowing of everything.
If you are on a journey and find no scribe, then something should be taken as a collateral. But if you trust one another, then the debtor should fulfill his trust, and let him fear Allah, his Lord. Do not conceal the testimony, for anyone who conceals it has a sinful heart, and Allah is All-Knowing of what you do.
To Allah belongs all that is in the heavens and all that is on earth. Whether you reveal what is within yourselves or conceal it, Allah will call you to account for it. He forgives whom He wills and punishes whom He wills, for Allah is Most Capable of all things.
The Messenger believes in what has been sent down to him from his Lord, as do the believers. All of them believe in Allah, His angels, His Books, and His messengers, [saying], “We make no distinction between any of His messengers.” And they say, “We hear and obey. Grant us Your forgiveness, our Lord, and to You is the [final] destination.”
Allah does not burden any soul greater than it can bear. For it is what it has earned, and against it is what it has incurred. “Our Lord, do not hold us accountable if we forget or fall into error. Our Lord, do not place on us such a burden as You have placed on those before us. Our Lord, do not burden us with that which we cannot bear. Pardon us, forgive us, and have mercy on us. You are our Protector, so give us victory over the disbelieving people.”
Alif Lām Mīm.
Allah: none has the right to be worshiped except Him, the Ever-Living, All-Sustaining.
He has sent down to you the Book in truth, confirming what came before it. And He sent down the Torah and the Gospel
previously, as guidance for people, and He sent down the Criterion [between right and wrong]. But those who reject the verses of Allah will suffer a severe punishment, and Allah is All-Mighty, the Avenger.
Indeed, there is nothing hidden from Allah on earth or in the heaven.
It is He Who shapes you in the wombs as He wills. None has the right to be worshiped except Him, the All-Mighty, All-Wise.
He is the One Who has sent down to you the Book. In it are definite verses, which are the foundation of the Book; while others are ambiguous. Those with deviant hearts follow the ambiguous verses, seeking discord and seeking their [false] interpretation. But no one knows their [true] interpretation except Allah. And those who are well-grounded in knowledge say, “We believe in it. It is all from our Lord.” None will take heed except people of understanding.
“Our Lord, do not let our hearts deviate after You have guided us, and grant us Your mercy; for You are the Munificent Bestower.
Our Lord, You will surely gather all people for a Day about which there is no doubt; for Allah does not break His promise.”
Those who disbelieve, neither their wealth nor their children will avail them at all against Allah; it is they who are the fuel of the Fire.
[Their] case is like that of the people of Pharaoh and those before them. They all rejected Our signs, so Allah seized them for their sins, for Allah is severe in punishment.
Say to those who disbelieve: “You will soon be defeated and gathered into Hell. What a terrible resting place!”
There has been a sign for you in the two groups who confronted each other: one fighting for the cause of Allah, and the other disbelievers; they saw them, with their own eyes twice their number. But Allah strengthens with His help whom He wills. There is a lesson in this for those who have insight.
The love of desirable things has been made appealing to people, such as women, children, hoarded heaps of gold and silver, branded fine horses, livestock, and tilled land. These are the pleasures of the life of this world, but with Allah is the best place of return.
Say, “Shall I inform you of what is better than these? For those who fear Allah are gardens with their Lord under which rivers flow, abiding therein forever, with pure spouses and pleasure from Allah. And Allah is All-Seeing of His slaves,
those who say, “Our Lord, we believe, so forgive us our sins and protect us from the punishment of the Fire.”
Those who are patient, truthful, devout, charitable, and who seek forgiveness before dawn.
Allah testifies that none has the right to be worshiped except Him, as do the angels and people of knowledge; He is the Upholder of justice. None has the right to be worshiped except Him, the All-Mighty, All-Wise.
The true religion with Allah is Islam. Those who were given the Scripture did not dispute except after the knowledge had come to them, out of mutual envy and rivalry. But whoever rejects the verses of Allah, then Allah is swift in reckoning.
Then if they argue with you, say, “I have submitted myself to Allah, and so have those who follow me.” And say to those who were given the Scripture and to the illiterate, “Have you submitted yourselves?” If they do, then they are rightly guided, but if they turn away, your duty is only to convey the message. And Allah is All-Seeing of His slaves.
Those who reject the verses of Allah, kill the prophets unjustly, and kill those who enjoin justice among people; so give them tidings of a painful punishment.
They are those whose deeds have become worthless in this world and in the Hereafter, and they will have no helpers.
Have you not considered those who were given a portion of the Scripture? They are invited to the Book of Allah to judge between them, then a group of them turn away in aversion.
This is because they say, “The Fire will never touch us except for a few days.” They have been deluded in their religion by that which they used to fabricate.
But how [terrible] will it be when We gather them together on a Day about which there is no doubt, and each soul will be fully recompensed for what it has earned, and none will be wronged?
Say, “O Allah, Lord of the dominion, You give dominion to whom You will and take it away from whom You will; You honor whom You will and humiliate whom You will. All good is in Your Hand. You are Most Capable of all things.
You cause the night to enter into the day and cause the day to enter into the night; You bring the living out of the dead and bring the dead out of the living; and You give provision to whom You will without measure.”
Let not the believers take disbelievers as allies instead of believers, for whoever does so has nothing to do with Allah at all, except as a protective measure to save yourself from them. And Allah warns you of Himself, and to Allah is the final return.
Say, “Whether you conceal what is in your hearts or reveal it, Allah knows it: He knows all that is in the heavens and all that is on earth. And Allah is Most Capable of all things.”
On the Day when every soul will find itself faced with whatever good it has done, and whatever evil it has done – it will wish that there were a great distance between it and its evil. And Allah warns you of Himself, and Allah is All-Gracious to His slaves.
Say, “If you love Allah then follow me; Allah will love you and forgive you your sins: for Allah is All-Forgiving, Most Merciful.”
Say, “Obey Allah and the Messenger.” But if they turn away, then Allah does not like the disbelievers.
Allah chose Adam and Noah, the family of Abraham, and the family of ‘Imrān above all people.
They were descendants of one another. And Allah is All-Hearing, All-Knowing.
[Remember] when the wife of ‘Imrān said, “My Lord, I dedicate to You what is in my womb, so accept it from me, for You are the All-Hearing, All-Knowing.”
When she gave birth, she said, “My Lord, I have given birth to a female child,” – and Allah knew best what she had given birth to – “and the male is not like the female. I have named her Mary, and I seek refuge with You for her and her offspring from Satan, the accursed.”
Her Lord graciously accepted her and caused her to grow in a good manner, and entrusted her to the care of Zachariah. Every time Zachariah entered her prayer chamber, he found with her provision. He said, “O Mary, where did this come from?” She said, “It is from Allah, for Allah provides for whom He wills without measure.”
Thereupon Zachariah prayed to his Lord, saying, “My Lord, grant me by Your grace virtuous offspring, for You are the All-Hearer of prayers.”
The angels called out to him while he was standing in the chamber praying, “Allah gives you glad tidings of John, who will believe in the Word of Allah and will be honorable, abstinent [from women], and a prophet from among the righteous.”
He said: “My Lord, how can I have a son when I have reached old age and my wife is barren?” He said, “Thus Allah does what He wills.”
He said, “My Lord, give me a sign.” He said, “Your sign is that you will not speak to people for three days except by gestures. And remember your Lord often and glorify Him in the evening and in the morning.”
And [remember] when the angels said, “O Mary, Allah has chosen you, purified you, and chosen you over all women.
O Mary, worship your Lord devoutly, prostrate yourself and bow down with those who bow down.”
This is from the stories of the unseen that We reveal to you [O Prophet]; you were not with them when they cast lots as to which of them should take guardianship of Mary, nor were you with them when they disputed about it.
[Remember] when the angels said, “O Mary, Allah gives you glad tidings of a Word from Him, whose name will be the Messiah, Jesus, son of Mary; honorable in this world and in the Hereafter, and one of those near [to Allah].
He will speak to people in the cradle and in maturity, and he will be one of the righteous.”
She said: “My Lord, how can I have a child when no man has ever touched me?” He said, “Thus Allah creates what He wills. When He decrees something, He only says to it ‘Be’, and it is.
And He will teach him writing and wisdom, the Torah and and the Gospel.
And [will send him as] a messenger to the Children of Israel, ‘I have come to you with a sign from your Lord that I make for you from clay the figure of a bird, then breathe into it, and it will become a bird by Allah’s permission; and I heal the blind and the leper, and bring the dead to life by Allah’s permission; and I inform you of what you eat and what you store in your houses. There is a sign in this for you if you are believers.
And [I have come] confirming the Torah that came before me, and to make lawful to you some of what was forbidden to you; and I have come to you with a sign from your Lord, so fear Allah and obey me.
Indeed, Allah is my Lord and your Lord, so worship Him. This is the straight path.”
When Jesus sensed disbelief from them, he said, “Who are my helpers in the cause of Allah?” The disciples said, “We are helpers of Allah. We believe in Allah; so bear witness that we are Muslims.”
“Our Lord, we believe in what You have sent down and we follow the messenger; so count us among those who bear witness [to the truth].”
And [the disbelievers] devised a plan, but Allah also made a plan, and Allah is the best of planners.
And [remember] when Allah said, “O Jesus, I will take you and raise you up to Myself and deliver you from those who disbelieve, and make those who follow you above those who disbelieve until the Day of Resurrection. Then you will all return to Me, and I will judge between you concerning that over which you differed.
As for those who disbelieve, I will punish them severely in this world and the Hereafter, and they will have no helpers.
As for those who believe and do righteous deeds, He will give them their rewards in full, and Allah does not like the wrongdoers.”
This is what We recite to you of the verses and wise reminder.
The similitude of Jesus before Allah is like that of Adam; He created him from dust, then said to him, “Be,” and he was.
This is the truth from your Lord, so do not be of those who doubt.
Whoever disputes with you concerning him [Jesus] after the knowledge has come to you, then say, “Come, let us call our sons and your sons, our women and your women, ourselves and yourselves, then invoke the curse of Allah upon the liars.”
Indeed, this is the true narrative, and none has the right to be worshiped except Allah, and Allah is the All-Mighty, All-Wise.
If they turn away, then Allah is All-Knowing of those who spread corruption.
Say, “O people of the Book, come to a common term between us and you, that we worship none but Allah and associate no partners with Him, and that we do not take one another as lords besides Allah.” But if they turn away, say, “Bear witness that we are Muslims [submitting to Allah].”
O People of the Book, why do you dispute about Abraham, while the Torah and the Gospel were not sent down but after him? Do you not understand?
Here you are! You are those who disputed about that of which you have some knowledge, then why do you dispute about that of which you have no knowledge? Allah knows and you do not know.
Abraham was neither a Jew nor a Christian, but he was a monotheist Muslim, and he was not one of the polytheists.
The closest people to Abraham are those who followed him, and this Prophet and those who believe. And Allah is the Guardian of the believers.
A faction of the People of the Book wishes to mislead you [believers]; they do not mislead except themselves, but they do not realize it.
O People of the Book, why do you disbelieve in the verses of Allah while you testify [to their truth]?
O People of the Book, why do you mix the truth with falsehood and conceal the truth knowingly?
A faction of the People of the Book say, “Believe in what has been sent down to the believers in the morning and reject it in the evening, so that they may return [from their faith].
And do not believe in anyone except those who follow your religion.” Say, “The guidance is the guidance of Allah.” [They say,] Lest someone may be given similar to what you have been given or argue with you before your Lord. Say, “All bounty is in the Hand of Allah; He grants it to whom He wills. And Allah is All-Encompassing, All-Knowing.”
He chooses for His mercy whom He wills; for Allah is the Possessor of great bounty.”
And among the People of the Book are some who, if you entrust with a heap of gold, will return it to you; yet there are others who, if you entrust with a single coin of gold, will not return it to you unless you keep standing over them. This is because they say, “We are under no obligation towards the gentiles.” And they tell lies about Allah knowingly.
But those who fulfill their covenant and fear Allah, surely Allah loves those who fear Him.
Those who trade the covenant of Allah and their oaths for a small price, they will have no share in the Hereafter. Allah will neither speak to them, nor look at them on the Day of Resurrection, nor will He purify them, and for them there will be a painful punishment.
And there are some among them who alter the Scripture with their tongues, so that you may think it is part of the Scripture, while it is not part of the Scripture; and they say, “It is from Allah,” while it is not from Allah. And they tell lies about Allah knowingly.
It is not for a human being whom Allah has given the Scripture, wisdom, and prophethood to say to the people, “Be my worshipers instead of Allah.” Rather, he would say, “Be devoted servants of your Lord because of your teaching of the Scripture and because of your study thereof.”
Nor would he order you to take angels and prophets as lords. Would he order you to disbelieve after you have submitted to Allah [as Muslims]?
And [remember] when Allah took the covenant of the prophets, [saying], “After I have given you the Book and wisdom, if there comes to you a messenger confirming what is with you, then you must believe in him and support him.” Allah said, “Do you affirm this covenant and accept this commitment?” They said, “Yes, we do.” He said, “Then bear witness and I am with you among the witnesses.”
Whoever turns away after this, it is they who are the rebellious.
Do they seek other than the religion of Allah, when to Him submit all those in the heavens and on earth, willingly or unwilling, and to Him they will return?
Say, “We believe in Allah and what has been sent down to us and what was sent down to Abraham, Ishmael, Isaac, Jacob, and his descendants, and what was given to Moses, Jesus, and other prophets from their Lord; we make no distinction between any of them, and to Him we submit.”
Anyone who seeks a religion other than Islam, never will it be accepted from him; and in the Hereafter he will be among the losers.
How would Allah guide a people who disbelieved after having believed and testified that the Messenger was true, and the clear signs had come to them? For Allah does not guide the wrongdoing people.
The punishment of such people is that they are cursed by Allah, the angels, and all mankind.
They will bide therein forever. Their punishment will neither be lightened, nor will they be given respite,
except those who repent after that and mend their ways, for Allah is All-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
But those who disbelieve after having believed then increase in disbelief, never will their repentance be accepted; it is they who have gone astray.
Those who disbelieve and die as disbelievers, even an earth full of gold will never be accepted from any of them, if offered as ransom. For such people there will be a painful punishment, and they will have no helpers.
You will never attain righteousness until you spend in charity from what you love. Whatever you spend, Allah is All-Knowing of it.
All food was permissible for the Children of Israel except what Israel [Jacob] made impermissible for himself before the Torah was sent down. Say, “Bring the Torah and recite it, if you are truthful.”
Whoever fabricates lies upon Allah after that – it is they who are the wrongdoers.
Say, “Allah has spoken the truth, so follow the religion of Abraham, exclusively devoted to Allah, and he was not one of the polytheists.”
The first House [of worship] established for mankind was the one at Bakkah [Makkah], full of blessings and guidance for the worlds.
In it are clear signs [such as] the standing place of Abraham; whoever enters it will be safe. Pilgrimage to the House is a duty owed to Allah upon all people who are able to make their way to it; whoever disbelieves, then Allah is in no need for the worlds.
Say, “O People of the Book, why do you reject the verses of Allah when Allah is Witness to all what you do?”
Say, “O People of the Book, why do you hinder the believers from the way of Allah – trying to make it crooked when you are witnesses [to its truth]? But Allah is not unaware of what you do.”
O you who believe, if you obey a group of those who were given the Scripture, they will turn you back as disbelievers after your belief.
How can you disbelieve while Allah’s verses are being recited to you and His Messenger is in your midst? Whoever holds fast to Allah is certainly guided to the straight path.
O you who believe, fear Allah as He should be feared, and do not die except as Muslims.
And hold fast to the rope of Allah all together and do not be divided. Remember the favor of Allah upon you when you were enemies, then He reconciled your hearts, making you brethren by His grace. And you were on the brink of a fiery pit and He delivered you from it. This is how Allah makes His verses clear to you, so that you may be guided.
Let there be a group from among you who call to goodness: enjoining what is right, and forbidding what is wrong. It is they who are successful.
Do not be like those who became divided and differed after the clear proofs had come to them; and for them there will be a massive punishment.
On the Day when some faces will turn bright while other faces will turn dark. As for those whose faces turn dark, [they will be told], “Did you disbelieve after having believed? Taste the punishment for your disbelief.”
As for those whose faces turn bright, they will be in Allah’s mercy, they will abide therein forever.
These are the verses of Allah; We recite them to you in truth. Allah does not want injustice to the worlds.
To Allah belongs all that is in the heavens and all that is on earth, and to Allah will return all matters.
You are the best nation ever raised for mankind: you enjoin what is right and forbid what is wrong, and believe in Allah. If the People of the Book had believed, it would have been better for them. Some of them are believers, but most of them are rebellious.
They can never harm you except some annoyance. But if they fight you, they will turn their backs, then they will not be helped.
They are afflicted with humiliation wherever they may be, unless they are protected by a covenant from Allah or a treaty from the people. They have incurred Allah’s wrath and are afflicted with destitution. That is because they disbelieved in Allah’s verses and killed the prophets unjustly. That is because of their disobedience and transgression.
Yet all are not alike: there are some among the People of the Book who are upright: they recite the verses of Allah during the night and they prostrate.
They believe in Allah and the Last Day; enjoin what is right and forbid what is wrong; and hasten in doing good deeds. They are among the righteous.
Whatever good they do, their reward will never be denied; for Allah is All-Knowing of those who are righteous.
Those who disbelieve, neither their wealth nor their children will ever avail them against Allah; they are the people of the Fire, they will abide therein forever.
The similitude of what they spend in the life of this world is like that of a frosty wind that strikes and destroys the harvest of a people who have wronged themselves. It is not Allah Who wronged them, but they wronged themselves.
O you who believe, do not take as close friends those from other than yourselves; they spare no effort to ruin you; they wish to see you suffer. Hatred has appeared from their mouths, but what their hearts conceal is even greater. We have made the verses clear to you, if only you understand.
O you [believers], you are those who love them but they do not love you, even though you believe in all the Scriptures. When they meet you, they say, “We believe,” but when they are alone, they bite their fingertips against you in rage. Say, “May you die in your rage.” Allah is All-Knowing of what is in the hearts.
If something good happens to you, it grieves them; but if adversity befalls you, they rejoice at it. But if you keep patient and fear Allah, their schemes will not harm you in the least; for Allah encompasses all what they do.
And [remember] when you left your home in the morning to position the believers for the battle [of ’Uhud]; and Allah is All-Hearing, All-Knowing.
When two parties from among you were about to lose courage, but Allah was their protector. Let the believers put their trust in Allah.
Allah had helped you at Badr when you were weak; then fear Allah so that you may be grateful.
[Remember] when you said to the believers, “Will it not suffice you that your Lord will help you by sending down three thousand angels?”
Yes, if you stay patient and fear Allah, and the enemy should launch a surprise attack on you, your Lord will help you with five thousand marked angels.
Allah ordained this only as glad tidings for you, and to reassure your hearts thereby. Victory only comes from Allah, the All-Mighty, All-Wise,
in order to destroy a section of the disbelievers or disgrace them, so they may turn back utterly disappointed.
It is not for you [O Prophet] to decide whether He will accept their repentance or punish them, for they are wrongdoers.
To Allah belongs all that is in the heavens and all that is on earth. He forgives whom He wills and punishes whom He wills, and Allah is All-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
O you who believe, do not consume usury, doubled and multiplied. And fear Allah, so that you may succeed,
and fear the Fire prepared for the disbelievers.
And obey Allah and the Messenger, so that you may be given mercy.
And hasten towards forgiveness from your Lord and a Paradise as wide as the heavens and earth, prepared for the righteous,
those who spend in times of prosperity and adversity, and who restrain their anger and pardon people; for Allah loves those who do good.
And those who, when they commit a shameful act or wrong themselves, remember Allah and seek forgiveness for their sins – who can forgive sins except Allah? – and they do not persist in what they did knowingly.
Their reward is forgiveness from their Lord and gardens under which rivers flow, abiding therein forever. How excellent is the reward of those who do [righteous] deeds!
There were nations that passed before you; so travel through the land and see how was the end of the deniers.
This is an exhortation for mankind; a guidance and admonition for the righteous.
Do not lose heart nor grieve, for you have the upper hand, if you are [truly] believers.
If you have suffered a blow [at Uhud], they too have suffered a blow like it [at Badr]. We alternate among people these days, so that Allah may reveal the believers and may choose martyrs from among you. And Allah does not like the wrongdoers.
And so that He may purify the believers and annihilate the disbelievers.
Do you think that you would enter Paradise when Allah has not yet seen those of you who struggled in His way and those who remained patient?
You did wish for martyrdom before facing it, and now you have seen it with your own eyes.
Muhammad is no more than a messenger; there were messengers passed away before him. If he dies or is killed, will you turn back on your heels? Anyone who turns back on his heels will not harm Allah in the least, but Allah will reward those who are grateful.
No soul can die except with Allah’s permission at a destined time. Whoever seeks the reward of this world, We will give him thereof, and whoever seeks the reward of the Hereafter, We will give him thereof. And We will reward those who are grateful.
[Imagine] how many prophets along with the devout men fought, but they did not lose heart because of what they suffered in the way of Allah, nor did they weaken nor surrender. And Allah loves those who are patient.
All they said was, “Our Lord, forgive us our sins and our excess in our affairs, make firm our feet, and give us victory against the disbelieving people.”
So Allah gave them the reward of this world and the best reward of the Hereafter, for Allah loves those who do good.
O you who believe, if you obey those who disbelieve, they will turn you back on your heels, and thus you will return as losers.
But Allah is your Protector, and He is the Best of helpers.
We will cast dread into the hearts of those who disbelieve because they associated partners with Allah for which He has not sent down any authority. Their refuge will be the Fire. How terrible is the abode of the wrongdoers!
Indeed, Allah has fulfilled His promise to you when you were slaying them by His permission, until you lost courage and disputed over the command and disobeyed after He had shown you what you liked [victory]. Among you are some who seek this world and some who seek the Hereafter. He then prevented you from [defeating] them so that He may test You, but he pardoned you, for Allah is Most Gracious to the believers.
[Remember] when you were fleeing without even casting a glance at anyone, and the Messenger was calling you back. You were then given distress upon distress, so that you should not grieve for what you missed or for what you suffered. For Allah is All-Aware of what you do.
Then He sent down tranquility upon you after distress: a slumber overtaking a group of you, while another group cared only about themselves, having false thoughts about Allah, the untrue thoughts of ignorance, saying, “Do we have any say in the matter?” Say, “All matters belong to Allah.” They conceal in their hearts what they do not reveal to you. They say, “If we had any say in the matter, none of us would have been killed here.” Say, “Even if you had been in your homes, those among you who were destined to be killed would have come out to their killing places.” But Allah did this so that He may test your inner thoughts and distinguish what is in your hearts. For Allah is All-Knowing of what is in the hearts.
Those of you who fled on the day when the two armies met [at ’Uhud], it was Satan who made them slip due to some of their misdeeds, but Allah has pardoned them, for Allah is All-Forgiving, Most Forbearing.
O you who believe, do not be like those who disbelieved and said about their brothers who traveled through the land or engaged in battle, “If they had stayed with us, they would not have died or been killed.” Allah makes that a cause of distress in their hearts. It is Allah Who gives life and causes death, and Allah is All-Seeing of what you do.
If you are killed in the way of Allah or die, then forgiveness and mercy from Allah are far better than what they accumulate.
If you die or are martyred, it is unto Allah that you will be gathered.
It is by Allah’s mercy that you [O Prophet] became lenient to them. If you had been harsh and hard-hearted, they would have dispersed from you. So pardon them, seek forgiveness for them, and consult them in the important matters. But once you have made a decision, put your trust in Allah, for Allah loves those who put their trust in Him.
If Allah helps you, none can overcome you; but if He forsakes you, who is there to help you after Him? In Allah let the believers put their trust.
It is not for a prophet to misappropriate the spoils of war. Whoever misappropriates will carry it with him on the Day of Resurrection. Then every soul will be paid in full for what it has earned, and none will be wronged.
Is the one who seeks Allah’s pleasure like someone who incurs Allah’s wrath, and whose abode is Hell? What a terrible destination!
They are of various ranks with Allah, and Allah is All-Seeing of what they do.
Allah has conferred favor on the believers when He sent them a messenger from among themselves, reciting to them His verses, purifying them, and teaching them the Book and Wisdom, although before that they were clearly misguided.
How is it that, when you suffered a calamity [at Uhud] while you had inflicted twice as much upon them [at Badr], you said, “How could this happen?” Say, “You brought this to yourselves. Indeed, Allah is Most Capable of all things.”
What you suffered on the day [of Uhud] when the two armies met was by Allah’s permission, so that He may distinguish the [true] believers,
and in order to make known those who are hypocrites. They were told, “Come forward, fight in the way of Allah or at least defend.” They said, “If we had known there was fighting, we would have certainly followed you.” That day they were nearer to disbelief than to faith, saying with their mouths what was not in their hearts, but Allah is All-Knowing of what they conceal.
Those who stayed behind said about their brothers, “If they had obeyed us, they would not have been killed [at ’Uhud].” Say, “Then avert death from yourselves if you are truthful.”
Never think of those who are killed in Allah’s way as dead. Rather, they are alive with their Lord, receiving provision,
rejoicing in what Allah has given them of His bounty, and delighted for those who have yet to join them, of those whom they left behind, that they will have no fear, nor will they grieve.
They rejoice at the favors and bounties of Allah, and that Allah does not let the reward of the believers to be lost,
those who responded to Allah and the Messenger after they were struck with injury. For those who did good among them and feared Allah is a great reward,
those to whom people said, “Indeed, the people have gathered against you, so fear them.” But it only increased them in faith, and they said, “Allah is Sufficient for us, and He is the best Protector.”
They then returned with grace and bounty of Allah, having suffered no harm. They pursued Allah’s pleasure, and Allah is the Possessor of great bounty.
It is Satan who frightens [you] through his allies. Do not fear them, but fear Me, if you are [true] believers.
Do not let those who hasten to disbelief grieve you; they can never harm Allah in the least. It is Allah’s will that they will have no share in the Hereafter, and for them there will be a massive punishment.
Those who purchase disbelief for faith can never harm Allah in the least, and for them there will be a painful punishment.
Those who disbelieve should not think that whatever respite We give them is good for them. We only give them respite so that they may increase in sin, and for them there will be a disgracing punishment.
Allah would not leave the believers in the state you are in, until He distinguishes the evil from the good, nor would Allah reveal to you [believers] the unseen, but Allah chooses from His messengers whom He wills. So believe in Allah and His messengers; if you believe and fear Allah, you will have a great reward.
Those who greedily withhold what Allah has given them of His grace, should not think that it is good for them, rather it is bad for them; their necks will be chained by what they greedily withheld on the Day of Resurrection. To Allah belongs the inheritance of the heavens and earth, and Allah is All-Aware of what you do.
Allah has heard the words of those who said, “Allah is poor and we are rich!” We will write down what they said and their killing of the prophets unjustly, and We will say, “Taste the punishment of the burning Fire.
That is because of what your hands have sent forth, for Allah is not unjust to [His] slaves.”
They said, “Allah has commanded us not to believe in any messenger until he brings us an offering consumed by the fire.” Say, “There came to you messengers before me with clear proofs and with what you demanded. Then why did you kill them if you are truthful?”
Then if they reject you [O Prophet], there were messengers who were rejected before you, who came with clear proofs, written ordinances [Psalms of David], and the enlightening Scripture.
Every soul will taste death, and you will be paid your reward in full on the Day of Resurrection. Whoever is spared from the Fire and admitted into Paradise has truly won, for the life of this world is nothing but an illusory pleasure.
You will certainly be tested in your wealth and your own selves, and you will certainly hear from those who were given the Scripture before you and from those who associate partners with Allah much abusive words. But if you observe patience and fear Allah, that is a matter of firm resolve.
And [remember] when Allah took a covenant from those who were given the Scripture, “that you should make it clear to people and not conceal it.” But they cast it behind their backs and sold it for a small price. How terrible is their deal!
Do not think of those who are delighted with their misdeeds and love to be praised for what they have not done; so do not think that they will be safe from the punishment, and for them there will be a painful punishment.
To Allah belongs the dominion of the heavens and earth, and Allah is Most Capable of all things.
Indeed, in the creation of the heavens and earth and the alternation of the night and day are signs for people of understanding,
those who remember Allah while standing, sitting, and lying on their sides, and reflect upon the creation of the heavens and earth [saying], “Our Lord, you have not created all this in vain. Glory be to You. Protect us from the punishment of the Fire.
Our Lord, whoever You cause to enter the Fire, You have surely disgraced him, and the wrongdoers will have no helpers.
Our Lord, we have heard the caller to faith calling, ‘Believe in your Lord,’ so we believed. Our Lord, forgive us our sins, expiate our misdeeds, and cause us to die among the righteous.
“Our Lord, give us what You have promised us through Your messengers, and do not disgrace us on the Day of Resurrection, for You never break Your promise.”
Their Lord responded to them: “I will never waste the deeds of any doer among you, male or female; you are the same in reward. Those who migrated and were driven out of their homes and suffered for My sake, and fought and were killed – I will surely expiate their sins and admit them into gardens under which rivers flow, a reward from Allah; with Allah is the best reward.”
Do not be deceived by the disbelievers’ prosperity in the land:
it is a brief enjoyment, then Hell will be their abode. What a terrible resting place!
But for those who fear their Lord will be gardens under which rivers flow, abiding therein forever – a welcoming gift from Allah; and what is with Allah is best for the righteous.
There are some among the People of the Book who believe in Allah and what has been sent down to you and what was sent down to them; humbling themselves before Allah. They do not sell Allah’s verses for a small price. It is they who will have their reward with their Lord. Indeed, Allah is swift in reckoning.
O you who believe, be patient and endure, stand on guard and fear Allah, so that you may be successful.
O mankind, fear your Lord Who created you from a single soul, and created from it its mate, and from both of them created countless men and women. Fear Allah in Whose name you ask one another, and be mindful of your kinship ties, for Allah is ever Watchful over you.
Give orphans their wealth, and do not exchange your bad possessions for their good ones, nor consume their wealth by mixing it with your own; for this is indeed a great sin.
If you fear that you may not maintain justice with orphan girls [by marry them] then marry women of your choice – two, three, or four; but if you fear that you may not maintain justice, then marry only one, or slave-girls you may own. That is more likely to avoid committing injustice.
Give women their marriage dowries graciously. However, if they waive to you part of it willingly, then enjoy it with a clear conscience.
Do not give the feeble-minded your property, which Allah has made a means of livelihood for you, but feed and clothe them from it, and speak to them kindly.
Test the orphans until they reach a marriageable age. Then if you perceive maturity in them, hand over their property to them, and do not consume it extravagantly and hastily, lest they should grow up. If the guardian is well-off, he should restrain himself entirely; but if he is poor, he may take a reasonable provision. When you hand over their property to them, call in witnesses. And Allah is sufficient as a Reckoner.
Men have a share in what parents and relatives leave behind, and women have a share in what parents and relatives leave behind, whether it is little or much; an ordained share.
If at the time of distribution [other] relatives, orphans, and the needy are present, give them something too, and speak to them kindly.
And let those [in charge of orphans] be cautious just as they themselves would be concerned had they left helpless offspring behind; let them fear Allah and say words of justice.
Indeed, those who consume the orphans’ property unjustly, they only consume fire into their bellies, and they will burn in a Blazing Fire.
Allah instructs you concerning [the inheritance of] your children: the share of a male is equal to that of two females. If there are only daughters, two or more, they get two-thirds of the estate, but if there is only one daughter, she gets half. Each parent is entitled to one-sixth if he left offspring, but if he left no offspring and the parents are the only heirs, the mother gets one-third, but if he has siblings, the mother gets one-sixth, after settling any bequests or debts. Your parents and your children, you do not know which of them will benefit you more. [These shares are] ordained by Allah; and Allah is All-Knowing, All-Wise.
Your share is half of your wives’ estate, if they leave no child; but if they leave a child, you get one-fourth, after settling the bequests or debts. Your wives’ share is one-fourth of your estate, if you leave no child, but if you leave a child, they get one-eighth, after settling the bequests or debts. If a man or a woman leaves neither parents nor offspring, but has a brother or a sister, each one gets one-sixth; but if they are more than two, they share in one-third, after settling the bequests or debts, without causing harm to the heirs. This is an instruction from Allah; and Allah is All-Knowing, Most Forbearing.
These are the limits [set by] Allah. Whoever obeys Allah and His Messenger, He will admit him to gardens under which rivers flow, abiding therein forever. That is the great success.
But whoever disobeys Allah and His Messenger and transgresses His limits, He will cause him to enter the Fire, abiding therein forever, and for him there will be a humiliating punishment.
Those of your women who commit adultery, call four witnesses against them from amongst you. If they testify, confine them to their homes until they die or Allah ordains for them [another] way.
If two among who commit this [sin], chastise them. Then if they repent and mend their ways, leave them alone. Indeed, Allah is Accepting of Repentance, Most Merciful.
Allah only accepts the repentance of those who commit evil out of ignorance, then repent soon thereafter; it is they to whom Allah will turn in forgiveness, for Allah is All-Knowing, All-Wise.
However, repentance is not for those who commit evil deeds until death approaches one of them, he then says, “Now I repent,” nor for those who die as disbelievers; for them We have prepared a painful punishment.
O you who believe, it is not lawful for you to forcibly inherit women, nor to hinder them from marriage, in order to take back some of what you have given them, unless they commit a clear adultery. Treat them kindly. If you dislike something, it may be that you dislike something which Allah has put much good in it.
If you decide to replace one wife with another, and you have given her abundance of wealth, do not take any of it back. Would you take it wrongfully and sinfully?
How could you take it back after having been intimate with one another, and they have taken from you a solemn covenant?
Do not marry the women whom your fathers married, except what happened in the past: it is indeed a shameful, detestable, and evil practice.
It is prohibited for you [to marry] your mothers, your daughters, your sisters, your paternal and maternal aunts, your brother’s daughters, your sister’s daughters, your foster-mothers, your foster-sisters, your mothers-in-law, your step-daughters under your guardianship if you have consummated the marriage with their mothers – however if you have not consummated the marriage, it is not a sin [to marry them] – nor wives of your own sons, nor two sisters together, except for what happened in the past, for Allah is All-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
Also [prohibited are] married women except female captives you may own. This is Allah’s commandment to you. All women other than these are lawful for you to marry with your wealth in a legal marriage, not adultery. When you consummate your marriage with them, give them their due dowries. There is no sin on you to mutually agree after the [initial] agreement. And Allah is All-Knowing, All-Wise.
But if anyone of you cannot afford to marry free believing women, you may marry believing bondwomen in your possession. Allah knows best about your faith; you are from one another. Marry them with the permission of their masters and give them their dowries in fairness – provided that they are chaste, neither given to committing fornication nor having secret paramours. If they commit adultery after marriage, they are liable to half of the punishment prescribed for free women. This is for those of you who fear falling into sin; but if you stay patient, it is better for you. And Allah is All-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
Allah wants to make things clear to you and guide you to the [righteous] ways of those before you, and accept your repentance; and Allah is All-Knowing, All-Wise.
Allah wants to accept your repentance, but those who follow their lusts want you to deviate a massive deviation.
Allah wants to lighten your burdens, for man was created weak.
O you who believe, do not consume one another’s property unlawfully, unless it is trade conducted with your mutual consent. And do not kill yourselves [or one another]. Indeed, Allah is Most Merciful to you.
And whoever does that out of aggression and injustice, We will cast him into the Fire; that is easy for Allah.
If you avoid the major sins which are forbidden to you, We will absolve your [minor] sins and admit you to a noble entrance.
Do not wish for what Allah has bestowed upon some of you over others. Men will have the reward of their deeds and women will have the reward of their deeds. And ask Allah for His bounty. Indeed, Allah is All-Knowing of everything.
For everyone We have appointed heirs to what parents and close relatives leave behind. As for those to whom you have made a pledge, give them their share. Indeed, Allah is Witness over all things.
Men are in charge of women, as Allah has made some of them excel the others, and because they spend of their wealth. Therefore the righteous women are obedient, and protect what Allah has entrusted them with in [their husband’s] absence. As for those women on whose part you fear rebellion, [first] admonish them, [next] forsake them in bed, and [last] hit them [gently]. Then if they obey you, do not take further action against them. Indeed, Allah is Most High, All-Great.
If you fear a breach between them, appoint an arbitrator from his family and another from hers. If they both want reconciliation, Allah will bring harmony between them. Indeed, Allah is All-Knowing, All-Aware.
Worship Allah and do not associate any partners with Him. Be kind to parents, relatives, orphans, the needy, near and distant neighbors, close friends, wayfarers, and slaves whom you own. For Allah does not like those who are arrogant, boastful,
those who are stingy and promote stinginess among people, and conceal what Allah has bestowed upon them of His bounty. We have prepared for disbelievers a humiliating punishment.
And [also] those who spend their wealth to show off to people, but do not believe in Allah or the Last Day. Whoever takes Satan as an associate has indeed taken an evil associate.
What harm would it do to them to believe in Allah and the Last Day, and spent out of what Allah has provided for them? For Allah is All-Knowing of them.
Allah does not do injustice as much as an atom’s weight. And if it is a good deed, He will multiply it and give from Himself a great reward.
How will it be when We bring a witness from every community, and bring you [O Prophet] as a witness against these [people]?
On that Day, those who disbelieved and disobeyed the Messenger will wish that the earth were leveled upon them. And they will not be able to hide anything from Allah.
O you who believe, do not approach the prayer while you are intoxicated until you know what you are saying, nor in a state of major impurity – except while passing through [a mosque] – until you take a bath. If you are ill, or on a journey, or have relieved yourselves, or had intercourse with [your] women and find no water, then purify yourselves with clean earth and wipe your faces and hands with it. For Allah is Ever-Pardoning, All-Forgiving.
Have you not seen those who were given a portion of the Book – purchasing misguidance and wishing that you lose your way?
But Allah knows best your enemies. Allah is sufficient as a Protector, and Allah is sufficient as a Helper.
Among the Jews are those who distort the words taking them out of the context, and say, “We hear and disobey,” and “Hear! May you never hear,” and “Rā‘ina” [hearken to us] – twisting their tongues and insulting the religion. If they had said, “We hear and obey,” and “Hear,” and “Wait for us,” it would have been better for them and more proper. But Allah has cursed them for their disbelief, so only a few of them will believe.
O you who were given the Scripture, believe in what We have sent down [to Muhammad] – confirming your own Scriptures – before We obliterate faces turning them backwards, or We curse them as We cursed the Sabbath-breakers. For Allah’s will is always executed.
Allah does not forgive associating partners with Him, but forgives anything less than that for whom He wills. Whoever associates partners with Allah has indeed committed a grave sin.
Have you not seen those who claim purify for themselves? It is Allah Who purifies whom He wills, and they will not be wronged even as much as the thread on a date-stone.
See how they fabricate lies about Allah! This in itself is sufficient as a flagrant sin.
Have you not seen those who were given a portion of the Scripture, who believe in idols and Tāghoot [false gods], and they say to the disbelievers that they are more guided than the believers?
It is they whom Allah has cursed, and whoever Allah curses, you will never find any helper for him.
Do they have a share in the dominion? Even if so, they would not give people even as much as the speck on a date stone.
Or do they envy people for what Allah has given them out of His bounty? We gave the descendants of Abraham the Book and wisdom, and We gave them a great authority.
Some of them believed in him [Muhammad], while others turned away from him. Hell is sufficient as a blaze.
Those who reject Our verses, We will cast them into the Fire. Whenever their skins are burnt through, We will replace them with fresh skins, so that they may taste the punishment. Indeed, Allah is All-Mighty, All-Wise.
As for those who believe and do righteous deeds, We will admit them into gardens under which rivers flow, abiding therein forever. They will have therein pure spouses, and We will admit them into a cool refreshing shade.
Indeed, Allah commands you to return trusts to their owners, and when you judge between people, judge with justice. What an excellent exhortation from Allah to you! Indeed, Allah is All-Hearing, All-Seeing.
O you who believe, obey Allah and obey the Messenger, and those of you who are in authority. If you disagree over anything, refer it to Allah and the Messenger, if you believe in Allah and the Last Day; that is better and more commendable in the end.
Have you not seen [O Prophet] those who claim that they believe in what has been sent down to you and what was sent down before you, yet they seek the judgment of Tāghoot [false judges], even though they were commanded to reject them? Satan wants to lead them far astray.
When it is said to them, “Come to what Allah has sent down and to the Messenger,” you will see the hypocrites turn away from you in aversion.
How will it be when a disaster befalls them because of what their hands have sent forth, then they come to you swearing by Allah, “We intended nothing but good and reconciliation.”
They are those whom Allah knows what is in their hearts; so turn away from them, admonish them, and speak to them in a far-reaching effective way.
We did not send any Messenger but to be obeyed by Allah’s permission. If only they had come to you [O Prophet] – after wronging themselves – and had asked Allah for forgiveness, and the Messenger had asked for forgiveness for them, they would have found Allah Accepting of Repentance, Most Merciful.
But no, by your Lord, they will not believe until they accept you [O Prophet] as judge in their disputes, and find no discomfort within their hearts about your judgments, but accept them wholeheartedly.
If We were to command them, “kill yourselves”, or “leave your homes”, they would not do it except for a few of them. But if they did what they were instructed, it would surely be better for them and more reassuring,
and then We would certainly give them from Us a great reward,
and would surely guide them to a straight path.
Those who obey Allah and the Messenger will be with those whom Allah has blessed: the prophets, the people of truth, the martyrs, and the righteous. What excellent companions they are!
That grace is from Allah, and sufficient is Allah as Knower.
O you who believe, take your precautions, then march out in groups or march out all together.
There are some among you who lag behind [from the battle]; then if a calamity befalls you, he will say, “Allah has blessed me that I was not present with them.”
But if some bounty comes to you from Allah, he will surely say – as if there had never been any affection between you and him – “Oh, I wish I had been with them, so I could have made a great gain.”
Let those who sacrifice the life of this world for the Hereafter fight in the way of Allah; for whoever fights in the way of Allah, whether he is killed or attains victory, We will give him a great reward.
Why is it that you do not fight in the way of Allah and for the sake of the oppressed men, women, and children who say, “Our Lord, take us out of this town of oppressive people, and grant us from Yourself a protector and grant us from Yourself a helper.”?
The believers fight in the way of Allah, whereas the disbelievers fight in the way of Tāghoot [false gods]. So fight the allies of Satan. Indeed, the scheme of Satan is ever weak.
Have you not seen those who were told, “Restrain your hands [from fighting], establish prayer and give zakah”? However, when fighting was ordained for them, a group of them feared people as one should fear Allah or even more. They said, “Our Lord, why have You ordained fighting for us? If only you had spared us for a little while.” Say, “The enjoyment of this world is little, and the Hereafter is better for those who fear Allah. And you will not be wronged, even as much as a thread of a date stone.
Wherever you are, death will overcome you, even if you are in fortified towers.” If something good happens to them, they say, “This is from Allah,” but if something bad happens to them, they say, “This is from you.” Say, “All is from Allah.” What is wrong with these people that they hardly understand any word?
Whatever good happens to you is from Allah, but whatever bad happens to you is from yourself. We have sent you [O Prophet] as a messenger to mankind, and sufficient is Allah as a witness.
Whoever obeys the Messenger has indeed obeyed Allah. But anyone who turns away, We have not sent you [O Prophet] as a keeper over them.
They say, “We obey you,” but as soon as they leave you, a group of them conspires by night against what you say. Allah records all their plots, so turn away from them, and put your trust in Allah. And sufficient is Allah as a Trustee of Affairs.
Do they not then ponder on the Qur’an? If it had been from anyone other than Allah, they would have surely found in it many discrepancies.
Whenever they hear any news of security or fear, they spread it. If they referred it to the Messenger or to those in authority among them, those with sound judgment among them could know it. Were it not for Allah’s grace and mercy, you would all have followed Satan, except for a few.
So fight in the way of Allah [O Prophet]; you are accountable only for yourself. But urge the believers [to fight]; perhaps Allah will restrain the might of the disbelievers, for Allah is strongest in might and severe in punishment.
Whoever intercedes in a good cause will have a share in its reward, but whoever intercedes in an evil cause will have a share in its burden. And Allah is ever Watchful over all things.
When you are given a greeting, respond with a better greeting or return the same. Indeed, Allah is Reckoner of all things.
Allah: none has the right to be worshiped except Him. He will surely gather you all on the Day of Resurrection, about which there is no doubt. Who is more truthful in speech than Allah?
What is the matter with you, that you are divided into two groups concerning the hypocrites, when Allah has reverted them [to disbelief] because of their misdeeds? Do you want to guide those whom Allah has caused to stray? Whoever Allah causes to stray, you will never find a way [to guidance] for him.
They wish that you would disbelieve just as they have disbelieved, so that you become all alike. Therefore do not take from them allies unless they migrate for the sake of Allah. But if they turn away, seize them and kill them wherever you find them, and do not take from them any allies or helpers,
except those who join a people with whom you have a treaty or those who come to you feeling discomfort to fight you or fight their own people. If Allah had willed, He would have empowered them to fight you. Therefore if they withdraw and refrain from fighting you and offer you peace, then Allah has not given you permission [to fight] against them.
You will find others who wish to be secure from you and from their own people. Whenever they are tempted back to disbelief, they fall into it. Therefore if they do not withdraw, or offer you peace, or restrain their hands from you, then seize them and kill them wherever you find them; they are those against whom We have given you a clear authority.
It is not for a believer to kill another believer except by mistake. Whoever kills a believer by mistake must free a believing slave and pay blood money to his family, unless they waive it as an act of charity. But if the victim was a believer and belonged to people at war with you, then a believing slave must be freed. If he belonged to a people with whom you have a treaty, then blood money must be paid to his family and freeing a believing slave. Anyone who is unable must fast for two consecutive months by way of repentance to Allah. And Allah is All-Knowing, All-Wise.
But anyone who kills a believer deliberately, his punishment will be Hell, abiding therein forever; Allah will be displeased with him, and will curse him, and will prepare for him a massive punishment.
O you who believe, when you go to fight in the way of Allah, make sure [who you fight]; and do not say to someone who offers you the greetings of peace, “You are not a believer” – seeking gains of the life of this world, while Allah has abundant gains. You were in the same position before, then Allah blessed you [with Islam]. Therefore make sure, for Allah is All-Aware of what you do.
Not equal are those believers who stay behind – except those forced by necessity – and those who fight in the way of Allah with their wealth and their lives. Allah has given a higher rank to those who fight with their wealth and their lives than those who stay behind. To each Allah has promised a fine reward, but Allah has favored those who fight over those who stay behind with a great reward,
high ranks from Him, and forgiveness and mercy. For Allah is All-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
When the angels take the souls of those who have wronged themselves, they will say, “What was the matter with you?” They will say, “We were oppressed in the land.” They will say, “Was not Allah’s earth spacious enough for you to migrate?” They are those whose refuge will be Hell – what a terrible destination!
Except the helpless men, women, and children who have no means nor do they know where to go.
They are those whom Allah may pardon, for Allah is Ever- Pardoning, All-Forgiving.
Whoever emigrates for the sake of Allah will find on earth many places of refuge and abundant provision. Whoever leaves his home emigrating for the cause of Allah and His Messenger, then death overtakes him, his reward has already been secured with Allah. And Allah is All-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
When you are traveling through the land, there is no blame on you to shorten the prayer, if you fear that the disbelievers may harm you. Indeed, the disbelievers are your open enemy.
When you [O Prophet] are with them and lead them in prayer, let a group of them stand [in prayer] with you, carrying their weapons. When they have finished their prostration, let them take their positions in the rear. Then let the other group that have not yet prayed join you in prayer, keeping vigilant and carrying their arms. The disbelievers wish that you would neglect your weapons and belongings, so they could launch on you a surprise attack. But there is no blame on you if you lay down your weapons because of inconvenience of rain or because you are ill; but take all precautions. Indeed, Allah has prepared for the disbelievers a humiliating punishment.
When you have finished the prayer, remember Allah, standing, sitting, or lying down. But when you are safe again, establish regular prayer. Indeed, prayer is prescribed for the believers at specific times.
Do not weaken in pursuit of the enemy. If you are suffering harm, they too are suffering harm just like you; but you hope from Allah what they do not hope. And Allah is All-Knowing, All-Wise.
We have sent down the Book to you [O Prophet] in truth, so that you may judge between people, in accordance with what Allah has taught you. So do not be an advocate for the deceitful.
And seek forgiveness of Allah, for Allah is All-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
Do not argue on behalf of those who betray themselves, for Allah does not like the treacherous and sinful.
They seek to hide from people but they do not seek to hide from Allah, although He is with them when they devise plans to say things that are displeasing to Him. Indeed, Allah encompasses all what they do.
Here you are, you are those who argue on their behalf in the life of this world, but who will argue on their behalf before Allah on the Day of Resurrection, or who will be their defender?
Whoever commits evil or wrongs himself, then seeks Allah’s forgiveness will find Allah All-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
And whoever commits a sin, he only commits it against himself. And Allah is All-Knowing, All-Wise.
But whoever commits an offense or a sin, then blames it on an innocent person, will surely bear the guilt of slander and flagrant sin.
Were it not for Allah’s grace and mercy upon you [O Prophet], a group of them would have tried to mislead you, but they only mislead themselves, nor can they harm you in the least. For Allah has sent down to you the Book and Wisdom [Sunnah] and has taught you what you did not know. And the grace of Allah upon you is always great.
There is no good in much of their private talks, except for one who enjoins charity, kindness, or reconciliation between people. Anyone who does that, seeking Allah’s pleasure, We will give him a great reward.
But whoever opposes the Messenger after guidance has become clear to him, and follows other than the way of the believers, We will leave him to what he has chosen, and burn him in Hell. What a terrible destination!
Allah does not forgive associating partners with Him, but forgives other than that to whom He wills; whoever associates partners with Allah has certainly gone far astray.
They call upon none besides Him except female [idols]; they call upon none but a rebellious Satan
whom Allah cursed, who said, “I will surely take hold of a designated portion of Your slaves.
And I will surely mislead them and arouse in them false hopes, and will order them to slit the ears of livestock, and will order them to change Allah’s creation.” Whoever takes Satan as a protector instead of Allah has surely suffered a manifest loss.
[Satan] makes promises to them and arouses in them false hopes; but Satan makes no promises to them except delusion.
It is they whose abode will be Hell, and they will find no escape from it.
But those who believe and do righteous deeds, We will admit them into gardens under which rivers flow, abiding therein forever. Allah’s promise is true. Who is more truthful than Allah in speech?
It is not your wishful thinking or the wishful thinking of the People of the Book that matters; whoever does evil will be recompensed for it, and he will not find besides Allah any protector or helper.
Whoever does righteous deeds, whether male or female, and is a believer, it is they who will enter Paradise, and they will not be wronged even as much as the speck on a date stone.
Who is better in religion than one who submits himself entirely to Allah, does good, and follows the religion of Abraham, exclusively devoted to Allah? For Allah did take Abraham as a close friend.
To Allah belongs all that is in the heavens and all that is on earth. Indeed, Allah encompasses all things.
They ask you [O Prophet] concerning women. Say, “It is Allah Who gives you a ruling concerning them. It has been recited to you in the Book concerning orphan girls whom you deprive of their prescribed rights [of dowry and inheritance], yet you desire to marry them, and concerning helpless children, and that you should treat orphans with justice. Whatever good you do, Allah is All-Knowing of it.”
If a woman fears ill treatment or indifference on her husband’s part, there is no blame on them to reach an amicable reconciliation between themselves, for reconciliation is best, even though human souls are prone to avarice. If you do good and fear Allah, Allah is All-Aware of what you do.
You will never be able to maintain absolute justice between your wives, no matter how keen you are. So do not completely incline to one leaving the other in suspense. If you do what is right and fear Allah, Allah is surely All-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
But if they choose to separate, Allah will compensate both out of His abundance, for Allah is All-Bountiful, All-Wise.
To Allah belongs all that is in the heavens and all that is on earth. We have ordered those who were given the Scripture before you, as well as yourselves, to fear Allah. But if you disbelieve, then to Allah belongs all that is in the heavens and on earth, and Allah is Self-Sufficient, Praiseworthy.
To Allah belongs all that is in the heavens and all that is on earth, and Allah is sufficient as a Trustee of Affairs.
If He wills, He can eliminate you altogether, O humans, and replace you with others, for Allah is Most Capable to do that.
Whoever seeks the reward of this world, then with Allah is the reward of this world and of the Hereafter, and Allah is All-Hearing, All-Seeing.
O you who believe, stand up for justice as witnesses for Allah, even against yourselves or parents and relatives. Whether one is rich or poor, Allah takes best care of both. So do not let your desires to cause you swerve from justice. If you distort your testimony or refuse to give it, then Allah is indeed All-Aware of what you do.
O you who believe, believe in Allah, His Messenger, the Book which He has sent down to His Messenger, and the Books which He sent down before. Whoever disbelieves in Allah, His angels, His Books, His messengers, and the Last Day has indeed gone far astray.
Those who believe then disbelieve, then believe and then again disbelieve, then increase in disbelief – Allah will never forgive them, nor will He guide them to a [straight] way.
Give tidings to the hypocrites, that for them there will be a painful punishment,
those who take disbelievers as allies instead of the believers. Are they seeking power through them? Indeed, all power belongs to Allah.
He has already sent down to you in the Book that when you hear Allah’s verses being rejected or ridiculed, do not sit with them until they engage in another discourse, or else you would be like them. Indeed, Allah will gather all the hypocrites and disbelievers together in Hell.
[These hypocrites are] those who are waiting and watching to see what happens to you. If Allah grants you victory, they say, “Were we not with you?” But if the disbelievers have some partial [victory], they say, “Did we not take care of you and protect you from the believers?” But Allah will judge between you on the Day of Resurrection, and Allah will never give the disbelievers a way over the believers.
The hypocrites seek to deceive Allah, but it is He Who deceives them. Whenever they stand up for prayer, they stand up reluctantly, only to be seen by people, and they do not remember Allah but a little,
wavering in between, neither belonging to these [believers], nor to those [disbelievers]. Whomsoever Allah causes to stray, you will never find a way [to guidance] for him.
O you who believe, do not take the disbelievers as allies instead of the believers. Do you want to give Allah a clear proof against yourselves?
Indeed, the hypocrites will be in the lowest depths of the Fire, and you will never find for them any helper,
except those who repent and mend their ways, hold fast to Allah and devote their religion sincerely to Allah; it is they who will be with the believers, and Allah will give the believers a great reward.
Why would Allah punish you, if you are grateful and faithful? Allah is ever Appreciative, All-Knowing.
Allah does not like offensive words to be said in public except by one who has been wronged. Allah is All-Hearing, All-Knowing.
If you do something good openly or in secret, or pardon an offense, then Allah is indeed Ever-Pardoning, Most Capable.
Those who disbelieve in Allah and His messengers, and wish to make a distinction between Allah and His messengers, and they say, “We believe in some and disbelieve in others,” wishing to adopt a way in between.
It is they who are true disbelievers, and We have prepared for the disbelievers a humiliating punishment.
But those who believe in Allah and His messengers, and make no distinction between any of them, they will be given their rewards. For Allah is All-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
The People of the Book ask you to bring down upon them a Book from the heaven. They had asked Moses even greater than that when they said, “Show us Allah openly.” But they were struck with a thunderbolt for their transgression. Then they took the calf for worship after receiving clear signs, yet We pardoned them, and We gave Moses a compelling proof.
And We raised above them the Mount [to remind them] of their covenant, and We said to them, “Enter the gate [of Jerusalem] lowering your heads”, and said to them: “Do not break the Sabbath”, and We took from them a solemn covenant.
[They were cursed] for breaking their covenant, rejecting the signs of Allah, killing the prophets unjustly, and for their saying, “Our hearts are wrapped up”. Rather, it is Allah Who has sealed them for their disbelief; so none of them will believe except a few –
and for their disbelief and for their monstrous allegation against Mary,
and for their saying, “We killed the Messiah, Jesus, son of Mary, the messenger of Allah.” But they did not kill him nor did they crucify him, but it was made to appear to them so. Even those who dispute about it are in doubt; they have no certain knowledge other than conjecture. But they certainly did not kill him.
Rather, Allah raised him up to Himself, and Allah is All-Mighty, All-Wise.
There will be none from the People of the Book but will believe in him [upon his return] before his death; and on the Day of Resurrection he will be a witness against them.
For the wrongdoing of the Jews, We prohibited for them good things that were lawful for them; and for their frequent hindering many from the way of Allah,
and for their taking usury, although it was forbidden to them, and for unjustly consuming people’s wealth. We have prepared for the disbelievers among them a painful punishment.
But those well-grounded in knowledge among them and the believers believe in what has been sent down to you [O Prophet], and what was sent down before you; who establish prayer and give zakah, and believe in Allah and the Last Day – it is they who We will give a great reward.
We have sent revelation to you [O Prophet] just as We revealed to Noah and the prophets after him. We also sent revelation to Abraham, Ishmael, Isaac, Jacob and his descendants, and to Jesus, Job, Jonah, Aaron, and Solomon, and We gave David the Psalms.
There are messengers whose stories We have already mentioned to you, and messengers We have not mentioned to you. And Allah spoke to Moses directly.
These messengers were sent as bearers of glad tidings and as warners, so that the people may have no excuse before Allah after [the coming of] the messengers. For Allah is All-Mighty, All-Wise.
But Allah bears witness to what He has sent down to you, as He has sent it down with His knowledge, and the angels bear witness; but sufficient is Allah as a Witness.
Those who disbelieve and prevent others from the way of Allah have gone far astray.
Those who disbelieve and do wrong, Allah will not forgive them nor will He guide them to a way
except the way of Hell, abiding therein forever. And that is easy for Allah.
O mankind, the Messenger has come to you with the truth from your Lord, so believe; it is better for you. But if you disbelieve, then to Allah belongs all that is in the heavens and earth, and Allah is All-Knowing, All-Wise.
O People of the Book, do not go to extremes in your religion, and do not say about Allah but the truth. The Messiah, Jesus, son of Mary, was only a messenger of Allah, and His Word that He bestowed upon Mary, and a spirit from Him. So believe in Allah and His messengers and do not say “Three” [Trinity]. Cease; that is better for you. Indeed, Allah is the only One God. Glory be to Him, [far exalted is He] to have a son. To Him belongs all that is in the heavens and all that is on earth, and sufficient is Allah as a Disposer of Affairs.
The Messiah would never disdain to be a slave of Allah, nor would the nearest angels to Him. Those who disdain to worship Him and are arrogant, He will gather them all together before Him.
As for those who believe and do righteous deeds, He will give them their rewards in full and will increase them out of His bounty. But those who disdain and act arrogantly, He will subject them to a painful punishment, and they will not find for themselves any protector or helper besides Allah.
O mankind, there has come to you conclusive evidence from your Lord, and We have sent down to you a clear light.
As for those who believe in Allah and hold fast to Him, He will admit them into His mercy and grace, and guide them to Himself through a straight path.
They ask you for a ruling. Say, “Allah gives you a ruling concerning the one leaving neither descendant nor ascendant as heir. If he dies leaving no child but a sister, she will get one half of the inheritance. Likewise, he will inherit her if she dies leaving behind no descendant. If they are two sisters, they will share two thirds of the inheritance. Should there be both male and female siblings, then the share of a male is equal to that of two females.” Allah explains it clearly so that you do not fall into error. And Allah is All-Knowing of everything.
O you who believe, fulfill your covenants. Lawful to you are all grazing livestock, except what is recited to you, as well as hunting while you are in the state of pilgrimage. Allah ordains what He wills.
O you who believe, do not violate the sanctity of the rituals of Allah, nor of the sacred month, nor the sacrificial animals, nor the garlands, nor those [pilgrims] proceeding to the Sacred House seeking their Lord’s grace and pleasure. When your pilgrimage has ended, you may hunt. However, do not let the hatred of a people who barred you from the Sacred Mosque lead you to transgress. Cooperate with one another in goodness and righteousness, and do not cooperate in sin and transgression. And fear Allah, for Allah is severe in punishment.
Forbidden to you are carrion, blood, the flesh of swine, and that which is sacrificed to other than Allah; and that which is killed by strangling, or by a violent blow, or by a headlong fall, or by being gored; and that which is partly eaten by a predator unless you slaughter it [before it dies]; and that which is sacrificed to idols. Also it is forbidden to use arrows [of chance] to determine your decisions. This is all evil practice. Today the disbelievers have lost all hope in [eliminating] your religion, so do not fear them but fear Me. Today I have perfected your religion for you, completed My favor upon you, and have chosen Islam as your religion. But if anyone is compelled by severe hunger, not intending to sin, then Allah is All-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
They ask you [O Prophet] what is lawful to them. Say, “All good things are lawful for you, and that which is caught by your trained hunting animals and birds of prey, training them as Allah has taught you. Eat what they catch for you, but mention the name of Allah upon it.” And fear Allah, for Allah is swift in reckoning.
Today all good things have been made lawful to you. As the food of the people of the Book is lawful to you, and your food is lawful to them. And [it is lawful to marry] chaste believing women and chaste women from among those who were given the Book before you, provided that you give them their dowries in honest wedlock, neither fornicating nor taking them as secret lovers. Whoever rejects the faith, all his efforts will be worthless and in the Hereafter he will be among the losers.
O you who believe, when you rise up for prayer, wash your faces, and your hands up to the elbows; wipe over your heads; and wash your feet up to the ankles. If you are in a state of major impurity, cleanse yourselves [by taking a bath]. But if you are ill, on a journey, or have relieved yourselves, or had sexual contact with women and find no water, then purify yourselves with clean earth, and wipe your faces and hands therewith. Allah does not want to impose hardship on you, rather He wants to purify you and complete His favor upon you, so that you may be grateful.
Remember Allah’s favor upon you, and His covenant that He made with you when you said, “We hear and obey.” And fear Allah, for Allah is All-Knowing of what is in the hearts.
O you who believe, stand firm for Allah by bearing true testimony, and do not let the hatred of a people lead you away from justice. Be just; that is closer to righteousness. And fear Allah, for Allah is All-Aware of what you do.
Allah has promised those who believe and do righteous deeds that they will have forgiveness and a great reward.
But those who disbelieve and reject Our verses, they are the people of the Blazing Fire.
O you who believe, remember Allah’s favor upon you when some people planned to stretch their hands against you, but He held their hands back from you. And fear Allah, and in Allah let the believers put their trust.
Allah took a covenant from the Children of Israel and appointed twelve chiefs from among them. Allah said, “I am with you. If you establish prayer, give zakah, believe in My messengers and support them, and give Allah a goodly loan, I will surely forgive your sins and admit you into gardens under which rivers flow. But whoever of you disbelieves after this has truly strayed from the straight path.”
As a result of their breaking of the covenant We cursed them and made their hearts grow hard. They distort words [of the Scripture] from their context, and forgot parts of what was enjoined upon them. You will not cease to discover betrayal on their part except for a few. So pardon them and overlook, for Allah loves those who do good.
And from among those who say, “We are Christians,” We took a covenant from them, but they forgot a part of what was enjoined upon them. So We induced hostility and hatred among them until the Day of Resurrection, and Allah will inform them of what they used to do.
O People of the Book, there has come to you Our Messenger, revealing to you much of what you have been concealing of the Scripture, and overlooking much. There has surely come to you from Allah a light and a clear Book,
through which Allah guides those who seek His pleasure to the ways of peace, and brings them out of the depths of darkness to the light by His Will, and guides them to a straight path.
Those who say, “Allah is the Messiah, son of Mary,” have certainly disbelieved. Say, “Who has the power to prevent Allah, if He chose to destroy the Messiah, son of Mary, his mother, and all those who are on earth?” To Allah belongs the dominion of the heavens and earth and everything between them. He creates what He wills, and Allah is Most Capable of all things.
The Jews and Christians say, “We are Allah’s children and His beloved ones.” Say, “Why then does He punish you for your sins? Rather, you are humans just like anyone else He created. He forgives whom He wills and punishes whom He wills.” To Allah belongs the dominion of the heavens and earth and all that is between them, and to Him is the final return.”
O People of the Book, there has come to you Our Messenger, making things clear to you, after an interval between the messengers, so you do not say, “No bearer of glad tidings or a warner has ever come to us.” Now there has come to you a bearer of glad tidings and a warner. And Allah is Most Capable of all things.
And [remember] when Moses said to his people, “O my people, remember the favor of Allah upon you when He appointed prophets from among you, made you sovereign, and gave you what He had not given any other people in the world.
O my people, enter the Holy Land which Allah has ordained for you, and do not turn back or else you will return as losers.”
They said, “O Moses, there is an extremely mighty people in this land; we will never enter it until they leave it. Then if they leave, only then we will enter.”
Two men who feared Allah, and who had been favored by Allah said, “Enter upon them through the gate! Once you enter it, you will surely be victorious. And put your trust in Allah if you are believers.”
They said, “O Moses, we will never enter it as long as they are there. Go, you and your Lord, and fight; we are staying right here!”
He said, “O my Lord, I have no control over anyone except myself and my brother, so separate us from these rebellious people.”
[Allah] said, “Then this land will be forbidden to them for forty years, while they will be straying through the land. Therefore, do not grieve over the rebellious people.”
Relate to them the story of the two sons of Adam in truth, when both offered a sacrifice; it was accepted from one [Abel] but not accepted from the other [Cain]. The latter said, “I will kill you.” The former said, “Allah only accepts from those who fear Him.
Even if you stretch your hand forward to kill me, I will not stretch my hand forward to kill you, for I fear Allah, the Lord of the worlds.
I would rather let you bear your sin against me and your own sin, and thus you will be one of the people of the Fire; such is the recompense of the wrongdoers.”
But the former justified to himself the killing of his brother and killed him, and thus became one of the losers.
Then Allah sent a crow scratching the ground to show him how to bury the corpse of his brother. He said, “Woe to me! Have I failed even to be like this crow to bury the corpse of my brother?” And he became one of the remorseful.
For this reason We ordained for the Children of Israel that whoever kills a person – unless in retribution for murder or corruption in the land – it is as if he killed all mankind; and whoever saves a life, it is as if he saved the life of all mankind. Our messengers came to them with clear signs, yet many of them continued to exceed the limits afterwards in the land.
The penalty for those who wage war against Allah and His Messenger, and spread corruption in the land, is that they should be executed, or crucified, or their hands and feet amputated on opposite sides, or banished from the land. This is a disgrace for them in this world, and for them in the Hereafter, there will be a massive punishment.
Except those who repent before you seize them; in that case, know that Allah is All-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
O you who believe, fear Allah and seek the means of nearness to Him, and struggle in His way, so that you may succeed.
As for those who disbelieved, even if they were to possess everything on earth and the like of it to ransom themselves from the punishment of the Day of Resurrection, it would not be accepted from them, and for them there will be a painful punishment.
They will wish to get out of the Fire, but they will never get out of it, and for them there will be an everlasting punishment.
As for the thief, male or female, amputate their hands as a deterrent punishment from Allah for what they have done. Allah is All-Mighty, All-Wise.
But whoever repents after having committed wrong and mends his way, Allah will accept his repentance, for Allah is All-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
Do you not know that the dominion of the heavens and earth belongs to Allah? He punishes whom He wills and forgives whom He wills, and Allah is Most Capable of all things.
O Messenger, do not grieve for those who rush to disbelief – those who say with their mouths, “We believe”, but their hearts have no faith, nor those Jews who eagerly listen to falsehood and to those who have not yet come to you. They distort the words [of Allah] out of their context saying, “If you are given this [ruling] accept it, but if you are not given, then beware.” Whoever Allah wills to be misguided, there is nothing you can do to avail him against Allah. They are those whose hearts Allah did not will to purify. For them there is disgrace in this world, and in the Hereafter they will suffer a massive punishment.
They eagerly listen to lies and consume unlawful gains. If they come to you [O Prophet], either judge between them or turn away from them. If you turn away from them, they cannot harm you in the least. But if you judge, then judge between them with justice, for Allah loves those who are just.
But how is it that they seek your judgment when they have the Torah which contains Allah’s judgment, and they still turn away? Such people are not believers.
We sent down the Torah which contains guidance and light; the prophets who submitted themselves to Allah were judging by it for the Jews, and so did the rabbis and scholars because they were entrusted to protect the Scripture of Allah, and they were witnesses to it. So do not fear people but fear Me, and do not trade My verses for a small price. Whoever does not judge according to what Allah has revealed, it is they who are the disbelievers.
We ordained for them therein, “A life for a life, an eye for an eye, a nose for a nose, an ear for an ear, a tooth for a tooth, and for wounds equal retaliation.” But if anyone waives it charitably, then it will be an expiation for him. Whoever does not judge according to what Allah has revealed, it is they who are the wrongdoers.
And in their footsteps We sent Jesus, son of Mary, confirming the Torah that came before him, and We gave him the Gospel that contained guidance and light, confirming what came before it in the Torah; a guidance and admonition for the righteous.
Let the people of the Gospel judge according to what Allah has revealed therein. Whoever does not judge according to what Allah has revealed, it is they who are the rebellious.
We have revealed to you [O Prophet] the Book in truth, confirming the scriptures that came before it and as a criterion over them. So judge between them according to what Allah has revealed, and do not follow their desires in disregard of the truth that has come to you. To each of you We have ordained a law and a way of life. If Allah had willed, He would have made you a single community, but He tests you in what He has given you. So compete with one another in doing good deeds. To Allah you will all return, then He will inform you concerning things over which you used to differ.
And judge between them [O Prophet] according to what Allah has revealed, and do not follow their desires. And beware of them, lest they entice you away from some of what Allah has sent down to you. If they turn away, then know that it is Allah’s will to punish them for some of their sins, and many people are indeed rebellious.
Do they seek the judgment of the times of ignorance? Who could be better than Allah in judgment for people who are certain in faith?
O you who believe, do not take the Jews and Christians as allies; they are allies of one another. Whoever among you takes them as allies is indeed one of them. Allah does not guide the wrongdoing people.
You see those with sickness in their hearts rushing to them, saying, “We fear a misfortune may strike us.” Perhaps Allah will bring about victory or some other decision from Himself, then they will regret for what they kept hidden in their hearts.
And those who believe say, “Are these the people who swore their solemn oaths by Allah that they were with you?” Their deeds have become worthless, and they have become losers.
O you who believe, Whoever among you renounces his faith, Allah will bring a people whom He loves and who love Him. They will be humble towards the believers but strict towards the disbelievers, striving in the way of Allah and fearing no reproach from any critic. This is Allah’s favor which He gives to whom He wills. And Allah is All-Bountiful, All-Knowing.
Your only allies are Allah, His Messenger, and those believers who establish prayer and give zakah with humble submission.
Whoever takes Allah, His Messenger, and the believers as their allies, then it is the party of Allah that will certainly prevail.
O you who believe, do not take as allies those who were given the Scripture before you and the disbelievers who ridicule your religion and make fun of it. And fear Allah if you are believers.
When you give the call to prayer, they ridicule it and make fun of it; that is because they are a people who have no understanding.
Say, “O People of the Book, do you resent us only because we believe in Allah and what has been sent down to us and what was sent down before, and that most of you are rebellious?”
Say, “Shall I inform you of those who deserve a worse punishment from Allah? Those who have been cursed by Allah and incurred His wrath, and He turned them into monkeys and pigs, and devil worshipers. Such are far worse in position and farther astray from the straight path.”
When they come to you [believers] they say, “We believe”, but in fact they are committed to disbelief both prior to their coming and after their leaving, and Allah knows best what they conceal.
You see many of them rushing into sin and transgression, and consuming unlawful earnings. Terrible indeed is what they do!
Why is it that their rabbis and scholars do not forbid them from saying words of sin and consuming unlawful earnings? Terrible indeed is what they commit!
The Jews say, “Allah’s hand is restrained.” Their hands have been restrained and they have been cursed for what they say. Rather, His both hands are wide open, spending as He pleases. What has been sent down to you from your Lord will surely increase many of them in transgression and disbelief. We have cast among them animosity and hatred until the Day of Resurrection. Every time they kindle the fire of war, Allah extinguishes it. They strive to spread corruption in the land, and Allah does not like those who spread corruption.
Had the People of the Book believed and feared Allah, We would have surely expiated their sins from them and admitted them to Gardens of Pleasure.
If they had upheld the Torah and the Gospel, and what has been sent down to them from their Lord, they would have been given abundant provisions from above them and from below their feet. Among them are some who are on the right way, but most of them do evil deeds.
O Messenger, convey what has been sent down to you from your Lord. If you do not do that, then you have not conveyed His message. Allah will protect you from the people. Allah does not guide the disbelieving people.
Say, “O People of the Book, you have nothing to stand on unless you observe the Torah and the Gospel and what has been sent down to you from your Lord.” Your Lord’s revelation to you [O Prophet] will only increase them in transgression and disbelief. So do not grieve over the disbelieving people.
The believers, and those who are Jews, and the Sabians and Christians [before Muhammad] – those of them who believed in Allah and the Last Day and did righteous deeds, they will have no fear, nor will they grieve.
We took the covenant from the Children of Israel and sent them messengers. Every time there came to them a messenger with something that did not suit their desires, they denied some of them and murdered others.
They thought that there would be no consequences, so they became blind and deaf [to the truth]. Then Allah forgave them, but again many of them became blind and deaf. And Allah is All-Seeing of what they do.
They have certainly disbelieved, those who say, “Allah is the Messiah, son of Mary.” But the Messiah said, “O Children of Israel, worship Allah, my Lord and your Lord.” Whoever associates any partners with Allah, Allah has forbidden Paradise for him, and his abode will be the Fire. And the wrongdoers will have no helpers.
They have certainly disbelieved, those who say, “Allah is one of Three.” None has the right to be worshiped except One God. If they do not desist from saying this, those who disbelieve from among them will be afflicted with a painful punishment.
Why do they not turn to Allah in repentance and seek His forgiveness? For Allah is All-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
The Messiah, son of Mary, was no more than a messenger. There were messengers who passed away before him, and His mother was a woman of truth; they both ate food. See how We make Our signs clear to them, yet see how they are deluded!
Say, “Do you worship besides Allah that which can neither harm nor benefit you?! And Allah is the All-Hearing, All-Knowing.”
Say, “O People of the Book, do not exceed the limits of the truth in your religion, nor follow the desires of people who went astray before, and misled many and themselves strayed from the straight path.”
Those who disbelieved from the Children of Israel were cursed on the tongue of David and Jesus son of Mary. That was because of their disobedience and their persistence in transgression.
They did not forbid one another from committing evil deeds. Terrible was indeed what they used to do!
You see many of them taking those who disbelieve as allies. Terrible was indeed what they have done for themselves, for they have incurred Allah’s wrath and they will abide in the punishment forever.
If they had believed in Allah and the Prophet, and what has been sent down to him, they would not have taken them as allies, but most of them are evildoers.






































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































After his death, We did not send down any soldiers from the heaven against his people, nor did We have to do so.
It was no more than a single blast, and immediately they were extinguished.
Alas for the humans! No messenger ever comes to them but they ridicule him.
Do they not see how many generations We destroyed before them who will never come back to them?
Yet all of them will be brought before Us.
There is a sign for them in the dead land: We give it life and produce from it grain for them to eat.
And We have made therein gardens of palm trees and grapevines, and caused springs to gush forth,
so that they may eat of its fruit that was not made by their hands. Will they not then give thanks?
Glory be to the One Who created all types of things that the earth produces, and of themselves, and of things that they have no knowledge about.
There is another sign for them in the night: We strip from it the daylight, and they are left in darkness.
The sun is running to its determined course. That is the design of the All-Mighty, All-Knowing.
As for the moon, We have determined phases for it, until it becomes like an old palm stalk.
It is not for the sun to catch up with the moon, nor for the night to outstrip the day. Each is floating in its own orbit.
Another sign for them is that We carried their offspring in the loaded Ark,
and We created for them similar things on which they ride.
If We willed, We could drown them, then there would be no one to respond to their cry, nor could they be rescued,
except by a mercy from Us, leaving them to enjoy for a while.
When it is said to them, “Beware of what is ahead of you and what is behind you, so that you may be shown mercy.”
No sign ever comes to them from their Lord except that they turn away from it.
And when it is said to them, “Spend of what Allah has provided you with”, the disbelievers say to the believers, “Should we feed those whom Allah could feed if He willed? You are clearly misguided!”
They say, “When will this promise come to pass, if you are truthful?”
They are not awaiting but a single Blast that will seize them while they are still disputing.
Then they will not be able to make a will, nor will they be able to return to their households.
The Trumpet will be blown [again], and at once they will rush from their graves to their Lord.
They will say, “Woe to us! Who has resurrected us from our resting place?” [They will be told,] “This is what the Most Compassionate promised, and the messengers told the truth.”
It will only be a single Blast, and at once they will all be brought before Us.
On that Day no soul will be wronged in the least, nor will you be recompensed except for what you used to do.
Indeed, on that Day the people of Paradise will be busy enjoying themselves,
they and their spouses will be reclining on couches in the shade.
They will have therein fruits and all what they ask for.
“Peace”: a word from the Most Merciful Lord.
“Stand apart [from the believers] this Day, O wicked ones!
Did I not command you, O children of Adam, not to worship Satan, for he is your sworn enemy,
but to worship Me? This is a straight path.
He led great numbers of you astray. Did you not then have sense?
This is the Hell that you were promised.
Burn in it Today for your disbelief.”
Today We will seal up their mouths, and their hands will speak to Us, and their feet will testify to all what they used to do.
If We willed, We could have taken away their sight, so they would rush to find their way, but then how could they see?
And if We willed, We could have paralyzed them in their places, so they could neither move forward nor backward.
Whomsoever We give a long life, We cause his strength to decline. Do they not then understand?
We have not taught him poetry, nor is it fitting for him. This is only a Reminder and a clear Qur’an
so that he may warn those who are truly alive and establish the argument against the disbelievers.
Do they not see that We have created for them livestock made by Our Hands, and then they are their owners?
And We have made them subservient to them, so they ride some and eat some,
and there are other benefits and drinks therein for them. Will they not then give thanks?
Yet they have taken other gods besides Allah, hoping that they may be helped.
They cannot help them, yet they serve them as their dedicated guards.
Do not let their words grieve you. Surely We know what they conceal and what they reveal.
Does man not see that We have created him from a sperm drop, then he becomes a clear adversary,
producing arguments against Us while forgetting his own creation. He says, “Who can give life to the bones after they have crumbled to dust?”
Say, “The One Who created them in the first place will give life to them, for He has full knowledge of every created being;
the One Who produces fire for you out of the green tree, with which you kindle your fires.”
Is not the One Who created the heavens and earth able to create the like of these [people]? Yes indeed, for He is the Creator of all, the All-Knowing.
Whenever He wills something to be, He only says to it, “Be”, and it is.
So glory be to the One in Whose Hand is the dominion of everything, and to Him you will all be brought back.
By those [angels] lined up in rows,
and those who drive [the clouds],
and those who recite Allah’s words,
indeed, your God is One,
Lord of the heavens and earth and all that is between them, and Lord of the points of sunrise.
We have adorned the sky with the beauty of the stars,
and for safeguarding it against every rebellious devil,
so that they cannot eavesdrop on the highest assembly [of angels] and are pelted from every side
to repel them; and for them there will be a perpetual punishment,
except who stealthily snatches away some words, he will be pursued by a piercing flame.
So ask them, “Are they more difficult to create or other things We created? We created them from sticky clay.
Rather you are astonished, while they ridicule it,
and when they are reminded, they pay no heed,
and when they see a sign, they ridicule it,
and they say, “This is nothing but clear magic.
Is it that when we are dead and become dust and bones, will we really be raised up again,
and our forefathers too?”
Say, “Yes, and you will be disgraced.”
It will only be a single Blast, and at once they will be looking around.
They will say, “Woe to us! This is the Day of Judgment!”
[They will be told], “This is the Day of Decision that you used to deny.”
[The angels will be told], “Gather all those who did wrong and their fellows, and whatever they used to worship
besides Allah, and lead them to the way of Hell,
and stop them, for they are to be questioned.”
[They will be asked], “What is the matter with you, that you no longer help one another?”
Rather on that Day they will surrender completely.
They will turn to one another, reproaching one another.
[The followers] will say, “It was you who used to delude us from the right way.”
[The misleaders] will say, “Rather, you yourselves were not believers,
and We had no power over you, rather you yourselves were a transgressing people.
Now the punishment of our Lord has come true against us; we will surely taste it.
We did misguide you, for we ourselves were misguided”.
On that Day they will all share in the punishment.
This is how We deal with the wicked,
for whenever it was said to them, “None has the right to be worshiped except Allah,” they became arrogant,
and said, “Are we going to abandon our gods for a mad poet?”
Rather, he came with the truth and confirmed the messengers.
You will surely taste the painful punishment,
and you will only be recompensed for what you used to do,
except the chosen slaves of Allah.
They will have a known provision,
variety of fruits; and they will be honored
in gardens of bliss,
facing one another on couches.
They will be served with a cup of wine from a flowing stream,
white and delicious for those who drink.
It will cause no harm, nor will they be intoxicated by it,
and with them will be maidens of modest gaze and beautiful eyes,
as if they were well-protected eggs.
Then they will turn to one another asking.
One of them will say, “I had a close friend [in the world]
who used to say, ‘Are you one of those who believe
that when we die and become dust and bones, shall we be brought for judgment?’”
He will say, “Do you wish to see [his fate]?”
So he will look down and see him in the midst of the Blazing Fire.
He will say, “By Allah, you were about to ruin me.
Were it not for the grace of my Lord, I would have been among those who are brought [to Hell].”
[He will say to his fellow believers], “Are we not going to die anymore,
except our first death, nor are we going to be punished ?”
This is indeed the great triumph!
For such [reward] let the workers work.
Is this a better accommodation or the tree of Zaqqūm?
We have made it a trial for the wrongdoers.
It is a tree that grows in the bottom of Blazing Fire;
its fruits are like heads of devils.
They will certainly eat from it, filling their bellies.
Then on top of that they will be given a mixture of scalding water,
then their final return will be to the Blazing Fire.
For they found their forefathers astray,
so they rushed to follow in their footsteps.
Indeed, most of the earlier people went astray before them,
even though We sent among them warners.
Then see how was the end of those who were warned,
except the chosen slaves of Allah.
Indeed, Noah called upon Us; how excellent are We at responding!
And We saved him and his household from the great distress,
and made his offspring the only survivors,
and We left for him [a favorable mention] among later generations:
“Peace be upon Noah among all the nations.”
This is how We reward those who do good.
He was one of Our believing slaves.
Then we drowned the others.
Indeed, Abraham was one of those who followed his way.
When he came to his Lord with a sound heart,
and said to his father and his people, “What are these that you worship?
Is it false gods that you seek other than Allah?
Then what do you think of the Lord of the worlds?”
He then cast a glance at the stars,
and said, “I am sick.”
So they went away from him and left.
Then he turned to their gods and said, “Will you not eat?
What is wrong with you that you do not speak?”
Then he turned upon them, striking them with his right hand.
Then his people came rushing towards him.
He said, “Do you worship what you yourselves carve,
when it is Allah Who created you and all what you do?”
They said, “Build a pyre for him and throw him into the blazing fire.”
They contrived a plan against him, but We made them the lowest.
He said, “I am going to my Lord; He will guide me.
My Lord, grant me righteous offspring.”
So We gave him glad tidings of a forbearing boy.
Then when he reached the age where he could work with him, Abraham said, “O my dear son, I have seen in a dream that I must sacrifice you. What you think?” He said, “O my dear father, do as you are commanded. You will find me, if Allah wills, one of the steadfast.”
When they both submitted [to Allah’s command] and Abraham laid him on his forehead,
and We called out to him, “O Abraham,
You have fulfilled the dream.” This is how We reward those who do good.
This was indeed a revealing test.
And We ransomed him with a great sacrifice,
and We left for him [a favorable mention] among later generations:
“Peace be upon Abraham.”
This is how We reward those who do good.
He was one of Our believing slaves.
And We gave him the glad tidings of Isaac, a prophet, and one of the righteous.
We blessed him and Isaac, but among their offspring were some who did good and some clearly wronged themselves.
Indeed, We bestowed Our favor upon Moses and Aaron,
and We saved them and their people from the great distress,
and We helped them, so they were the victorious,
and We gave them both the clear Scripture,
and guided them to the straight path;
and We left for them [a favorable mention] among later generations:
“Peace be upon Moses and Aaron.”
This is how We reward those who do good.
Indeed, they were among Our believing slaves.
Indeed, Elijah was one of the Messengers.
When he said to his people: “Do you not fear Allah?
Do you call upon Ba‘l and ignore the Best of the Creators,
Allah, your Lord and the Lord of your forefathers?”
But they rejected him, so they will surely be brought [for punishment],
except the chosen salves of Allah.
And We left for him [a favorable mention] among later generations:
“Peace be upon Elias.”
This is how We reward those who do good.
He was one of Our believing slaves.
Indeed, Lot was one of the messengers.
When We saved him and all of his household,
except an old woman who was among those who stayed behind.
Then We destroyed the rest.
You [Makkans] pass by their ruins by day
and by night. Do you still not understand?
Indeed, Jonah was one of the messengers.
When he fled to the fully-laden ship,
then he cast lots with them, but was among those who lost.
The whale then swallowed him while he was blameworthy.
Were it not for the fact that he was one of those who glorify Allah,
he would have stayed in its belly until the Day of Resurrection.
But We cast him ashore on a barren land while he was ill,
and caused a gourd vine to grow over him.
We sent him to one hundred thousand people or more,
and they believed, so We let them enjoy for a while.
So ask them, “Does your Lord have daughters while they have sons?”
Or did We create the angels as females while they were watching?
No indeed, it is one of their fabrications when they say,
“Allah has children,” and they are truly liars.
Did He choose daughters over sons?
What is the matter with you? How do you judge?
Will you not then take heed?
Do you have any compelling proof?
Then bring your scripture, if you are truthful.
They claim that there is kinship between Him and the jinn, when the jinn themselves know that such people will surely be brought [for punishment].
Glorified is Allah far above what they ascribe [to Him].
But not the chosen slaves of Allah.
Indeed, you and whatever you worship
none of you can lure anyone away from Him,
except those who are destined to burn in the Blazing Fire.
[The angels say], “There is none among us but has a known station:
We are indeed those who stand lined up in rows,
and we are indeed those who glorify Allah.”
And [the pagans] used to say,
“If only we had a scripture like the previous people,
we would have surely been true slaves of Allah.”
But they rejected it; soon they will come to know.
Our Word has already been given to Our slaves, the messengers,
that it is surely they who will be given victory,
and that Our soldiers will surely be the victors.
So turn away from them for a while.
Wait and see; soon they will see [their end].
Do they really seek to hasten Our punishment?
When it descends on their courtyard, how terrible will be the morning of those who were warned!
And turn away from them for a while.
Wait and see; soon they will see [their end].
Glory be to your Lord, the Lord of Might, far above what they ascribe [to Him],
and peace be upon the messengers,
and praise be to Allah, Lord of the worlds.
Sād. By the Qur’an, full of reminder,
yet those who disbelieve are in arrogance and dissension.
How many generations We destroyed before them; they cried out when it was too late for deliverance.
They wonder that a warner has come to them from among themselves, and the disbelievers say, “This is a magician and a liar!
Has he made all gods into one God? Indeed, this is something strange!”
The leaders among them departed, saying, “Carry on as you are, and stay faithful to your gods. Indeed, there is a motive behind it.
We have not heard of this in the last religion. This is nothing but a fabrication.
Has the Reminder been sent down to him from among us?” Rather, they are in doubt about My Reminder, for they have not yet tasted My punishment.
Or do they possess the treasuries of the mercy of your Lord, the All-Mighty, the Bestower?
Or do they have the dominion of the heavens and earth and all that is between them? Then let them ascend by any means.
This is only a small army among several armies that will soon be defeated.
Before them, the people of Noah, ‘Ād, and mighty Pharaoh rejected [their prophets];
and Thamūd and the people of Lot, and the dwellers of the Forest – such were the [denier] parties.
Each of them rejected their messenger, therefore My punishment became inevitable.
They are only waiting for a single Blast that cannot be stopped.
They say, “Our Lord, hasten for us our share [of punishment] before the Day of Reckoning.”
Bear with patience whatever they say, and remember Our slave David, the man of strength who constantly turned [to Allah].
We subjected the mountains to join him in glorifying Allah in the evening and the morning,
and the birds, in their flocks; they all would echo his praise.
We strengthened his kingdom, and gave him wisdom and sound judgment [and speech].
Has there come to you the story of the adversaries, when they climbed the wall of his chamber?
When they entered upon David, he was frightened. They said, “Do not be afraid. We are two adversaries: one of us has wronged the other, so judge between us with fairness, and do not be unjust, and guide us to the straight path.
This is my brother. He has ninety-nine ewes while I have only one. He said, ‘Give her into my charge,’ and overpowered me in speech.”
David said, “He has certainly wronged you by demanding that your ewe be added to his flock. Indeed, many partners oppress one another, except those who believe and do righteous deeds – and how few they are.” Then David realized that We were only testing him, so he asked his Lord for forgiveness, fell down bowing, and turned to Him in repentance.
So We forgave that for him, and he certainly has a place of nearness to Us and a good place of return.
“O David, We have made you a ruler on earth, so judge between people with justice, and do not follow your desires lest they lead you astray from Allah’s way. Those who go astray from Allah’s way will have a severe punishment because of forgetting the Day of Reckoning.”
We have not created the heavens and earth and all that is between them in vain. That is the assumption of those who disbelieve. So woe to the disbelievers from the Fire!
Should We make those who believe and do righteous deeds equal to those who spread corruption on earth? Or should We make the righteous equal to the wicked?
This is a blessed Book that We have sent down to you [O Prophet] so that they may reflect upon its verses, and so that people of understanding may take heed.
We gave David Solomon, an excellent and faithful slave who constantly turned [to Us].
One evening, well-trained and swift horses of noble breed were presented before him.
He then said, “I gave preference to the love of fine things over the remembrance of my Lord,” until the sun went out of sight.
[He ordered], “Bring them back to me,” and he began striking [their] shanks and necks.
Indeed, We tested Solomon and cast upon his throne a body, then he turned [to Allah].
He said, “My Lord, forgive me and grant me a kingdom, the like of which will never be granted to anyone after me. You are indeed the Bestower.”
So We subjected to him the wind blowing gently by his command to wherever he wished,
And [We subjected to him] the devils, all kinds of builders and divers,
and others bound in chains.
[We said], “This is Our gift, so give freely or withhold, without account.”
And he certainly has a status of nearness to Us and a good place of return.
And remember Our slave Job, when he cried out to his Lord, “Indeed, Satan has afflicted me with hardship and pain.”
[Allah said], “Stamp [the ground] with your foot: here is a cool spring for bathing and drinking.”
And We restored his family to him and the like of them as a mercy from Us and as a reminder for people of understanding.
[We said], “Take a bunch of grass in your hand, and strike [your wife] with it, and do not break your oath.” We truly found him patient – an excellent and faithful slave he was. He constantly turned [to Us].
Remember Our slaves: Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob – men of strength and insight.
We chose them exclusively for the remembrance of the Final Home.
Indeed, they are before us among the chosen and best ones.
Also remember Ishmael, Elisha, and Dhul-Kifl – all were among the best.
This is a reminder. And the righteous will surely have a good return:
gardens of perpetual residence, with gates wide open for them.
They will recline therein, calling for abundant fruit and drink.
And they will have maidens of modest gaze and equal age.
This is what you are promised for the Day of Account.
Indeed, this is Our provision [for the righteous] that will never cease.
This [is so]. But the transgressors will surely have a worst return:
Hell, where they will burn. What a terrible resting place!
Let them taste this: scalding water and pus,
and other similar [torments] of various kinds.
[The misleaders will say], “Here is a crowd of people being thrown in with you. There is no welcome for them; they will surely burn in the Fire.”
They will say, “No, it is you for whom there is no welcome! You brought this on us. What a terrible place to settle in!”
They will say, “Our Lord, whoever brought this on us, give him double punishment in the Fire.”
They will say, “Why do we not see those whom we considered to be among the wicked?
Is it that we mistakenly made fun of them, or do our eyes fail to see them [in the Fire]?”
This is certainly true that the people of the Fire will dispute among themselves.
Say [O Prophet], “I am only a warner, and none has the right to be worshiped except Allah, the One, the Subjugator,
Lord of the heavens and earth and all that is between them, the All-Mighty, Most Forgiving.”
Say, “This [Qur’an] is of great importance
from which you are turning away.”
[And say], “I had no knowledge of the highest assembly [of angels] when they were disputing [about Adam].
I have only received revelation in order to give a clear warning.”
[Remember] when your Lord said to the angels, “I am going to create a human being from clay.
When I completed his creation and breathed into him of My [created] soul, fall down in prostration to him.”
Then the angels fell down in prostration all together,
except Iblīs, who was arrogant and became one of the disbelievers.
[Allah] said, “O Iblīs, what prevented you from prostrating to whom I created with My Hands? Did you just became proud or have you always been arrogant?”
He said, “I am better than him: You created me from fire and created him from clay.”
[Allah] said, “Then get out of here, for you are accursed,
and My curse will be upon you until the Day of Judgment.”
He said, “My Lord, then give me respite until the Day of their resurrection.”
Allah said, “You are given respite,
until the Day of the appointed time.”
Iblīs said, “By Your Might, I will surely mislead them all,
except Your chosen slaves among them.”
Allah said, “This truth is – and I only say the truth –
that I will certainly fill Hell with you and those of them who follow you all together.”
Say [O Prophet], “I do not ask you for any reward for it, nor do I pretend to be what I am not.
It is only a reminder for all people.
And you will surely know its truth after a while.”
The revelation of this Book is from Allah, the All-Mighty, All-Wise.
Indeed, We have sent down to you [O Prophet] the Book with the truth, so worship Allah with sincere devotion to Him.
Indeed, sincere devotion is due to Allah alone. As for those who take others as guardians besides Him, [saying], “We only worship them so that they may bring us closer to Allah.” Allah will judge between them concerning that over which they differ. Allah does not guide anyone who is liar and persistent disbeliever.
If Allah had willed to take for Himself a son, He could have chosen whatever He wished from among what He creates. Glory be to Him. He is Allah, the One, the Subjugator.
He created the heavens and earth for a true purpose. He wraps the night over the day and wraps the day over the night. He has subjected the sun and the moon, each running its course for an appointed term. Indeed, He is the All-Mighty, Most Forgiving.
He created you from a single soul, then He made from it its mate, and He created for you eight pairs of livestock. He creates you in the wombs of your mothers [in stages], creation after creation, in three layers of darkness. Such is Allah, your Lord. To Him belongs the dominion; none has the right to be worshiped except Him. So how are you averted?
If you disbelieve, then Allah is in no need of you, and He does not approve of disbelief for His slaves. But if you are grateful, He approves of that for you. No bearer of burden can bear the burden of another. Then to your Lord is your return, and He will inform you of what you used to do. He is All-Knowing of what is in the hearts.
When adversity befalls man, he calls upon his Lord, turning to Him in repentance. Then when his Lord bestows His favor upon him, he forgets the adversity for which he was calling upon Him before, and sets up rivals to Allah, to mislead others from His way. Say [O Prophet], “Enjoy your disbelief for a little while; you will be one of the people of the Fire.”
[Is he better] or the one who constantly worships during the night, prostrating and standing, fearing the Hereafter and hoping for the mercy of his Lord? Say, “Are those who know equal to those who do not know?” It is only the people of understanding who will take heed.
Say, “O My slaves who believe, fear your Lord. Those who do good in this world will have a good return, and Allah’s earth is spacious. Those who observe patience will be given their reward without measure.”
Say, “I have been commanded to worship Allah, with sincere devotion to Him,
and I have been commanded to be the first of those who submit to Allah [as Muslim].”
Say, “I truly fear, if I were to disobey my Lord, the punishment of a momentous Day.”
Say, “It is Allah alone Whom I worship, with sincere devotion to Him.
So worship whatever you wish besides Him.” Say, “Indeed, the losers are those who will lose themselves and their families on the Day of Resurrection. That is indeed the clear loss.”
They will have layers of fire above them and below them. That is how Allah warns His slaves. Then fear Me, O My slaves!
But those who shun the worship of false gods and penitently turn to Allah, there are glad tidings for them. So give glad tidings to My slaves,
those who listen to what is said and follow the best of it. They are the ones whom Allah has guided, and they are the people of understanding.
Can you save those against whom the decree of punishment has been passed to be in the Fire?
But those who fear their Lord will have lofty mansions, built one above another, under which rivers flow. This is the promise of Allah; Allah never breaks His promise.
Do you not see that Allah sends down rain from the sky and makes it flow as springs in the earth, then He brings forth thereby crops of various colors; then they whither and you see them turn yellow; then He causes them to crumble? Indeed, there is a reminder in this for people of understanding.
Is one whose heart Allah has opened to Islam, so he is enlightened by his Lord [like a disbeliever]? Woe to those whose hearts are hardened upon hearing the reminder of Allah; it is they who are clearly misguided.
Allah has sent down the best message – a consistent Book of repeated lessons – causing the skins of those who fear their Lord to shiver, then their skins and their hearts soften at the remembrance of Allah. This is the guidance of Allah by which He guides whom He wills. But whoever Allah causes to stray, there is none to guide him.
Is one who will shield himself from the terrible punishment with his face on the Day of Resurrection [like someone in Paradise]? And it will be said to the wrongdoers: “Taste what you used to earn.”
Those who came before them also disbelieved, so the punishment came upon them from where they could not imagine.
Therefore Allah gave them a taste of disgrace in the life of this world, but the punishment of the Hereafter is far greater, if only they knew.
Indeed, We have presented for mankind all kinds of example in this Qur’an, so that they may take heed –
an Arabic Qur’an, free of flaws and contradictions, so that they may be conscious of Allah.
Allah makes a comparison of a slave owned by several quarrelsome masters, and a slave owned by only one master. Are they equal in comparison? Praise be to Allah. But most of them do not know.
You [O Prophet] will surely die, and they too will die;
then on the Day of Resurrection, you will dispute with one another before your Lord.
Who is then more unjust than he who tells lies about Allah and rejects the truth when it comes to him? Is there no abode for the disbelievers in Hell?
But the one who brought the truth and believed in it – it is they who are the righteous.
They will have whatever they wish for with their Lord. Such is the reward of those who do good.
And Allah will absolve them of their worst deeds and reward them according to the best of what they used to do.
Is Allah not sufficient for His slave? Yet they frighten you with those [whom they worship] besides Him. Whoever Allah causes to stray, there is none to guide him.
And whoever Allah guides, none can lead him astray. Is not Allah All-Mighty, Capable of Retribution?
If you ask them who created the heavens and earth, they will surely say, “Allah.” Say, “Then tell me about those whom you supplicate besides Allah: if Allah wills to harm me, can they remove His harm? Or if He wills mercy for me, can they withhold His mercy?” Say, “Allah is sufficient for me; in Him alone do the reliant put their trust.”
Say, “O my people, carry on as you are, and so will I. You will come to know
who will receive a humiliating punishment, and upon whom will descend an everlasting punishment.”
We have sent down to you the Book with the truth for all mankind. Whoever follows the guidance, it is for his own benefit, and whoever goes astray, it is only to his own loss. You are not a keeper over them.
Allah takes away the souls at the time of their death and of those who do not die during their sleep. He withholds the souls of those on whom He decreed has death, and releases others until an appointed term. Indeed, there are signs in this for people who reflect.
Or have they taken besides Allah others as intercessors? Say, “Even though they have no power nor do they understand?”
Say, “All intercession belongs to Allah alone. To Him belongs the dominion of the heavens and earth, then to Him you will be brought back.”
When Allah alone is mentioned, the hearts of those who do not believe in the Hereafter shrink with aversion, but as soon as those other than Him are mentioned, they rejoice.
Say, “O Allah, Originator of the heavens and earth, Knower of the unseen and the seen, it is you who will judge between Your slaves concerning that over which they used to differ.
If the wrongdoers were to possess all that is on earth and the like of it, they would surely offer it to ransom themselves from the terrible punishment on the Day of Resurrection. There will appear to them from Allah what they had never anticipated.
The evil consequences of their deeds will become apparent to them, and they will be overwhelmed by what they used to ridicule.
When adversity befalls man, he cries out to Us. Then when We grant him a favor from Us, he says, “I have been granted this only because of my knowledge.” It is rather a test, but most of them do not know.
It was already said by those before them, but all what they earned were of no avail to them,
Therefore the evil consequences of their deeds overtook them, and the wrongdoers among these [pagans] will be overtaken by the evil consequences of their deeds, and they will have no escape.
Do they not know that Allah extends or restricts provision to whom He wills? Indeed, there are signs in this for people who believe.
Say [Allah says], “O My slaves who have transgressed against themselves, do not despair of Allah’s mercy, for indeed Allah forgives all sins. He is indeed the All-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
Turn to your Lord [in repentance] and submit to Him before the punishment comes upon you, for then you will not be helped.
And follow the best of what has been sent down to you all from your Lord, before the punishment comes upon you by surprise while you are unaware,
Lest someone should say, “Woe to me for neglecting my duties towards Allah and for being among those who mocked [the truth]”;
or says, “If only Allah had guided me, I would have been among the righteous”;
or says, upon seeing the punishment, “If only I had another chance, I could be among those who do good.”
[Allah will say,] “No indeed! My verses had already come to you, but you rejected them and acted arrogantly, and you were among the disbelievers.”
On the Day of Resurrection you will see those who lied against Allah with their faces darkened. Is there not in Hell an abode for the arrogant?
But Allah will save those who fear Him, for they have attained salvation; no harm will touch them, nor will they grieve.
Allah is the Creator of all things, and He is in charge of everything.
To Him belong the keys of the heavens and earth. As for those who disbelieve in the verses of Allah, it is they who are the losers.
Say [O Prophet], “Do you order me to worship other than Allah, O ignorant people?”
It has already been revealed to you and to those who came before you that if you associate others with Allah, your deeds will surely become worthless, and you will certainly be among the losers.
Rather, worship Allah alone and be among those who are grateful.
They did not revere Allah His true reverence. On the Day of Resurrection, the whole earth will be in His Grip, and the heavens will be rolled up in His Right Hand. Glorified and Exalted is He above what they associate with Him!
The Trumpet will be blown and all those in the heavens and all those on earth will fall dead, except whom Allah wills. Then it will be blown again, and at once they will be standing, looking on.
The earth will shine with the light of its Lord, the record of deeds will be placed, the prophets and the witnesses will be brought forth, and judgment will be passed between them with fairness, and they will not be wronged.
Every soul will be paid in full for what it has done, for He knows best what they do.
Those who disbelieved will be driven to Hell in groups, until when they reach it, its gates will be opened and its keepers will say to them, “Did there not come to you messengers from among you, reciting the verses of your Lord and warning you of your meeting of this Day?” They will say, “Yes indeed, but the decree of punishment has come to pass against the disbelievers.”
It will be said, “Enter the gates of Hell, abiding therein forever.” What a terrible abode for the arrogant!
But those who feared their Lord will be led to Paradise in groups, until when they reach it, its gates will be wide open, and its keepers will say to them, “Peace be upon you. You have done well, so enter it, abiding forever.”
They will say, “Praise be to Allah Who has fulfilled His promise to us, and made us inherit the land to dwell wherever we please in Paradise.” How excellent is the reward of those who do [good]!
You will see the angels surrounding the Throne, glorifying their Lord with His praise, and matters will be settled between them with justice, and it will be said: Praise be to Allah, Lord of the worlds.”
Hā Mīm.
The revelation of this Book is from Allah, the All-Mighty, All-Knowing,
Forgiver of sin and Accepter of repentance, Severe in punishment and Infinite in bounty. None has the right to be worshiped except Him. To Him is the final return.
None disputes against the signs of Allah except those who disbelieve, so do not be deceived by their movements in the land.
Before them, the people of Noah rejected and so did [other] parties after them. Every nation plotted against its messenger to seize him, and falsely argued to refute the truth with falsehood, so I seized them. How [terrible] was My punishment!
Thus the decree of your Lord was passed against those who disbelieve, that they will be the people of the Fire.
Those [angels] who bear the Throne and those around it glorify their Lord with His praise and believe in Him, and seek forgiveness for those who believe, [saying], “Our Lord, Your mercy and knowledge encompass everything, so forgive those who repent and follow Your way, and protect them from the punishment of the Blazing Fire.
Our Lord, admit them to gardens of perpetual residence which You have promised them, and the righteous from among their parents, their spouses and their offspring. Indeed, it is You who are the All-Mighty, All-Wise.
And protect them from the evil consequences [of their sins]. For whoever You protect from the evil consequences on that Day, You have surely bestowed mercy upon him. That is the supreme triumph.”
Those who disbelieve will be addressed, “Allah’s abhorrence of you when you were called to believe but you disbelieved was greater than your abhorrence of yourselves [Today].”
They will say, “Our Lord, You have caused us to die twice and brought us to life twice. Now we acknowledge our sins; is there any way out?”
[They will be told], “This is because when Allah was invoked alone, you disbelieved, but when others were associated with Him, you believed. The judgment belongs to Allah, the Most High, All-Great.”
It is He Who shows you His signs and sends down for you provision from the sky, but none will take heed except those who turn to Him.
So call upon Allah with sincere devotion to Him, even if the disbelievers dislike it.
He is Exalted in Rank, Lord of the Throne. He sends down the revelation by His command to whom He wills of His slaves, in order to warn of the Day of Meeting,
the Day when they will be brought forth, nothing about them will be hidden from Allah. [He will say], “To whom does the dominion belong this Day? To Allah, the One, the Subjugator!
Today every soul will be recompensed for what it has earned; no injustice Today! Allah is swift in reckoning.”
Warn them of the approaching Day, when hearts will be at the throats, full of distress. The wrongdoers will have no close friend or intercessor whose word may be heeded.
He knows the stealthy glances of the eyes and what the hearts conceal.
Allah judges with justice, whereas those whom they invoke besides Him cannot judge at all. Indeed, it is Allah Who is the All-Hearing, All-Seeing.
Have they not traveled in the land to see what was the end of those who came before them? They were far superior in strength and in traces left behind in the land, but Allah seized them for their sins, and they had none to protect them from Allah.
That was because their messengers came to them with clear proofs, but they disbelieved; so Allah seized them. He is indeed All-Powerful, Severe in punishment.
We have sent Moses with Our signs and clear proof
to Pharaoh, Hāmān, and Korah. But they said, “A sorcerer! An utter liar!”
When he came to them with the truth from Us, they said, “Kill the sons of those who believe with him and keep their women alive.” But the plot of the disbelievers is nothing but a failure.
Pharaoh said, “Let me kill Moses, and let him call upon his Lord! I fear that he may change your religion or cause corruption in the land.”
Moses said, “I seek refuge with my Lord and your Lord from every arrogant one who does not believe in the Day of Reckoning.”
A believing man from the house of Pharaoh, who was hiding his faith, said, “Do you kill a man simply for saying: ‘My Lord is Allah,’ while he has come to you with clear proofs from your Lord? If he is a liar, his lie will repel back on himself. But if he is truthful, some of what he is threatening you with will afflict you. Allah does not guide the one who is a transgressor, an utter liar.
O my people, the authority is yours today, while you are dominant in the land. But who would help us against Allah’s punishment, if it came upon us?” Pharaoh said, “I do not tell you except what I perceive, and I do not direct you except to the way of guidance.”
The man who believed said, “O my people, I fear for you [a fate] like the day of the parties,
like the fate of the people of Noah, ‘Ād, Thamūd, and those after them. And Allah wants no injustice for [His] slaves.
O my people, I fear for you the Day of Calling –
the Day you will turn your backs fleeing; having no one to protect you from Allah. And whoever Allah leaves astray, he will have no guide.
Joseph already came to you before with clear proofs, yet you continued to doubt what he came to you with – until when he died, you said, ‘Allah will never send a messenger after him.’ This is how Allah leaves astray anyone who is a transgressor and doubtful –
those who dispute concerning Allah’s signs without any proof having come to them. How detestable is that with Allah and with those who believe! This is how Allah seals the heart of every arrogant tyrant.”
Pharaoh said, “O Hāmān, build a tower for me so I may reach the pathways –
the pathways to the heavens so that I have a look at the God of Moses, for I think he is a liar.” This is how Pharaoh’s evil deeds were made appealing to him and was hindered from the [right] way. The plot of Pharaoh led only to ruin.
The man who believed said, “O my people, follow me, I will guide you to the way of guidance.
O my people, the life of this world is only a little enjoyment, whereas the Hereafter is truly the home of settlement.
Whoever does an evil deed will only be recompensed with its like, and whoever does good – whether male or female – while he is a believer, they will enter Paradise, wherein they will be given provision without measure.
O my people, what is it that I call you to salvation while you call me to the Fire?
You call me to disbelieve in Allah and associate with Him what I have no knowledge of, while I call you to the All-Mighty, Most Forgiving.
There is no doubt that those [gods] to whom you call me to are not worthy of calling upon neither in this world nor in the Hereafter. Our return is to Allah, and the transgressors are the people of the Fire.
You will soon remember what I am saying to you, and I entrust my case to Allah. Allah is All-Seeing of [His] slaves.”
So Allah protected him from the evil they plotted, and the people of Pharaoh were encompassed by an evil punishment:
they are exposed to the Fire [in their graves] morning and evening, and on the Day the Hour will take place [it will be said], “Admit the people of Pharaoh into the most severe punishment.”
[Imagine] when they will dispute in the Fire: the weak will say to those who were arrogant, “We were your followers, can you then relieve us from a portion of the Fire?”
Those who were arrogant will say, “We are all in it. Allah has already passed judgment between [His] slaves.”
Those in the Fire will say to the keepers of Hell, “Pray to your Lord to lighten for us the punishment for just one day.”
They will say, “Did your messengers not come to you constantly with clear proofs?” They will say, “Yes.” They will say, “Then keep praying, but the prayer of disbelievers is only in vain.”
Indeed, We help Our messengers and the believers in the life of this world and on the Day the witnesses will stand up [for testimony] –
the Day when apology of the wrongdoers will be of no benefit to them. And they will be cursed and will have the worst abode.
And We gave Moses guidance, and made the Children of Israel inherit the Scripture –
as a guide and reminder for people of understanding.
So be patient [O Prophet]. Allah’s promise is true. Seek forgiveness for your sin, and glorify your Lord with His praise evening and morning.
Those who dispute concerning the verses of Allah without any proof given to them, there is nothing in their hearts but quest for dominance that they will never attain. So seek refuge with Allah. He is the All-Hearing, All-Seeing.
The creation of the heavens and earth is far greater than the creation of mankind, but most people do not know.
The blind and the one who can see are not equal, nor are those who believe and do good [equal] to those who do evil. Little do you take heed.
Indeed, the Hour is coming; there is no doubt about it, but most people do not believe.
Your Lord said, “Call upon Me, I will respond to you. Those who are too proud to worship Me will enter Hell, utterly debased.”
It is Allah Who made the night for you to rest therein and the day bright. Indeed, Allah is Most Bountiful to people, but most people are not grateful.
That is Allah, your Lord, the Creator of everything. None has the right to be worshiped except Him, so how are you deluded?
This is how deluded are those who rejected Allah’s signs.
It is Allah Who made the earth a dwelling place for you and the sky a canopy. He shaped you and perfected your form, and provided you with good things. That is Allah, your Lord; Blessed is Allah, Lord of the worlds.
He is the Ever-Living. None has the right to be worshiped except Him. So call upon Him in sincere devotion. All praise is due to Allah – Lord of the worlds.
Say [O Prophet], “I have been forbidden to worship those you worship besides Allah, when the clear proofs have come to me from my Lord. And I have been ordered to submit to the Lord of the worlds.”
He is the One Who created you from dust, then from a sperm-drop, then from a clinging clot, then He brings you out as an infant so that you may reach your full maturity, then you become old, whereas some of you die earlier – and so that you reach an appointed term, and that you may understand.
It is He Who gives life and causes death. When He decrees a matter, He only says to it, “Be,” and it is.
Do you not see how those who dispute concerning Allah’s verses are being turned away?
those who rejected the Book and what We sent Our messengers with. They will soon come to know,
when the shackles will be around their necks, and with chains they will be dragged
into the boiling water, then they will be burned in the Fire.
Then it will be said to them, “Where are those you used to associate as partners
with Allah?” They will say, “They have deserted us; rather, we never used to call upon anything before.” This is how Allah leaves the disbelievers to stray.
[They will be told], “This is because you used to rejoice on earth wrongfully and you used to exult [arrogantly].
Enter the gates of Hell, to abide therein forever. What a terrible abode for the arrogant!”
So be patient [O Prophet]. Allah’s promise is true: whether We show you some of what We warn them, or cause you to die [before that], they will be returned to Us.
We have sent messengers before you: some of them We have narrated their stories to you, and some of them We have not narrated to you. It was not for a messenger to bring a sign except with Allah’s permission. But when Allah’s decree comes, judgment will be passed with justice, and thereupon the people of falsehood will be in loss.
Allah is the One Who made cattle for you so that you may ride some of them and eat some of them.
And there are [other] benefits in them for you, and by them you may fulfill your needs in your hearts, and on them and on the ships you are carried.
And He shows you His signs; so which of the signs of Allah do you deny?
Have they not traveled through the land to see what was the end of those before them? They were far superior in strength and in traces left behind in the land, but their earnings were of no avail to them.
When their messengers came to them with clear proofs, they exulted for whatever knowledge they had, and they were encompassed by what they used to ridicule.
When they saw Our punishment, they said, “We believe in Allah alone and reject what we used to associate with Him.”
But their faith was of no benefit to them when they saw Our punishment. This has been Allah’s way with His slaves; there the disbelievers will be in utter loss.
Hā Mīm.
A revelation from the Most Compassionate, Most Merciful –
a Book whose verses are well explained; an Arabic Qur’an for people who understand,
as a bearer of good tidings and a warner; yet most of them turn away, so they do not hear.
They say, “Our hearts are covered against what you are calling us to; there is deafness in our ears, and there is a barrier between us and you. So do [in your way], we will do [in our way].”
Say [O Prophet], “I am only a human being like you; it is revealed to me that your god is only One God. So take the straight path to Him and seek His forgiveness, and woe to those who associate partners with Allah –
those who do not give Zakah and disbelieve in the Hereafter.
As for those who believe and do righteous deeds, they will have a never-ending reward.
Say, “Do you disbelieve in the One – Who created the earth in two days – and set up rivals to Him? That is the Lord of the worlds.
He placed on earth firm mountains high above it, blessed it, and proportioned its sustenance therein exactly in four days – for all who ask.
Then He turned to the heaven while it was all smoke, and said to it and to the earth, ‘Come, willingly or unwillingly.’ They both said, ‘We come willingly.’
He then formed them into seven heavens in two Days and assigned to each heaven its command. And We adorned the lowest heaven with lamps and for protection. That is the design of the All-Mighty, All-Knowing.”
But if they turn away, then say, “I have warned you of a blast like the blast of ‘Ād and Thamūd,
when the messengers came to them before them and after them [saying], “Worship none except Allah.” They said, “If our Lord had willed, He would have sent down angels. So we disbelieve in what you have been sent with.”
As for ‘Ād, they were arrogant in the land without any right, and said, “Who is stronger than us in power?” Did they not see that Allah Who created them is stronger than them in power? Yet they continued to reject Our signs.
So We sent against them a roaring wind for days of misery to make them taste a disgracing punishment in the life of this world; but the punishment of the Hereafter is far more disgracing, and they will not be helped.
As for Thamūd, We gave them guidance, but they preferred blindness over the guidance. So they were seized by the blast of a debasing punishment for what they used to commit.
And We saved those who believed and were righteous.
[Consider] the Day when Allah’s enemies will be gathered to the Fire, driven in rows.
until when they reach it, their ears, eyes, and skins will testify against them for what they used to do.
They will say to their skins, “Why did you testify against us?” They will say, “We were made to speak by Allah, the One Who made everything speak. It is He Who created you the first time, and to Him you will be returned.
And you were not hiding yourselves [when committing sins] from your ears, eyes, and skins to prevent them from testifying against you, but you thought that Allah does not know much of what you do.
Such was your thought you entertained about your Lord that ruined you, so you became losers.”
Even if they endure patiently, the Fire will still be their abode. And if they seek to appease Him, they will never be allowed to appease.
We had assigned for them associates who made appealing to them all that was before them and behind them. So the decree [of punishment] became due against them along with nations that passed before them of Jinn and men. They were losers.
Those who disbelieve say, “Do not listen to this Qur’an, but make noise [during its recitation] that you may prevail.”
So We will surely make those who disbelieve taste a severe punishment, and We will surely recompense them for the worst of what they used to do.
That is the recompense of Allah’s enemies – the Fire, wherein they will have the eternal home, as a recompense for their rejection of Our verses.
Those who disbelieve will say, “Our Lord, show us those jinn and men who led us astray: we will put them under our feet so that they become among the lowest.”
Those who say, “Our Lord is Allah,” then remain steadfast, the angels descend upon them [saying], “Do not fear nor grieve, but receive good tidings of Paradise which you were promised.
We are your allies in the life of this world and in the Hereafter. You will have therein whatever your souls desire, and you will have therein whatever you ask for
as accommodation from the All-Forgiving, Most Merciful [Lord].”
Who is better in speech than someone who calls to Allah, does good, and says, “I am one of those who submit [to Allah].”?
Good and evil are not equal. Repel [evil] with what is good; the one with whom you have enmity will become like a close friend.
None can attain this except those who are patient, and none can attain this except those who are greatly fortunate.
If you are tempted by Satan’s provocation, seek refuge with Allah. He is certainly the All-Hearing, All-Knowing.
And among His signs are the night and day, and the sun and the moon. Do not prostrate to the sun or the moon, but prostrate to Allah Who created them, if you worship Him.
But if they show arrogance, then those [angels] who are with your Lord glorify Him tirelessly night and day.
And among His signs is that you see the land withered; as soon as We send down rain upon it, it stirs and grows. He Who gives life to it will give life to the dead. He is Most Capable of all things.
Those who distort Our verses are not hidden from Us. Is the one who will be cast into the Fire better or the one who will come safely on the Day of Resurrection? Do whatever you wish. Indeed, He is All-Seeing of what you do.
Those who disbelieve in the Reminder when it came to them, while it is certainly a mighty Book.
It cannot be approached by falsehood, neither from the front nor from behind – a revelation from the All-Wise, All-Praised.
Nothing is said to you [O Prophet] except what was already said to the messengers before you. Indeed, your Lord is the Lord of forgiveness and the Lord of painful punishment.
If We had made it a non-Arabic Qur’an, they would have said, “If only its verses were made clear? Is a non-Arabic [book] for an Arab?” Say, “It is a guidance and healing for those who believe. As for those who do not believe, there is deafness in their ears and they are blind to [understand] it – it is as if they are being called from a distant place.”
We gave Moses the Scripture, but differences arose about it. If it had not been for a prior decree from your Lord, it would have been decided between them. They are certainly in suspicious doubt about it.
Whoever does good, it is for his own benefit; and whoever does evil, it is against himself. Your Lord is not unjust to [His] slaves.
The knowledge of the Hour is with Him alone. No fruit emerges from of its husk, nor does any female conceive or give birth without His knowledge. On the Day when He will call them, “Where are My [claimed] partners?” They will say, “We declare before you that none of us can bear witness to that.”
Whatever they used to supplicate before will vanish from them, and they will realize that they have no escape.
Man never tires of asking for good things, but if evil touches him, he is desperate and despondent.
But if We give him a taste of mercy from Us after being inflicted with adversity, he will surely say, “This is my due, and I do not think that the Hour will ever come, but if I am brought back to my Lord, I will surely have with Him the best [reward].” We will surely inform the disbelievers of what they did, and We will surely make them taste a harsh punishment.
When We bestow favor upon man, he turns away and distances himself [from Us]; but when evil touches him, he is full of prolonged supplication.
Say, “Did you ever consider, if this [Qur’an] is really from Allah but you reject it? Who can be more astray than the one who goes too far in opposition?”
We will show them Our signs in the universe and in their own selves, until it becomes clear to them that this [Qur’an] is the truth. Is it not enough that your Lord is a Witness over all things?
Indeed, they are in doubt concerning the meeting with their Lord; He truly encompasses all things.
Hā Mīm.
‘Ain Sīn Qāf.
This is how Allah, the Al-Mighty, All-Wise, sends revelation to you [O Prophet] and to those before you.
To him belongs all that is in the heavens and all that is on earth, and He is the Most High, the Most Great.
The heavens almost burst apart above them [in awe of Him], and the angels glorify the praises of their Lord, and seek forgiveness for those on earth. Indeed, Allah is the All-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
As for those who take others as protectors besides Him, Allah is Watchful over them, and you are not a keeper over them.
Thus We have revealed to you an Arabic Qur’an, so that you may warn the Mother Town [of Makkah] and all those around it, and warn them of the Day of Gathering, about which there is no doubt: one party will be in Paradise and another party in the Blaze.
If Allah had willed, He would have made all of them a single community, but He admits to His mercy whom He wills, and the wrongdoers will have no protector or helper.
How do they take protectors besides Him? While Allah alone is the Protector, for He gives life to the dead, and He is Most Capable of all things.
Whatever is the subject of your differences, it is for Allah to judge. Such is Allah, my Lord; in Whom I put my trust, and to Whom I turn,
the Originator of the heavens and earth. He has given you spouses of your own kind, and pairs of livestock; by which He causes you to multiply. There is nothing like unto Him, and He is the All-Hearing, All-Seeing.
To Him belong the keys of the heavens and earth; He extends provision to whom He wills or restricts it. Indeed, He is All-Knowing of all things.
He has prescribed for you [believers] the same religion which He enjoined upon Noah, and that which We have revealed to you [O Prophet] and that which We enjoined upon Abraham, Moses, and Jesus: “that you should uphold the religion and make no divisions therein.” What you are calling the polytheists to is very hard for them. Allah chooses for Himself whom He wills, and guides to Himself who turns to Him.
They did not become divided except after the knowledge had come to them, out of envious rivalry between them. Were it not for a prior decree from your Lord until an appointed term, a decisive judgment would already have been passed between them. Indeed, those who inherited the Scripture after them are in disquieting doubt about it.
Therefore call to that [religion, O Prophet] and keep to the straight path as you are commanded, and do not follow their desires, and say, “I believe in all scriptures that Allah has sent down, and I have been commanded to judge fairly among you. Allah is our Lord and your Lord. We have our deeds and you have your deeds. Let there be no [further] argument between us and you; Allah will bring us together, and to Him is the final return.”
As for those who argue about [the religion of] Allah after it has been accepted [by many], their argument carries no weight with their Lord; they have incurred wrath, and for them there will be a severe punishment.
It is Allah Who has sent down the Book with the truth and justice. How would you know that perhaps the Hour is near?
Those who disbelieve in it seek to hasten it, but those who believe are apprehensive about it and know that it is the truth. Indeed, those who dispute concerning the Hour have gone far astray.
Allah is Kind to His slaves; He gives provision to whom He wills, and He is the All-Powerful, All-Mighty.
Whoever seeks the harvest of the Hereafter, We will increase for him his harvest; and whoever seeks the harvest of this world, We will give him thereof, but in the Hereafter he will have no share.
Or do they have partners who have prescribed for them a religion that is not sanctioned by Allah? If it had not been for a prior decisive decree, the matter would have been judged between them. And for the wrongdoers there will surely be a painful punishment.
You will see the wrongdoers apprehensive about what they have earned, which will inevitably befall them. But those who believe and do righteous deeds will be in meadows of the gardens. They will have whatever they wish with their Lord; that is the great bounty.
That is the glad tidings that Allah gives to His slaves who believe and do righteous deeds. Say, “I do not ask you any reward for it, except kindness because of our kinship.” Whoever does a good deed, We will increase its merit for him. Indeed, Allah is All-Forgiving, Most Appreciative.
Or do they say, “He has fabricated lies about Allah!”? But if Allah willed, He could seal up your heart. Allah wipes out falsehood and establishes the truth by His Words. Indeed, He is All-Knowing of what is in the hearts.
It is He Who accepts repentance from His slaves and pardons sins, and He knows all what you do.
He responds to [the supplication of] those who believe and do righteous deeds, and increases their reward out of His bounty. But for the disbelievers, there will be a severe punishment.
If Allah were to give abundant provision to [all] His slaves, they would transgress on earth; but He sends down what He wills in due measure. Indeed, He is All-Aware and All-Seeing of His slaves.
It is He Who sends down rain after they have lost hope, and spreads His mercy. He is the Guardian, the Praiseworthy.
Among His signs is the creation of the heavens and earth, and what He spread between them of all living creatures. And He is Most Capable of bringing them together whenever He wills.
Whatever calamity befalls you is because of what your own hands have earned, and He overlooks much.
You can not escape [Him] on earth, and you do not have besides Allah any protector or helper.
And among His signs are the ships, sailing in the sea like mountains.
If He wills, He can still the wind, leaving the ships motionless on its surface. Indeed, there are signs in this for everyone who is steadfast and grateful.
Or He can capsize them for what they committed, but He overlooks much,
then those who dispute concerning Our signs will know that they have no escape.
Whatever you have been given is but a short enjoyment of the life of this world, but what is with Allah is better and more lasting for those who believe and put their trust in their Lord;
and those who avoid major sins and shameful deeds, and when they are angered, they forgive;
and those who respond to their Lord and establish prayer, and conduct their affairs by mutual consultation, and spend out of what We have provided for them;
and those who retaliate fairly when oppressed.
The retribution of harm is its equivalent harm, but whoever pardons and seeks reconciliation, his reward is with Allah. Indeed, He does not like the wrongdoers.
But whoever retaliates after being wronged, there is no blame on them.
Blame is only on those who wrong people and transgress in the land without right. For such there will be a painful punishment.
But whoever observes patience and forgives, it is indeed a matter of great resolve.
Whoever Allah causes to stray, he will have no protector thereafter. You will see the wrongdoers, when they see the punishment, saying, “Is there any way to go back?”
You will see them exposed to the Fire in a state of abject humiliation, looking with a stealthy glance. Those who believed will say, “The real losers are those who have lost themselves and their families on the Day of Resurrection.” Indeed, the wrongdoers will suffer an everlasting punishment.
They will have no protectors to help them against Allah; whoever Allah causes to stray, there is no way [to guidance] for him.
Respond to your Lord before there comes from Allah a Day that cannot be averted. On that Day you will have no refuge, nor will you be able to deny [your sins].
But if they turn away, We have not sent you as their keeper; your duty is only to convey the message. If We give man a taste of Our mercy, he exults in it; but when a calamity befalls him because of what their hands have sent forth, then man becomes totally ungrateful.
To Allah belongs the dominion of the heavens and earth. He creates what He wills; He grants females to whom He wills and grants males to whom He wills,
or grants them males and females; and He leaves whom He wills barren. Indeed, He is All-Knowing, Most Capable.
It is not for a human being that Allah should speak to him except through revelation or from behind a veil, or by sending an angel-messenger to reveal what He wills by His permission. Indeed, He is Most High, All-Wise.
Likewise We have revealed to you a revelation by Our command. You knew nothing of the scripture or matters of faith, but We have made it [the Qur’an] a light by which We guide whom We will of Our slaves. And you are truly leading people to a straight path,
the path of Allah, to Whom belongs all that is in the heavens and all that is on earth. Indeed, to Allah return all matters.
Hā Mīm.
By the clear Book,
Indeed, We have made it an Arabic Qur’an so that you may understand,
and it is in the Master Book [Preserved Tablet] with us, highly esteemed, full of wisdom.
Should We then turn the Reminder away from you simply because you are a transgressing people?
How many a prophet did We send to the earlier peoples!
No prophet ever came to them except that they ridiculed him.
So We destroyed them, although they were greater in might than these [Pagans], and the stories of the earlier nations have already been related.
If you ask them, “who created the heavens and earth?”, they will surely say, “The All-Mighty, All-Knowing created them.”
It is He Who spread out the earth for you, and made therein pathways for you, so that you may find your way.
And it is He Who sends down rain from the sky in due measure, by which We revive dead land. This is how you will be brought forth [from the grave].
And it is He Who created all types of things, and made for you ships and animals on which you ride,
so that you may settle yourselves on their backs, then remember the blessings of your Lord when you have settled thereupon and say, “Glory be to Him Who has subjected this for us, for we could not have done it by ourselves.
It is to our Lord that we will surely return.”
Yet they ascribe to Him some of His slaves as offspring. Indeed, man is clearly ungrateful.
Has He taken for Himself daughters from what He has created, and favored you with sons?
When one of them is given tidings of [a baby girl] the like of which he ascribes to the Most Compassionate, his face darkens as he suppresses his rage.
Or [do they ascribe to Allah] one who is brought up in ornaments and is not able to present a clear argument in disputation?
They regard the angels, who are slaves of the Most Compassionate, as female. Did they witness their creation? Their testimony will be written and they will be questioned!
They say, “If the Most Compassionate had willed, we would not have worshiped them.” They have no knowledge of that; they do nothing but conjecture.
Or have We given them a Book before this [Qur’an], to which they are holding fast?
They rather say, “We found our forefathers on a path, and we are seeking guidance in their footsteps.”
Likewise, We never sent any warner to a town before you except that its affluent ones said, “We found our forefathers on a path, and we are following their footsteps.”
[The warner] said, “Even if I bring you a better guidance than what you have found your forefathers upon?” They said, “We totally reject what you [prophets] have been sent with.”
So We took revenge from them; see what was the end of the deniers.
And [remember] when Abraham said to his father and his people, “I disown all that you worship,
except the One Who created me; He will surely guide me.”
And he made it a lasting word among his descendants, so that they may return [to Allah].
However, I let these [Makkans] and their forefathers enjoy their lives, until there came to them the truth and a clear messenger.
But when the truth came to them, they said, “This is magic, and we definitely reject it.”
And they said, “Why was this Qur’an not sent down to a great man from one of the two towns?”
Is it they who distribute the mercy of your Lord? It is We Who have distributed their livelihood among them in the life of this world, and have raised some of them above others in ranks, so that they may serve one another. But the mercy of your Lord is better than what they accumulate.
Were it not that all people might become a single community [of disbelievers], We would have given those who disbelieve in the Most Compassionate houses of sliver roofs and staircases to ascend,
and their houses having [silver] doors and couches on which to recline,
and [golden] ornaments. But all of these are mere enjoyments of the life of this world, and the Hereafter with your Lord is [only] for those who fear Allah.
Whoever turns away from the Reminder of the Most Compassionate [the Qur’an], We assign to him a devil to be his close associate,
who will surely avert them from the [right] way, while they think that they are rightly guided.
Then when he comes to Us, he will say [to his devil associate], “I wish you were as distant from me as the east and west. What a terrible associate!”
[They will be told], “As you have done wrong, it will not benefit you Today that you are sharing the punishment.”
Can you make the deaf hear, or guide the blind or the one who is in clearly misguided?
Either We take you away [in death], We will surely exact retribution upon them,
or We will show you what We warned them of, for We have full power over them.
So hold fast to what is revealed to you. You are indeed on a straight path.
Indeed, this [Qur’an] is a reminder for you and your people, and surely you will [all] be questioned.
Ask those of Our messengers whom We sent before you: Did We appoint gods to be worshiped besides the Most Compassionate?
Indeed, We sent Moses with Our signs to Pharaoh and his courtiers, so he said: “I am a messenger of the Lord of the worlds.”
But as soon as he came to them with Our signs, they laughed at them.
Every sign We showed them was greater than the one before it, and We seized them with punishment so that they may turn in repentance.
They said, “O magician, call upon your Lord for us, by virtue of the covenant He has made with you; we will surely accept guidance.”
But as soon We removed the punishment from them, they broke their promise.
Pharaoh proclaimed to his people, “O my people, does not the kingdom of Egypt belong to me, and these streams flowing at my feet? Do you not see?
Or am I not better than this contemptible one who can hardly express himself?
Then why there are not sent down upon him bracelets of gold or come with him angels to support him?”
Thus he made fool of his people and they obeyed him. They were indeed a wicked people.
When they angered Us, We exacted retribution upon them and drowned them all,
Thus We made them a precedent and an example for the later generations.
When the example of the son of Mary was given, your people laughed and jeered,
and they said, “Are Our gods better or he?” They only mentioned him to you for the sake of argument. They are indeed a contentious people.
He was only a slave whom We favored and made him an example for the Children of Israel.
If We willed, We could [destroy you and] replace you with angels, succeeding one another on earth.
And he [Jesus] will be a sign of the Hour; so have no doubt it and follow me. This is a straight path.
Do not let Satan turn you away [from the straight path], for he is your sworn enemy.
When Jesus came with clear signs, he said, “I have come to you with wisdom, and to clarify to you some of that concerning which you differ; so fear Allah and obey me.
Indeed, Allah is my Lord and your Lord; so worship Him. This is a straight path.”
But the factions differed among themselves [about Jesus]; so woe to the wrongdoers from the punishment of a painful Day!
Are they waiting except for the Hour to come upon them by surprise when they least expect it?
On that Day, close friends will become enemies to one another, except the righteous,
[It will be said to them], “O My slaves, there is no fear for you Today, nor will you grieve,
[those] who believed in Our verses and submitted [to Us as Muslims].
Enter Paradise, you and your spouses, rejoicing in bliss.”
Golden trays and cups will be passed around among them; there will be all that souls desire and eyes delight in, and you will abide therein forever.
That is Paradise which you will inherit for what you used to do.
You will have therein abundant fruit to eat from.
Indeed, the wicked will be in the punishment of Hell forever.
It will not be lightened for them, and they will remain therein in utter despair.
We did not wrong them, but they themselves were the wrongdoers.
They will cry out, “O Mālik, let your Lord put an end to us!” He will say, “You are here to stay.”
We surely brought you the truth, but most of you were averse to the truth.
Have they devised a plan? We too have devised a plan.
Do they think that We do not hear their secret talks and private counsels? Yes indeed, and Our angel-messengers are with them recording everything.
Say, “If the Most Compassionate had a son, I would be the first worshiper.”
Glory be to the Lord of the heavens and earth, Lord of the Throne, far above what they ascribe [to Him].
So leave them indulge in falsehood and amuse themselves until they meet their Day that they are promised.
It is He Who is God in the heaven and God on earth, and He is the All-Wise, All-Knowing.
Blessed is He to Whom belongs the dominion of the heavens and earth and all that is between them. With Him is the knowledge of the Hour, and to Him you will be returned.
Those whom they supplicate besides Him have no power to intercede, except those who testify to the truth on the basis of knowledge.
If you ask them who created them, they will surely say, “Allah.” How are they then deluded?
[The Prophet] said: “O my Lord, indeed, these are a people who do not believe.”
So turn away from them and say, “Peace.” They will come to know.
Hā Mīm.
By the clear Book.
Indeed, We sent it down on a blessed night, for We give warning.
On that night, every matter of wisdom is determined
by Our command. We have always sent messengers.
as a mercy from your Lord. He is indeed the All-Hearing, All-Knowing,
Lord of the heavens and earth and all that is between them, if only you had sure faith.
None has the right to be worshiped except Him, Who gives life and causes death – your Lord, and the Lord of your forefathers.
But they are in doubt, amusing themselves.
So wait for a Day when the sky will bring forth a clearly visible smoke,
that will overwhelm the people. This is a painful punishment!
[They will cry,] “Our Lord, remove from us the punishment; we will surely believe!”
How will they take heed, when a messenger who explained things clearly has already come to them?
Then they turned away from him and said, “[He is] a madman, taught by others.”
We will surely remove the punishment for a while, but you will surely return [to disbelief].
On the Day when We seize [them] with a greatest assault, We will surely exact retribution.
Indeed, We tested the people of Pharaoh before them, and a noble messenger came to them,
[saying], “Hand over to me the slaves of Allah. I am indeed a trustworthy messenger to you,
and do not be arrogant towards Allah. I have certainly come to you with clear proof.
And I certainly seek refuge with my Lord and your Lord, lest you stone me to death.
If you do not believe me, then leave me alone.”
Then he called upon his Lord, “These are a wicked people”.
[Allah said], “Leave along with My slaves by night; you will surely be pursued.
And leave the sea parted; for they are surely an army destined to drown.”
[Imagine] how many gardens and springs they left behind,
and crops and splendid mansions,
and luxuries they used to rejoice therein.
So it was; and We made another people inherit all that.
Neither the heaven nor earth wept for them, nor were they given any respite.
Thus did We save the Children of Israel from the humiliating punishment,
from Pharaoh. He was indeed an arrogant who transgressed all bounds.
We chose them knowingly above the others.
And We gave them signs in which there was a clear test.
Indeed, these [Makkans] say,
“There is nothing after our first death, and we will not be resurrected.
Then bring back our forefathers if you are truthful.”
Are they better [in power] or the people of Tubba‘ and those who were before them? We destroyed them, for they were truly wicked.
We have not created the heavens and earth and all that is between them for amusement.
We have not created them except for a true purpose, but most of them do not know.
Indeed, the Day of Judgment is the time appointed for them all,
the Day when no friend will avail another in the least, nor will they be helped,
except those whom Allah shows mercy. He is indeed the All-Mighty, Most Merciful.
Indeed, the tree of Zaqqūm
will be the food of the sinful,
like molten metal that will boil in their bellies
like the boiling of scalding water.
[It will be said], “Seize him and drag him into the midst of the Blazing Fire.
Then pour over his head the torment of scalding water.”
“Taste this. You are the mighty and honorable!
This is what you [all] used to doubt.”
Indeed, the righteous will be in a safe place,
in gardens and springs,
wearing fine silk and heavy brocade, facing one another.
So it will be, and We will marry them to maidens with gorgeous eyes.
They will call therein for every kind of fruit, safe and secure.
They will not taste death therein except the first death, and He will protect them from the punishment of the Blazing Fire,
as a grace from your Lord. That is the supreme triumph.
We have made this [Qur’an] easy in your own language, so that they may take heed.
Then wait; they too are waiting.
Hā Mīm.
The revelation of this Book is from Allah, the All-Mighty, All-Wise.
Indeed, there are signs in the heavens and earth for the believers;
and in your creation and the living creatures that He spreads out, there are signs for people who are certain in faith.
And in the alternation of the night and day, the provision that Allah sends down from the sky, reviving thereby the earth after its death, and directing of the winds, there are signs for people of understanding.
These are the signs of Allah that We recite to you in truth. What message will they believe in after Allah and His signs?
Woe to every sinful liar,
who hears the verses of Allah being recited to him, yet he persists in his arrogance, as if he did not hear them. So give him tidings of a painful punishment.
When he comes to know anything of Our verses, he takes them in ridicule. For them there will be a humiliating punishment.
Behind them is Hell; neither their gains nor those whom they took besides Allah as protectors will avail them anything, and for them there will be a great punishment.
This [Qur’an] is guidance, and for those who disbelieve in the verses of their Lord there will be scourge of painful torment.
It is Allah Who has subjected for you the sea, so that the ships may sail on it by His command, and so that you may seek His bounty, and so that you may be grateful.
And He has subjected for you all that is in the heavens and all that is on earth; all is from Him. Indeed, there are signs in this for people who reflect.
Tell those who believe to forgive those who do not fear the days of Allah, so that He may recompense each people for what they used to do.
Whoever does righteous deed, it is for his own benefit; and whoever does evil deed, it is to his own loss. Then to your Lord you will be returned.
Indeed, We gave the Children of Israel the Scripture, wisdom, and prophethood; provided them with good things; and favored them above the others.
We gave them clear directions in matters [of religion]. They did not differ except after the knowledge had come to them out of transgression against one another. Indeed, your Lord will judge between them on the Day of Resurrection concerning their differences.
Then We put you [O Prophet] on a clear way of the religion; so follow it and do not follow the desires of those who have no knowledge.
They cannot avail you at all against Allah. Indeed, the wrongdoers are protectors of one another, whereas Allah is the Protector of the righteous.
This [Qur’an] is an insight for people; a guidance and mercy for people who are certain in faith.
Do those who commit evil deeds think that We will make them equal to those who believe and do righteous deeds, in this life and after their death? How badly they judge!
Allah created the heavens and earth for a true purpose, and so that every soul may be recompensed for what it has earned, and they will not be wronged.
Have you seen the one who took his desire as his god, whom Allah caused to stray despite having knowledge, and sealed up his hearing and heart, and put a cover on his sight? Who can guide him after Allah? Will you not then take heed?
And they say, “There is nothing but our life of this world: we die and we live, and nothing causes us to die except time.” They have no knowledge of that; they only speculate.
When Our clear verses are recited to them, their only argument is to say: “Bring our forefathers back, if you are truthful.”
Say, “It is Allah Who gives you life then causes you to die, then He will gather you on the Day of Resurrection about which there is no doubt, but most people do not know.”
To Allah belongs the dominion of the heavens and earth. On the day when the Hour will take place, the people of falsehood will be in total loss.
You will see every community on its knees. Every community will be summoned to its book [of deeds], “Today you will be recompensed for what you used to do.
This is Our Record that tells the truth about you, for We used to record all what you used to do.”
As for those who believed and did righteous deeds, their Lord will admit them into His mercy. That is indeed the clear triumph.
But those who disbelieved [will be asked], “When My verses were recited to you, were you not arrogant and wicked people?
Whenever it was said, ‘Allah’s promise is certainly true and there is no doubt about the Hour,’ you said, ‘We do not know what the Hour is; We think it is just an assumption, and we are not convinced.’”
The evil consequences of their deeds will become apparent to them, and they will be overwhelmed by what they used to ridicule.
It will be said, “Today We will forget you as you forgot the meeting of this Day of yours. Your abode will be the Fire, and you will have no helpers.
That is because you took Allah’s verses in ridicule, and were deluded by the life of this world.” So Today they will not be taken out of it, nor will they be asked to make amends.
So all praise is for Allah, Lord of the heavens and Lord of the earth, Lord of the worlds.
To Him belongs all supremacy in the heavens and earth, and He is the All-Mighty, All-Wise.
Hā Mīm.
The revelation of this Book is from Allah, the All-Mighty, All-Wise.
We have not created the heavens and earth and all that is between them except for a true purpose and for a specific term, yet those who disbelieve turn away from the warning that they were given.
Say, “Tell me about those whom you invoke besides Allah; show me what they have created on the earth, or do they have a share in the heavens? Bring me a scripture revealed before this, or some remnant of knowledge, if you are truthful.”
Who is more astray than one who invokes besides Allah those who will not respond to him until the Day of Resurrection, while they are unaware of their invocations?
When people are gathered, they will become their enemies and will reject their worship.
When Our clear verses are recited to them, those who disbelieve say about the truth when it comes to them, “This is clear magic.”
Or do they say, “He has fabricated it”? Say, “If I did fabricate it, there is nothing you can do to protect me against Allah. He knows best what you say against it. He is Sufficient as a witness between me and you, and He is the All-Forgiving, Most Merciful.”
Say, “I am not the first of the messengers, nor do I know what will happen to me or to you. I only follow what is revealed to me, and I am not but a clear warner.”
Say, “What do you think, if this [Qur’an] is really from Allah and yet you reject it, while a witness from the Children of Israel has testified in its favor and believed, whereas you persist in arrogance? Indeed, Allah does not guide the wrongdoing people.”
The disbelievers say about the believers, “If this [faith] were something good, they would not have believed in it before us.” Now since they are not guided by it, they will say, “This is an old fabrication.”
And before it was the Scripture of Moses a guide and a mercy. This Book is a confirmation to it, in the Arabic language, in order to warn those who do wrong and give glad tidings to those who do good.
Indeed, those who say, “Our Lord is Allah”, then remain steadfast, they will have no fear, nor will they grieve.
They are the people of Paradise; abiding therein forever, as a reward for what they used to do.
We have enjoined upon man kindness to his parents. His mother bore him in hardship and gave birth to him in hardship, and his bearing and weaning take thirty months, until when he reaches full maturity and reaches forty years, he says, “My Lord, inspire me to be grateful to Your favors which You blessed me and my parents with, and to do righteous deeds that will make You pleased; and make my offspring righteous. Indeed, I repent to you, and I am one of those who submit to You [in Islam].”
Such are those from whom We will accept their best deeds and overlook their misdeeds. They will be among the people of Paradise – a true promise that was given to them.
But some say to their parents, “Fie upon you both! Are you warning me that I will be resurrected, even though many generations have passed before me [yet none was resurrected]?” His parents cry seeking Allah’s help, “Woe to you! Believe! The promise of Allah is true.” But he says, “This is nothing but ancient fables.”
Such are those upon whom the punishment has become due, as happened to communities of Jinn and men before them, for they were truly losers.
Everyone will be ranked according to what they did, so that He may recompense them in full for their deeds, and none will be wronged.
On the Day when the disbelievers will be brought to the Fire, [they will be told], “You have exhausted your share of pleasures in the life of the world, and you have enjoyed them. Today you will be recompensed with a disgracing punishment for your arrogance in the land without any right and for your rebelliousness.
Remember [Hūd] the brother of ‘Ād, when he warned his people in the [land of] sand dunes – and indeed there came warners before him and after him – [saying], “Worship none but Allah. Indeed, I fear for you the punishment of a horrible day.”
They said, “Have you come to turn us away from our gods? Then bring us what you are threatening us with, if you are truthful.”
He said, “The knowledge [of its coming] is with Allah alone. I only convey to you the message that I have been sent with, but I see that you are an ignorant people.”
When they saw it as a cloud approaching their valleys, they said, “This is a cloud bringing us rain.” [Hūd said,] No, it is what you sought to hasten – a wind bearing a painful punishment.
It will destroy everything by the command of its Lord. And they became such that there was nothing left visible except [ruins of] their dwellings. This is how We recompense the wicked people.
We had given them power to an extent that We have not given you [O Makkans], and We gave them hearing, sight, and hearts. But neither their hearing, nor their sight, nor their hearts availed them in the least, for they used to reject the signs of Allah. And they were overwhelmed by what they used to ridicule.
We have certainly destroyed some towns around you and had given them a variety of signs, so that they might return [from disbelief].
Why is it that they were not helped by those [idols] whom they took as gods besides Allah so that they might bring them closer to Him? Rather, they were lost from them. Such was [the outcome of] their falsehood and the lies they used to fabricate.
And [remember] when We sent to you a group of jinn to listen to the Qur’an. When they heard it, they said [to one another], “Listen attentively.” Then when it was over, they returned to their people as warners.
They said, “O our people, we have heard a scripture that has been sent down after Moses, confirming what came before it; it guides to the truth and to a straight path.
O our people, respond to the one who is calling to Allah, and believe in him; He will forgive you some of your sins and protect you from a painful punishment.
And whoever does not respond to the one who is calling to Allah will have no escape on earth, nor will he have any protectors against Him; such people are clearly misguided.”
Do they not see that Allah, Who created the heavens and earth, and was not wearied by creating them, is able to bring the dead to life? Yes indeed! He is Most Capable of all things.
On the Day when the disbelievers are exposed to the Fire, [they will be asked], “Is this not the truth?” They will say, “Yes indeed, by our Lord.” He will say, “Then taste the punishment for your disbelief.”
So be patient, as the Messengers of Firm Resolve were patient, and do not seek to hasten [punishment] for them. On the Day when they see what they were warned of, it will be as if they had only stayed [in this world] for an hour of a day. This is a warning. Will anyone be destroyed except the rebellious people?
Those who disbelieve and prevent others from Allah’s way, He will render their deeds void.
As for those who believe, do righteous deeds, and believe in what has been sent down to Muhammad – which is the truth from their Lord – He will absolve them of their sins and set their condition right.
That is because the disbelievers follow falsehood, whereas the believers follow the truth from their Lord. This is how Allah explains for people their comparisons.
When you encounter the disbelievers [in battle], strike [their] necks until you have thoroughly subdued them, then bind the captives firmly. Later [you may free them] as a favor or for ransom until the war comes to an end. That [is Our command], if Allah had willed, He could have subjected them to punishment, but [He ordered you to fight] to test some of you by means of others. Those who are killed in the way of Allah, He will never render their deeds void.
He will guide them, and will set their condition right,
and He will admit them to Paradise, which He has already made known to them.
O you who believe, if you stand up for Allah, He will help you and make your steps firm.
As for those who disbelieve, how wretched will be their state! And He will render their deeds void.
That is because they detest what Allah has sent down, so He rendered their deeds worthless.
Have they not traveled through the land to see what was the end of those before them? Allah destroyed them utterly, and a similar end awaits the disbelievers.
That is because Allah is the Protector of the believers whereas the disbelievers have no protector.
Allah will surely admit those who believe and do righteous deeds to gardens under which rivers flow. As for those who disbelieve, they enjoy themselves [in this world] and they eat as livestock eat; their final abode is the Fire.
How many towns We destroyed that were more power than your town that expelled you, and there was none to help them.
Are those who possess clear proof from their Lord like those whose evil deeds are made appealing to them and who follow their own desires?
The likeness of Paradise promised to the righteous is that of a [garden which has] rivers of fresh water; rivers of milk the taste of which never changes; rivers of wine delicious to drink; and rivers of pure honey. They will have there all kinds of fruit and forgiveness from their Lord. Can they be like those who will abide in the Fire forever, and will be given boiling water to drink that tears apart their intestines?
Among these [hypocrites] are some who listen to you [O Prophet], but when they leave your presence, they say to those who were given knowledge, “What did he just say?” It is they whose hearts Allah has sealed up and who follow their desires.
As for those follow guidance, He increases them in guidance and blesses them with righteousness.
Are they but waiting for the Hour to come upon them by surprise? Already [some of] its signs have appeared. What good will it do them to take heed when it actually befalls them?
Then know [O Prophet] that none has the right to be worshiped except Allah, and seek forgiveness for your sins and for the [the sins of] believing men and women, for Allah knows your movements and your places of rest.
Those who believe say, “If only a Chapter were sent down [about fighting]? But when a precise Chapter is sent down and fighting is mentioned therein, you see those in whose hearts is sickness looking at you like someone who is about to die. It was better for them
to obey and say good words. Once the fighting was ordained, it would be better for them to be truthful to Allah.
Then if you turn away, what else can be expected but that you will spread corruption in the land and sever your ties of kinship?
These are the ones whom Allah has cursed, and has made them deaf and has blinded their eyes.
Do they not reflect upon the Qur’an, or are there locks upon their hearts?
Indeed, those who turn back [to disbelief] after guidance had become clear to them, it is Satan who has tempted them and has deceived them with false hopes of a long life.
That is because they say to those who hate what Allah has sent down, “We will obey you in some matters.” But Allah knows their secret schemes.
How will they feel when the angels take their souls, striking their faces and their backs?
That is because they follow what incurs Allah’s wrath and they hate what pleases Him, so He will render their deeds worthless.
Do those in whose hearts is sickness think that Allah will never expose their malice?
If We willed, We could show them to you [O Prophet], so you would recognize them by their faces, but you will surely recognize them by the manner of their speech. And Allah knows all what you do.
We will certainly test you so as to reveal those of you who struggle [in Allah’s way] and remain patient, and We will test sincerity of your assertions.
Those who disbelieve and prevent others from Allah’s way, and oppose the Messenger after guidance had become clear to them, they will never harm Allah in the least, and He will render their deeds worthless.
O you who believe, obey Allah and obey the Messenger, and do not cause your deeds to be nullified.
Those who disbelieve and prevent others from Allah’s way, and then die as disbelievers, Allah will never forgive them.
Do not lose heart or call for peace, for you will have the upper hand and Allah is with you. And He will never detract [the reward of] your deeds.
The life of this world is only play and amusement. But if you believe and fear Allah, He will give you your rewards, and He does not ask you for all your wealth.
If He were to ask you for it and insist that you give it, you would greedily withhold, and He would expose your resentment [for spending].
O you who are being called to spend in Allah’s way. Among you are some who greedily withhold, but whoever withholds, he in fact withholds against himself, for Allah is the Self-Sufficient, whereas you are in need [of Him]. If you turn away, He will replace you with another people, then they will not be like you.
Indeed, We have given you [O Prophet] a clear victory,
so that Allah may forgive you your previous and future sins, complete His favor upon you, and guide you to a straight path,
and so that Allah may help you with a mighty victory.
He is the One Who sent down tranquility into the hearts of the believers so that they may increase in faith along with their faith. To Allah belong the soldiers of the heavens and earth. And Allah is All-Knowing, All-Wise.
So that He may admit the believing men and women to gardens under which rivers flow, abiding therein forever, and absolve them of their sins; that is a great success before Allah.
And so that He may punish hypocrite men and women and polytheist men and women, who harbor about Allah evil thoughts. An evil fate will befall them. Allah is angry with them, and has cursed them and prepared for them Hell. What a terrible destination!
To Allah belong the soldiers of the heavens and earth, and Allah is All-Mighty, All-Wise.
Indeed, We have sent you [O prophet] as a witness, a bearer of glad tidings, and a warner,
so that you may believe in Allah and His Messenger, support and revere him, and glorify Him morning and evening.
Those who pledge allegiance to you [O Prophet] are indeed pledging allegiance to Allah; Allah’s Hand is over their hands. Whoever breaks his pledge, he only breaks it to his own detriment, but whoever fulfills his covenant with Allah, He will give him a great reward.
Those of the Bedouins who lagged behind will say to you, “We were preoccupied with our wealth and our families, so ask for forgiveness for us.” They say with their tongues what is not in their hearts. Say, “Then who can prevent Allah if He intends to harm or benefit you? Indeed, Allah is All-Aware of what you do.
But you thought that the Messenger and the believers would never return to their families ever, and that was made appealing in your hearts. You harbored evil thoughts, for you are a doomed people.”
Whoever does not believe in Allah and His Messenger, We have certainly prepared for the disbelievers a Blaze.
To Allah belongs the dominion of the heavens and earth. He forgives whom He wills and punishes whom He wills, and Allah is All-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
Those who lagged behind will say when you set out to collect the spoils of war, “Let us follow you.” They wish to change the word of Allah. Say, “You will never follow us; this is what Allah has already decreed.” They will then say, “Rather, you are jealous of us.” Rather, they do not understand but a little.
Say to the Bedouins who lagged behind, “You will be called against a people of great might, whom you will fight unless they submit. Then if you obey, Allah will give you a goodly reward, but if you turn away as you turned away before, He will afflict you with a painful punishment.
There is no blame on the blind, nor on the lame, nor on the sick [for remaining behind]. Whoever obeys Allah and His Messenger, He will admit him into gardens under which rivers flow. But whoever turns away, He will afflict him with a painful punishment.
Indeed, Allah was pleased with the believers when they pledged allegiance to you [O Prophet] under the tree. He knew what was in their hearts, so He sent down tranquility upon them and rewarded them with an imminent victory,
and abundant spoils of war they will gain. And Allah is All-Mighty, All-Wise.
Allah has promised you abundant spoils of war that you will gain, and He has hastened for you this [victory], and He has restrained people’s hands from you, so that it may be a sign for the believers, and so that He may guide you to a straight path.
And there are other [spoils] that you have not yet been able to gain, but Allah has full control over them, for Allah is Most Capable of all things.
If the disbelievers were to fight you, they would surely turn their backs, then they would not have any protector or helper.
Such was the way of Allah in the past, and you will not find any change in Allah’s way.
It is He Who restrained their hands from you and your hands from them [in Hudaibiyah] near Mecca, after giving you the upper hand over them. And Allah is All-Seeing of what you do.
It is they who disbelieved and prevented you from the Sacred Mosque, and detained the sacrificial animals from reaching their place of sacrifice. If it had not been for the believing men and women whom you could not identify, so you might have trampled them and thus incurring guilt unknowingly, [We would have let you march to Makkah]. [This was] so that Allah may admit to His mercy whom He wills. If they had been distinct [from the disbelievers], We would have surely inflicted on those who disbelieved among them a painful punishment.
When the disbelievers harbored pride in their hearts – the pride of ignorance – then Allah sent down His tranquility upon His Messenger and upon the believers, and caused them to adhere to the word of piety [declaration of faith], for they were more deserving and worthy of it. And Allah is All-Knowing of everything.
Indeed, Allah has fulfilled His Messenger’s dream in truth: that you will surely enter the Sacred Mosque if Allah wills, in peace and safety, and you will have your heads shaved or shortened, without any fear. He knew what you did not know, and He granted you prior to that an imminent conquest.
He is the One Who has sent His Messenger with guidance and the religion of truth, to make it prevail over all religions, and sufficient is Allah as a Witness.
Muhammad is the Messenger of Allah, and those who are with him are firm with [belligerent] disbelievers and compassionate with one another. You see them bowing and prostrating [in prayer], seeking Allah’s grace and pleasure. Their distinguishing sign is on their faces from the effects of prostration. Such is their description in the Torah. And their description in the Gospel is like that of a seed that sprouts its shoot, then makes it strong; then it grows thick and stands straight on its stem, which delights the sowers – so that He may enrage thereby the disbelievers. Allah has promised those among them who believe and do righteous deeds forgiveness and a great reward.
O you who believe, do not decide [any matter of importance] before Allah and His Messenger, and fear Allah, for Allah is All-Hearing, All-Knowing.
O you who believe, do not raise your voices above the voice of the Prophet, nor speak loudly to him as you speak loudly to one another, lest your deeds become worthless without you realizing it.
Indeed, those who lower their voices in the presence of the Messenger of Allah are those whose hearts Allah has tested for righteousness. For them there is forgiveness and a great reward.
As for those who call out to you [O Prophet] from behind the chambers, most of them have no understanding.
If they had been patient until you came out to them, it would have been better for them. But Allah is All-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
O you who believe, if an evildoer brings you some news, verify it, lest you harm people unknowingly, then you become regretful for what you did.
Know that the Messenger of Allah is among you. If he were to obey you in many matters, you would surely suffer. But Allah has endeared faith to you and made it pleasing to your hearts, and has made hateful to you disbelief, wickedness, and disobedience. Such are the rightly guided,
by Allah’s grace and favor. And Allah is All-Knowing, All-Wise.
If two groups of the believers fight one another, make peace between them. If one of them transgresses against the other, fight against the transgressing group until it submits to the rule of Allah. Then if it submits, make peace between them with fairness, and be just, for Allah loves those who are just.
The believers are but brothers, so make peace between your brothers. And fear Allah, so that you may be shown mercy.
O you who believe, let not some men ridicule others, for it may be that they are better than them; nor let some women ridicule others, for it may be that they are better than them. Do not speak ill of one another, nor call one another by [offensive] nicknames. How evil is the name of wickedness after having faith! And whoever does not repent, it is they who are the wrongdoers.
O you who believe, avoid much of the suspicions, for some suspicions are sin. Do not spy on one another, nor backbite one another. Would any of you like to eat the flesh of his dead brother? You would surely abhor it. So fear Allah. Indeed, Allah is Accepting of Repentance, Most Merciful.
O mankind, We have created you from a male and a female, and made you into nations and tribes so that you may recognize one another. Indeed, the most noble of you before Allah is the most righteous among you. Indeed, Allah is All-Knowing, All-Aware.
The Bedouins say, “We have believed.” Say, “You have not believed, but say, ‘We have submitted,’ for faith has not yet entered your hearts. But if you obey Allah and His Messenger, He will not detract anything from the reward of your deeds. Indeed, Allah is All-Forgiving, Most Merciful.”
Indeed, the believers are those who believe in Allah and His Messenger, then they do not have doubt, but fight with their wealth and their lives in the way of Allah. It is they who are the truthful.
Say, “Do you inform Allah of your faith, when Allah knows all that is in the heavens and all that is on earth? And Allah is All-Knowing of everything.”
They think that they have done you a favor by embracing Islam. Say, “Do not consider your Islam as a favor to me. Rather, it is Allah Who has done you a favor by guiding you to faith, if you are truthful.
Indeed, Allah knows all that is unseen of the heavens and earth, and Allah is All-Seeing of what you do.”
Qāf. By the Glorious Qur’an!
But they wonder that a warner has come to them from among themselves, so the disbelievers say, “This is something strange!
What! Is it when we die and become dust [will we be raised]? That is a far-fetched return.”
We certainly know what the earth consumes of them [after their death], and with Us is a Preserved Record.
Rather they rejected the truth when it came to them, so they are in a state of confusion.
Have they not then looked at the sky above them – how We built it and adorned it [with stars], and it has no rifts?
And We have spread out the earth and set therein firm mountains, and caused to grow therein plants of every pleasant kind,
as a source of insight and a reminder to every slave who turns [to Allah].
And We send down from the sky blessed rain, with which We cause to grow gardens and grain for harvest,
and towering palm trees having clustered fruit,
as a provision for people, and We revive thereby a dead land; likewise will be the resurrection.
The people of Noah rejected [the truth] before them, as well as the people of the Well and Thamūd,
and so did ‘Ād, Pharaoh, the people of Lot,
and the dwellers of the Forest, and the people of Tubba‘. All of them rejected the messengers, so My warning was fulfilled.
Did We wear out by creating [them] the first time? Rather they are in doubt about the resurrection.
We have created man and know what his soul whispers within him, for We are closer to him than his jugular vein.
When the two angel scribes, constantly accompanying him, one on the right, and the other on the left.
Not a single word he utters but there is with him a vigilant watcher, ready [to record it].
The throes of death will come with the truth. This is what you were trying to avoid.
And the Trumpet will be blown; that is the Day of [the given] warning.
Everyone will come, accompanied by an angel to drive him and another to testify.
“You were heedless of this; now We have removed your veil, so your vision is sharp Today.”
His angel-companion will say, “Here is the record ready with me.”
[It will be said to the two angels], “Throw into Hell every obstinate disbeliever,
every withholder of good, transgressor, and doubter,
who set up with Allah another god. Throw him into the severe punishment.”
His [devil] companion will say, “Our Lord, I did not mislead him, but he himself was far astray.”
Allah will say, “Do not argue in My presence, for I had already given you the warning.
My Word cannot be changed, nor am I unjust to My slaves.”
[Beware of] the Day when We will say to Hell, “Are you full?” It will say, “Are there any more?”
Paradise will be brought near to the righteous, not far off.
[It will be said], “This is what you were promised; this is for everyone who constantly turned [to Allah] and was dutiful,
who feared the Most Compassionate unseen, and came with a devoted heart.
Enter it in peace. This is the Day of eternity.”
They will have therein all what they wish for, and We have yet more.
How many nations We destroyed before them [Makkans] who were stronger than them in power! They traveled through the land. Did they find any escape?
Indeed, in that is a reminder for anyone who has a [mindful] heart or lends an ear attentively.
Indeed, We created the heavens and earth and all that is between them in six days, and no weariness touched Us.
So bear patiently [O Prophet] what they say, and glorify the praise of your Lord before sunrise and before sunset.
And glorify Him in the night and after the prayers.
And listen! On the Day when the Caller will call out from a nearby place,
the Day when they will hear the Blast [of the second Trumpet] in truth. That is the Day of resurrection.
Indeed, it is We Who give life and cause death, and to Us is the final return.
On the Day when the earth will be rent asunder for them as they hasten forth [from their graves]. That is an easy gathering for Us.
We know best what they say, and you are not there to compel them to believe. But remind with the Qur’an those who fear My warning.
By the winds that scatters [dust],
and by the heavily-laden clouds with water,
and by the ships that sail with ease,
and by the angels who distribute [blessings] by His command.
Indeed, what you are promised is true,
and the Judgment will surely come to pass.
By the heaven with its pathways,
Indeed, you [Makkans] have conflicting views [about the truth].
He who is diverted from it is destined to be diverted.
Doomed are those who base their beliefs on conjecture.
those who are steeped in ignorance heedlessly.
They ask [mockingly], “When is the Day of Judgment?”
It is the Day when they will be punished by the Fire.
[It will be said], “Taste your punishment! This is what you were seeking to hasten.”
Indeed, the righteous will be in gardens and springs,
receiving what their Lord will give them, for they were indeed doers of good beforehand.
They used to sleep but little at night,
and before dawn they would seek forgiveness,
and in their wealth, there was a share for the beggar and the destitute.
On earth there are signs for those who are certain in faith,
and also in your own selves. Do you not see?
And in the heaven is your provision and all that you are promised.
By the Lord of the heaven and earth, this [resurrection] is certainly as true as the fact that you can speak.
Has there come to you the story of Abraham’s honored guests?
When they came to him and said, “Peace.” He said, “Upon you be peace.” [saying to himself] “Unknown people!”
Then he went quickly to his household, and came with a fat [roasted] calf,
and placed it before them and said, “Will you not eat?”
He perceived a fear of them. They said, “Do not be afraid,” and gave him glad tidings of a knowledgeable son.
His wife cried out loud, and struck her face [in astonishment] and said, “[I am] a barren old woman!”
They said, “This is what your Lord said. Indeed, He is the All-Wise, All-Knowing.”
Abraham said, “Then what is your mission, O messengers?”
They said, “We have been sent to a wicked people,
to send down upon them stones of clay,
marked by your Lord for the transgressors.”
We brought out those believers who were there,
but We only found in it one Muslim household [Lot's family].
And We left there a sign [as a lesson] for those who fear the painful punishment.
And [there is a sign in the story of] Moses when We sent him to Pharaoh with compelling proofs,
But he and his supporters turned away, and he said about [Moses], “A magician or a madman!”
So We seized him and his soldiers, and cast them into the sea while he was blameworthy.
And [there is a sign in the story of] ‘Ād, when We sent against them the devastating barren wind.
It spared nothing it came upon except that it reduced it to ruin and decay.
And [there is a sign in the story of] Thamūd, when they were told, “Enjoy yourselves for a while.”
But they rebelled against the command of their Lord, so the thunderbolt seized them, while they were looking on.
They could not withstand it, nor could they ward it off.
And the people of Noah [were also destroyed] before them. They were indeed a rebellious people.
We built the heaven with might, and We are indeed expanding it.
And We spread out the earth. How well did We smooth it out!
And We have created everything in pairs, so that you may take heed.
So flee to Allah. Indeed, I am a clear warner to you from Him.
And do not set up another god with Allah. Indeed, I am a clear warner to you from Him.”
Likewise, no messenger came to those before them without being told: “A magician, or a madman!”
Did they suggest this to one another? Rather they are a transgressing people.
So turn away from them [O Prophet], for you are not to blame.
But keep reminding them, for reminder benefits the believers.
I have not created the jinn and mankind except to worship Me.
I seek no provision from them, nor do I want them to feed Me.
Indeed, it is Allah Who is the All-Provider, Lord of Power, the Mighty.
Indeed, those who do wrong will have a share [of [punishment] like that of their predecessors, so let them not ask Me to hasten it.
So woe to those who disbelieve from [the punishment of] the Day which they are promised.
By the mount of Tūr,
and by the Book inscribed
on an unrolled parchment,
and by the much-frequented House [in heaven],
and by the canopy raised high,
and by the sea ever filled.
The punishment of your Lord will surely come to pass;
there is none who can avert it.
On the Day when the heaven will convulse violently,
and the mountains will move a horrible movement,
then woe to the deniers on that Day,
those who amuse themselves in falsehood.
On the Day when they will be shoved into the Fire forcefully,
[They will be told,] “This is the Fire which you used to deny.
Is this [punishment] magic, or do you not see?
Burn in it, whether you bear it patiently or impatiently, it makes no difference to you; you are recompensed only for what you used to do.”
Indeed, the righteous will be in gardens and bliss,
enjoying what their Lord has given them, and their Lord protected them from the punishment of the Blazing Fire.
“Eat and drink pleasantly for what you used to do,
reclining on lined up couches”. And We will marry them to houris of wide beautiful eyes.
As for those who believe and their offspring follow them in faith, We will cause their offspring to join them, and will not detract anything from [the reward of] their deeds. Everyone will be accountable for what he earned.
And We will provide them with whatever fruit and meat they desire.
They will pass around to one another a glass [of pure wine] which does not lead to idle talk or sin.
They will be served by their servant boys, as if they were well-protected pearls.
They will turn to one another with questions.
They will say, “Before this, we used to be in awe [of Allah] when we were living among our people.
Therefore Allah conferred favor upon us and protected us from the punishment of the Scorching Fire.
Indeed, we used to call upon Him before. He is indeed the Most Kind, Most Merciful.”
So keep exhorting [O Prophet], for you are not, by the grace of your Lord, a soothsayer or a madman.
Or do they say: “He is a poet for whom we await a misfortune”?
Say, “Wait, I too am waiting with you.”
Do their minds prompt them to say such things, or are they a transgressing people?
Or do they say, “He has made it [the Qur’an] up”? Rather, they are not willing to believe.
Then let them produce a discourse like this, if they are truthful.
Were they created by none, or were they the creators [of themselves]?
Or did they create the heavens and earth? Rather, they are certain in faith.
Or do they possess the treasures of your Lord, or they have full control [of everything]?
Or do they have a stairway [to the heaven] by which they eavesdrop? Then let those who eavesdrop produce a compelling proof.
Or does He have daughters while you have sons?
Or are you asking them [O Prophet] for a reward so they find it too burdensome?
Or do they have [knowledge of] the unseen so they are writing it down?
Or do they intend a plot [against the Prophet]? But the plot of the disbelievers will rebound against themselves.
Or do they have a god other than Allah? Glory be to Allah far above what they associate with Him.
If they were to see pieces of the sky falling down, they would still say, “[This is only] a mass of clouds.”
So leave them alone until they encounter their Day in which they will be struck down,
the Day their plots will not avail them in the least, nor will they be helped.
And for the wrongdoers, there will be another punishment before that, but most of them do not know.
Be patient [O Prophet] with your Lord’s decree, for indeed you are under Our [watchful] Eyes. And glorify the praises of your Lord when you rise.
And glorify Him at night and when the stars fade away.
By the star when it sets,
Your companion [the Prophet] has neither strayed nor is he deluded.
Nor does he speak out of his own desire.
It is but a revelation sent down [to him].
He was taught by [an angel of] mighty power,
and of great perfection, who manifested himself [in his true form]
when he was on the higher horizon.
Then he approached [the Prophet] and descended,
until he was only two bow-lengths away or even closer.
Then he revealed to His slave what he had to reveal.
The [Prophet’s] heart did not deny what he saw.
Do you dispute with him concerning what he saw?
He certainly saw him a second time
at the Lote Tree of the Utmost Boundary [in the seventh heaven]
near which is the Garden of Abode,
when the Lote Tree was overwhelmed with [divine] splendors.
His gaze did not wander, nor did it look beyond the limit.
He certainly saw some of the greatest signs of his Lord.
Have you [O disbelievers] thought about [the idols of] al-Lāt and al-‘Uzzā,
and Manāt, the third one as well?
Do you choose for yourselves males and for Him females?
That is then an unfair division!
These [idols] are no more than names you and your forefathers have made up, for which Allah has not sent down any authority. They follow nothing but conjecture and what their souls desire, although there has come to them guidance from their Lord.
Is it that man can get whatever he wishes for?
Rather, to Allah belongs the Hereafter and this world.
How many angels there are in the heavens whose intercession will be of no avail except after Allah’s permission to whom He wills and pleases.
Indeed, those who do not believe in the Hereafter give the angels female names.
They have no knowledge about it. They only follow conjecture, but conjecture is of no avail against the truth.
So pay no heed to those who turn away from Our message and who only seek the life of this world.
That is the limit of their knowledge. Indeed, your Lord knows best who has strayed from His Way, and He knows best who is guided.
To Allah belongs all that is in the heavens and all that is on earth, so that He may recompense the evildoers for what they did, and reward those who do good with the best reward,
those who avoid major sins and shameful acts, except for minor lapses. Indeed, your Lord is ample in forgiveness. He knows you best, as He created you from the earth and when you were fetuses in the wombs of your mothers. So do not claim purity for yourselves, for He knows best who is truly righteous.
Have you seen the one who turned away [from Islam],
who gave a little, and then stopped?
Does he have knowledge of the unseen, so he has insight?
Or has he not been informed of what is in the Scriptures of Moses,
and of Abraham, who fulfilled his duty?
That no bearer of burden will bear the burden of another,
and that man will not receive except what he strives for,
and that his efforts will be examined,
then he will be recompensed in full,
and that to your Lord is the final return,
and that He is the One Who makes people laugh and weep,
and that He is the One Who causes death and gives life,
and that He created the pairs, male and female,
from an emitted drop of sperm,
and it is upon Him to bring about the second creation.
And He is the One Who enriches and bestows wealth,
and that He is the Lord of Sirius [a star worshiped before Islam].
And that He destroyed the earlier ‘Ād [people of Hūd],
and Thamūd [people of Sālih], sparing none,
and [He destroyed] the people of Noah before them; they were indeed more wicked and more rebellious.
And He toppled the cities [of Sodom and Gomorrah] upside down,
and they were utterly covered [by stones].
Then which of the favors of your Lord do you doubt?
This [Prophet] is a warner like the earlier warners.
The imminent Hour has drawn near,
none but Allah can disclose it.
Do you find this discourse astonishing,
and you laugh [at it] and not weep,
while persisting in heedlessness?
So prostrate to Allah and worship [Him].
The Hour has drawn near and the moon has split asunder.
Whenever they see a sign, they turn away and say, “Same old magic!”
They deny [the truth] and follow their desires, but every matter will reach its inevitable end.
There have already come to them stories [of destroyed nations] that are sufficient to deter them,
which contain extensive wisdom, but the warnings are of no avail.
So turn away from them [O Prophet]. On the Day when the caller will summon them to a horrific event,
with eyes downcast, they will come out of the graves like scattered locusts,
rushing headlong towards the caller. The disbelievers will say, “This is a stern Day!”
The people of Noah rejected [the truth] before them; they rejected Our slave and said, “He is a madman,” and he was rebuked.
So he called upon his Lord, “I am overpowered, so help me!”
So We opened the gates of the sky with water pouring down in torrents,
and We caused the earth to burst forth with springs, then the waters met for a preordained purpose.
We carried him on an [Ark made] of planks and nails,
sailing under Our [watchful] Eyes; as a reward for the one [they] denied.
We have certainly left it as a sign; is there anyone to take heed?
Then how were My punishment and My warnings?
We have certainly made the Qur’an easy to understand and remember; is there anyone to take heed?
‘Ād disbelieved. Then how were My punishment and My warnings?
We sent against them a furious wind on a day of continuous misfortune,
sweeping people away, as if they were trunks of uprooted palm trees.
Then how were My punishment and My warnings?
We have certainly made the Qur’an easy to understand and remember; is there anyone to take heed?
Thamūd rejected the warnings,
They said, “Shall we follow a single human being from among us? Then we would surely be in error and insanity!
Has the revelation been sent down upon him out of all of us? Rather, he is an insolent liar.”
Tomorrow they will know who the insolent liar is.
We are sending the she-camel as a test for them, so watch them [O Sālih] and be patient,
and tell them that the water is to be shared between them; each should take its drink in turn.
But they called their companion, and he undertook the task and hamstrung her.
Then how were My punishment and My warnings!
We sent against them a single blast, leaving them like trampled hedge-building twigs.
We have certainly made the Qur’an easy to understand and remember; is there anyone to take heed?
The people of Lot rejected the warnings.
We sent against them a storm of pebbles, except the family of Lot whom We saved before dawn,
as a blessing from Us. Thus do We reward those who give thanks.
He had already warned them of Our punishing assault, but they doubted the warnings.
They even demanded that he let them have their way with his angel-guests, so We blinded their eyes, [saying], “Taste My punishment and My warnings!”
By the early morning a lasting torment overtook them.
Taste My punishment and My warnings!
We have certainly made the Qur’an easy to understand and remember; is there anyone to take heed?
Indeed, warnings came to the people of Pharaoh.
But they rejected all of Our signs, so We seized them with the grip of the All-Mighty, Most Powerful.
Are your disbelievers [O Makkans] superior than those, or have you been granted immunity in divine Scriptures?
Or do they say, “We are a united front, bound to prevail.”?
Soon their united front will be defeated, and they will flee.
But the Hour is their appointed time, and the Hour is more catastrophic and more bitter.
Indeed, the wicked are in error and will be in blazes.
On the Day when they will be dragged into the Fire on their faces, [they will be told], “Taste the agony of Hell!”
Indeed, We have created everything according to a determined measure.
Our command is but a single word, which is fulfilled in the blink of an eye.
We have destroyed many like you [O Makkans]; is there anyone to take heed?
Everything they did is in the written records,
and everything, small or big, is written down.
Indeed, the righteous will be in gardens and rivers,
seated in honor in the presence of the Most Powerful Sovereign.
The Most Compassionate,
has taught the Qur’an,
He created man,
and taught him speech.
The sun and the moon follow their precise courses,
and the stars and trees prostrate [to Allah].
He raised the heaven and enjoined justice
so that you may not transgress the limits of justice.
Therefore establish weights in justice, and do not give short measure.
He has spread out the earth for all creatures,
in which there are fruits and palm trees with date stalks,
and grain having chaff, and fragrant plants.
Then which of the favors of your Lord will you [men and jinn] deny?
He created man from dry clay like pottery,
and He created the jinn from a smokeless flame of fire.
Then which of the favors of your Lord will you [men and jinn] deny?
[He is] Lord of the two sunrises and Lord of the two sunsets.
Then which of the favors of your Lord will you [men and jinn] deny?
He merges the two seas meeting together [fresh and salt],
yet between them is a barrier so that they do not cross.
Then which of the favors of your Lord will you [men and jinn] deny?
Out of both of them emerge pearls and coral.
Then which of the favors of your Lord will you [men and jinn] deny?
To Him belong the sailing ships raised up in the sea like mountains.
Then which of the favors of your Lord will you [men and jinn] deny?
Everyone on earth will perish,
but there will remain the Face of your Lord, full of Majesty and Honor.
Then which of the favors of your Lord will you [men and jinn] deny?
All those in the heavens and earth ask of Him; every day He handles some matter.
Then which of the favors of your Lord will you [men and jinn] deny?
We will attend to you, O two multitudes [men and jinn].
Then which of the favors of your Lord will you [men and jinn] deny?
O assembly of jinn and mankind, if you are able to pass beyond the realms of the heavens and earth, then pass. You cannot pass without power.
Then which of the favors of your Lord will you [men and jinn] deny?
There will be sent against you flames of fire and smoke, and you will not be able to defend yourselves.
Then which of the favors of your Lord will you [men and jinn] deny?
When the heaven is split asunder and becomes crimson, like red hide.
Then which of the favors of your Lord will you [men and jinn] deny?
On that Day no human or jinn will be asked about his sin.
Then which of the favors of your Lord will you [men and jinn] deny?
The wicked will be known by their marks, and will be seized by their forelocks and their feet.
Then which of the favors of your Lord will you [men and jinn] deny?
[They will be told] “This is the Hell that the wicked used to deny.”
They will go to and fro between it and scalding water.
Then which of the favors of your Lord will you [men and jinn] deny?
For those who fear of standing before their Lord will be two Gardens.
Then which of the favors of your Lord will you [men and jinn] deny?
Shaded by spreading branches.
Then which of the favors of your Lord will you [men and jinn] deny?
In each there are two flowing springs.
Then which of the favors of your Lord will you [men and jinn] deny?
In each there are two kinds of every fruit.
Then which of the favors of your Lord will you [men and jinn] deny?
They will recline on couches lined with rich brocade, with the fruits of both gardens within reach.
Then which of the favors of your Lord will you [men and jinn] deny?
In them there will be maidens of restrained gaze, untouched before them by any man or jinn.
Then which of the favors of your Lord will you [men and jinn] deny?
As if they were rubies and pearls.
Then which of the favors of your Lord will you [men and jinn] deny?
Is the reward for goodness anything but goodness?
Then which of the favors of your Lord will you [men and jinn] deny?
And besides these two there will be two other gardens.
Then which of the favors of your Lord will you [men and jinn] deny?
Both of deepest green.
Then which of the favors of your Lord will you [men and jinn] deny?
In each there are two gushing springs.
Then which of the favors of your Lord will you [men and jinn] deny?
In each there are fruits, palm trees, and pomegranates.
Then which of the favors of your Lord will you [men and jinn] deny?
In them there are beautiful noble women.
Then which of the favors of your Lord will you [men and jinn] deny?
Maidens with gorgeous eyes, secluded in pavilions.
Then which of the favors of your Lord will you [men and jinn] deny?
No human or jinn has ever touched them before.
Then which of the favors of your Lord will you [men and jinn] deny?
[They will be] reclining on green cushions and splendid carpets.
Then which of the favors of your Lord will you [men and jinn] deny?
Blessed is the name of your Lord, the Lord of Majesty and Honor.
When the Inevitable Event comes to pass,
there will be none to deny its occurrence;
it will bring some low and raise others up.
When the earth will be shaken violently,
and the mountains crushed to pieces,
and turn to scattered dust,
then you are sorted into three groups:
the people of the right – how blessed will be the people of the right!
The people of the left – how miserable will be the people of the left!
And the forerunners [in faith] are the forerunners [in Paradise].
They are the nearest ones [to Allah],
in Gardens of Bliss,
many from the first generations,
and a few from the later generations.
[They will be seated] on jeweled couches,
reclining on them, facing one another.
They will be served by immortal youths
with cups, pitchers, and glasses [of wine] from a flowing spring,
which will neither cause any headache nor intoxication,
along with fruits of their choice,
and flesh of birds that they may desire.
And [they will have] maidens of wide gorgeous eyes,
like pristine pearls,
as a reward for what they used to do.
They will not hear therein any idle talk or sinful speech,
except the words of peace, peace.
The people of the right – how blessed will be the people of the right!
[They will be] amid thornless lote trees,
and clusters of bananas,
and shade long-extended,
and flowing water,
and abundant fruit –
neither ceasing nor restricted –
and mattresses raised high [on beds].
Indeed, We have perfectly created them [their spouses],
and have made them virgins,
loving and of equal age,
for the people of the right,
many from the former generations,
and many from the later generations.
And the people of the left – how wretched will be the people of the left!
[They will be] in scorching wind and scalding water,
in the shade of black smoke,
neither cool nor refreshing.
Indeed, they used to be in luxuries before,
and persisted in the gravest sin [of polytheism].
They used to say, "When we die and become dust and bones, will we really be raised again?
And our forefathers as well?”
Say, [O Prophet], “Indeed, the former and later generations
will be gathered on a predetermined Day.
Then you, O misguided deniers,
will surely eat from the tree of zaqqūm,
filling your bellies with it,
and drinking scalding water on top of it,
drinking like thirsty camels do.”
This will be their welcome on the Day of Judgment.
It is We Who created you; will you not then believe [in resurrection]?
Have you thought about the semen that you emit?
Is it you who create it, or is it We Who are the Creator?
We have ordained death among you, and nothing can prevent us
from transforming you and recreating you in forms that you do not know.
You are well aware of the first creation; why do you not then take heed?
Have you thought about what you sow?
Is it you who cause it grow, or is it We Who make it grow?
If We willed, We could reduce your harvest to crumble, leaving you to wonder and lament,
“We suffered loss,
rather, we are deprived.”
Have you thought about the water that you drink?
Is it you who bring it down from the clouds, or is it We Who bring it down?
If We willed, We could make it salty; will you not then give thanks?
Have you thought about the fire that you kindle?
Is it you who produced its trees, or is it We Who produced it?
We made it a reminder [of the Hellfire] and a benefit for the travelers.
So glorify the name of your Lord, The Most Great.
I do swear by the positions of the stars –
and this is indeed a great oath, if only you knew –
that this is indeed a noble Qur’an,
in a well-preserved Record,
that none can touch except the purified [angels] –
a revelation from the Lord of the worlds.
Do you take this discourse lightly,
and instead [of thanking Allah] for the provision you are given, you show ingratitude?
Then why [you are helpless] when the soul reaches the throat,
while you are looking on,
when We are closer to him than you, but you do not see?
If you are not subject to retribution, then why do you not
bring that [soul] back, if you are truthful?
If that dying person is one of those who will be brought near to Allah,
then [he will have] comfort, fragrance, and Garden of Bliss.
If he is one of the people of the right,
[He will be told], “Peace be to you, for being one of the people of the right.”
But if he is one of the misguided deniers,
then he will be welcomed with scalding water,
and he will burn in Blazing Fire.
This is indeed the absolute truth.
So glorify the name of your Lord, the Most Great.
All that is in the heavens and earth glorifies Allah, for He is the All-Mighty, All-Wise.
To Him belongs the dominion of the heavens and earth; He gives life and causes death, and He is Most Capable of all things.
He is the First and the Last, the Manifest and the Hidden, and He is All-Knowing of everything.
It is He Who created the heavens and earth in six days, and then rose over the Throne. He knows all that goes into the earth and all that comes out of it, and all that descends from the heaven and all that ascends to it. He is with you wherever you are, and Allah is All-Seeing of what you do.
To Him belongs the dominion of the heavens and earth, and to Allah will return all matters.
He causes the night to merge into the day and the day to merge into the night, and He is All-Knowing of what is in the hearts.
Believe in Allah and His Messenger, and spend [in Allah’s cause] out of what He has entrusted you with. For those among you who believe and spend, there will be a great reward.
Why is it that you do not believe in Allah when the Messenger is calling you to believe in your Lord, and He has already taken a covenant from you, if you will ever believe?
He is the One Who sends down clear verses to His slave to bring you out of the depths of darkness into the light. Indeed, Allah is Ever Gracious and Most Merciful to you.
Why is it that you do not spend in the cause of Allah, when Allah alone will inherit the heavens and earth? Those of you who spent and fought before the conquest [of Mecca and those who did not] are not equal. They are much greater in rank than those who spent and fought afterwards. Yet Allah has promised each a fine reward, and Allah is All-Aware of what you do.
Who is there to lend Allah a goodly loan, so He will multiply it for him, and for him there will be a generous reward?
[Remember] the Day when you will see the believing men and women, with their light streaming ahead of them and on their right. [They will be told], “Glad tidings for you Today: gardens under which rivers flow, abiding therein forever.” That is the great triumph.
On that Day the hypocrite men and women will say to those who believe, “Wait for us, so that we may have some of your light.” It will be said, “Go back and seek light elsewhere.” Then a wall will be placed between them, which will have a gate, on the inside of which there will be mercy and on the outside there will be punishment.
The hypocrites will call out to the believers, “Were we not with you?” They will say, “Yes, but you allowed yourselves to succumb to temptations, you awaited [some misfortune to befall us], you doubted, and you were deceived by false hopes, until Allah’s decree came to pass. Thus the deceiver [Satan] deceived you concerning Allah.
So this Day no ransom will be accepted from you or from the disbelievers. Your abode is the Fire; it is a fitting place for you – what a wretched destination!”
Has the time not yet come for those who believe that their hearts should be humbled at the remembrance of Allah and to the truth that has been revealed? And that they should not be like those who were given the Scripture before, whose hearts grew hard after the passage of long time, and many of them were evildoers.
Know that Allah revives the earth after its death. We have made the signs clear to you so that you may understand.
Indeed, those men and women who give in charity and lend to Allah a goodly loan, it will be multiplied for them, and for them there will be a generous reward.
Those who believe in Allah and His messengers, it is they who are the people of the truth. And the martyrs will have their reward and their light with their Lord. As for those who disbelieve and reject Our verses, they are the people of the Blazing Fire.
Know that the life of this world is no more than play, amusement, adornment, boasting among yourselves, and a competition in wealth and children. It is like plants that flourish after rain, pleasing the sowers, then they wither and you see them turning yellow, then they crumble. And in the Hereafter there will be severe punishment, or forgiveness from Allah and His pleasure. For the life of this world is no more than a fleeting enjoyment.
Race one another towards forgiveness from your Lord and Paradise the width of which is like the width of the heaven and earth, prepared for those who believe in Allah and His messengers. That is the bounty of Allah which He gives to whom He wills, for Allah is the Lord of great bounty.
No calamity befalls the earth or yourselves but it is already written in a Record before we make it happen. That is indeed easy for Allah –
so that you may not grieve over what you have missed, nor exult over what He has given you, for Allah does not love anyone who is conceited and boastful –
those who are stingy and promote stinginess among people. And those who turn away, then Allah is the Self-Sufficient, the Praiseworthy.
We have sent Our messengers with clear proofs, and sent down with them the Scripture and the criteria of justice, so that the people may uphold justice. And We sent down iron, in which there is great might and benefits for people, so that Allah may make known those who help His cause and His messengers without seeing Him. Indeed, Allah is All-Powerful, All-Mighty.
We sent Noah and Abraham, and gave prophethood and Scripture to their offspring: some among them are guided, but most of them are evildoers.
Then We sent Our messengers in their footsteps, and We sent after them Jesus, son of Mary; We gave him the Gospel, and instilled kindness and mercy in the hearts of those who followed him. As for monasticism, they invented it – We did not prescribe it for them – seeking thereby Allah’s pleasure, yet they did not observe it faithfully. So We gave those among them who believed their reward, but most of them are evildoers.
O you who believe, fear Allah and believe in His Messenger; He will give you double share of His mercy, and will give you a light by which you walk, and forgive you, for Allah is All-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
[This is] so that the People of the Book may know that they have no power over anything of Allah’s bounty, and that all bounty is in the Hands of Allah; He gives it to whom He wills, for Allah is the Lord of great bounty.
Indeed, Allah has heard the words of the woman who was arguing with you [O Prophet] concerning her husband, and was complaining to Allah. Allah has heard the discussion between the two of you, for Allah is All-Hearing, All-Seeing.
As for those among you who divorce their wives by likening them to their mothers, they are not their mothers; their mothers are none but those who gave birth to them. They utter words that are abhorrent and false, but Allah is Most Pardoning, Most Forgiving.
But those who divorce their wives by likening them to their mothers then retract what they said, they must free a slave before they are intimate with each other. This is what you are admonished, and Allah is All-Aware of what you do.
But whoever cannot afford this must fast for two consecutive months before the couple have intimate relation with each other. But if he is unable to do that, he must feed sixty needy people. This is so that you may truly believe in Allah and His Messenger. These are the limits ordained by Allah, and for the disbelievers there will be a painful punishment.
Indeed, those who oppose Allah and His Messenger will be debased, just as those who came before them were debased, for We have surely sent down clear signs. And for the disbelievers there will be a humiliating punishment.
On the Day when Allah will resurrect them all together, and will inform them of what they did; Allah has kept their complete record, while they have forgotten it. For Allah is Witness over all things.
Do you not see that Allah knows all that is in the heavens and all that is on earth? No secret consultation takes place between three, but He is their fourth, or between five, but He is their sixth, or between fewer or more than that, but He is with them wherever they may be. Then He will inform them of what they did on the Resurrection Day. Indeed, Allah is All-Knowing of everything.
Have you not seen those who were forbidden from holding secret talks, yet they go back to do what they were forbidden from, conspiring in sin and aggression, and in disobedience to the Messenger? When they come to you, they greet you other than the way Allah greets you, and they say to one another, “Why does Allah not punish us for what we say?” Sufficient is Hell for them; they will enter it. What a terrible destination!
O you who believe, when you hold secret talk, do not do so in sin and aggression, and in disobedience to the Messenger, rather do so in righteousness and piety. And fear Allah, to Whom you will be gathered.
Secret talks are only prompted by Satan to grieve the believers, but he cannot harm them in the least except with Allah’s permission. So let the believers put their trust in Allah.
O you who believe, when you are told to make room in your gatherings, then make room; Allah will give you abundance. And when you are told to rise, then rise; Allah will raise in ranks those who believed from among you and those who are given knowledge. And Allah is All-Aware of what you do.
O you who believe, when you consult the Messenger in private, give something in charity before your consultation; that is better for you and more conducive to purity. But if you do not have the means, then Allah is All-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
Are you afraid of giving charities before your consultations with him? If you are unable to do so, and Allah has pardoned you, then establish prayer and give zakah, and obey Allah and His Messenger. And Allah is All-Aware of what you do.
Do you not see those [hypocrites] who take as allies people who have incurred Allah’s wrath. They are neither of you nor of them, and they swear falsely while they know.
Allah has prepared for them a severe punishment. Evil is indeed what they do.
They have taken their oaths as a shield, in order to hinder people from the way of Allah. For them there will be a humiliating punishment.
Neither their wealth nor their children will avail them anything against Allah. They are the people of the Fire; they will abide therein forever.
On the Day when Allah will raise them all, they will swear to Him as they swear to you, thinking that they have something to stand on. Indeed, it is they who are the liars.
Satan has taken hold of them and has thus caused them to forget the remembrance of Allah. They are the party of Satan. Indeed, the party of Satan will be the losers.
Indeed, those who oppose Allah and His Messenger, they are among the most debased.
Allah has decreed, “I and My messengers will surely prevail.” Indeed, Allah is All-Powerful, All-Mighty.
You will not find any people who believe in Allah and the Last Day taking as allies those who oppose Allah and His Messenger, even if they were their parents, their children, their brothers, or their kindred. It is they in whose hearts Allah has instilled faith and strengthened them with a spirit from Him. He will admit them to gardens under which rivers flow, abiding therein forever. Allah is pleased with them and they are pleased with Allah. They are the party of Allah. Indeed, it is the party of Allah that will be the successful.
All that is in the heavens and all that is on earth glorifies Allah, for He is the All-Mighty, All-Wise.
He is the One who expelled the disbelievers of the People of the Book [Banī Nadīr] from their homes as the first banishment. You did not think that they would leave, and they thought that their fortresses would protect them from Allah. But [the punishment of] Allah came upon them from where they did not expect and He cast dread in their hearts, destroying their homes with their own hands and the hands of the believers. So take a lesson, O you people of insight.
Had Allah not decreed exile for them, He would have surely punished them in this world. And in the Hereafter, there will be for them the punishment of the Fire.
That is because they opposed Allah and His Messenger. And whoever opposes Allah, Allah is truly severe in punishment.
Whatever palm trees you cut down or left standing on their trunks, it was by Allah’s Will, so that He might disgrace the evildoers.
Whatever gains Allah has bestowed upon His Messenger from them, you did not spur on any horses or camels for that, but Allah gives authority to His messengers over whom He wills, and Allah is Most Capable of all things.
Whatever gains Allah has bestowed upon His Messenger from the people of the towns belongs to Allah and the Messenger, and to his close relatives, orphans, the needy, and stranded wayfarers, so that wealth should not circulate only among those of you who are rich. Whatever the Messenger gives you, accept it, and whatever he forbids you, refrain from it. And fear Allah; indeed, Allah is severe in punishment.
For the poor emigrants [there is a due share] who were driven out of their homes and their properties, seeking Allah’s bounty and pleasure, and helping the cause of Allah and His Messenger. It is they who are the truthful.
As for those who were settled in the city [of Madinah] and embraced Islam before them, they love those who migrated to them, and find no covetous desire in their hearts for what they were given. Rather they give them preference over themselves even though they may be in dire need. Whoever is protected from the covetousness of their souls, it is they who are successful.
And those who came after them say, “Our Lord, forgive us and our brethren who preceded us in faith, and do not let there be any ill feelings in our hearts towards those who believe. Our Lord, indeed, You are All-Gracious, Most Merciful.”
Have you not seen the hypocrites who say to their fellow disbelievers from the People of the Book, “If you are expelled, we will surely leave with you, and we will never obey anyone concerning you, and if you are attacked, we will surely come to your aid.” But Allah bears witness that they are truly liars.
If they are expelled, they will not leave with them, and if they are attacked, they will not come to their aid. Even if they come to their help, they will certainly turn and flee, then they will not be helped.
Indeed, your fear in their hearts is greater than their fear of Allah. That is because they are a people devoid of understanding.
They will not fight you all together but in fortified towns or from behind walls. Their valor among themselves is great; you think they are united, but their hearts are divided. That is because they are a people who do not understand.
They are like those who were shortly before them, who tasted the evil consequence of their deeds, and for them there will be a painful punishment.
They are like Satan when he says to man, “Disbelieve,” then when he disbelieves, he says, “I have nothing to do with you. I surely fear Allah, the Lord of the worlds.”
So they will both end up in the Fire, abiding therein forever. That is the recompense of the wrongdoers.
O you who believe, fear Allah, and let every soul consider what it has sent forth for tomorrow. And fear Allah. Indeed, Allah is All-Aware of what you do.
Do not be like those who forgot Allah, so He made them forget themselves. It is they who are the evildoers.
The people of Hell and the people of Paradise are not equal. It is the people of Paradise who will triumph.
Had We sent down this Qur’an upon a mountain, you would have seen it humbled and break asunder out of awe of Allah. Such are the similitudes We set forth for people so that they may reflect.
He is Allah; none has the right to be worshiped except Him, Knower of the unseen and the seen; He is the Most Compassionate, Most Merciful.
He is Allah; none has the right to be worshiped except Him, the Sovereign, the Most Holy, the Most Perfect, the Granter of Security, the Watcher over all, the All-Mighty, the Compeller, the Supreme. Glory be to Allah far above what they associate with Him.
He is Allah, the Creator, the Maker, the Fashioner. He has the most beautiful names. All that is in the heavens and earth glorifies Him, for He is the All-Mighty, All-Wise.
O you who believe, do not take My enemies and your enemies as allies, offering them friendship even though they rejected the truth that has come to you, and they have driven out the Messenger and yourselves [from Makkah] simply because you believe in Allah, your Lord – if you have emigrated to struggle in My cause and seek My pleasure. How can you disclose secrets [of the believers], showing them friendship, when I know best all that you conceal and all that you reveal? Whoever among you does that has truly strayed from the straight path.
If they gain upper hand over you, they would be your [open] enemies, and would stretch their hands and tongues towards you to harm you, and they wish that you would disbelieve.
Neither your relatives nor your children will benefit you on the Day of Resurrection; He will judge between you, and Allah is All-Seeing of what you do.
Indeed, you have a good example in Abraham and those with him, when they said to their people, “We dissociate ourselves from you and whatever you worship besides Allah. We renounce you, and the enmity and hatred have arisen between us and you forever until you believe in Allah alone”, except for Abraham when he said to his father, “I will seek forgiveness for you, but I cannot protect you from Allah in the least.” “Our Lord, in You we put our trust and to You we turn, and to You is the final return.”
Our Lord, do not make us subject to the persecution of those who disbelieve; and forgive us, our Lord. Indeed, You are the All-Mighty, All-Wise.”
You certainly have a good example in them, for those who look forward with hope to Allah and the Last Day. But whoever turns away, Allah is indeed the Self-Sufficient, Praiseworthy.
It may be that Allah will bring about friendship between you and those of them whom you hold as enemies. Allah is Most Capable, and Allah is All-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
Allah does not forbid you from being kind and just to those who did not fight against you nor did they drive you out of your homes. Indeed, Allah loves those who are just.
Allah only forbids you from taking as allies those who fought against you on account of your religion, and drove you out of your homes or helped others in driving you out. Whoever takes them as allies, it is they who are the wrongdoers.
O you who believe, when the believing women come to you as migrants, test their sincerity, although Allah knows best about their faith. Then if you find them to be believers, do not send them back to the disbelievers; they are not lawful [wives] for them, nor are they lawful [husbands] for them. But give the disbelievers whatever [dowries] they have spent. And there is no blame on you if you marry them, as long as you give them their dowries. Do not hold on to the marriage ties with the disbelieving women; ask for repayment of whatever [dowries] you have spent, and let the disbelievers ask for repayment of whatever [dowries] they have spent. This is the ruling of Allah that He judges between you, and Allah is All-Knowing, All-Wise.
If any of your wives desert you and join the disbelievers [without returning your dowries], and later you take spoils from them, then give to those whose wives have deserted them the equivalent of what they had spent. And fear Allah, in Whom you believe.
O Prophet, when the believing women come to you, pledging to you that they will not associate anything with Allah, that they will not steal, that they will not commit fornication, that they will not kill their children, that they will not falsely attribute [illegitimate] children to their husbands between their arms and their legs, that they will not disobey you in what is right, then accept their pledge and ask Allah to forgive them. Indeed, Allah is All-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
O you who believe, do not take as allies a people whom Allah is displeased with. They have lost hope in the Hereafter, just as the disbelievers have lost hope in those who are in the graves.
All that is in the heavens and all that is on earth glorifies Allah, for He is the All-Mighty, All-Wise.
O you who believe, why do you say what you do not do?
It is most loathsome to Allah that you say what you do not do.
Indeed, Allah loves those who fight in His way in firm ranks, as if they were a solid structure.
And [remember] when Moses said to his people, “O my people, why do you hurt me when you know that I am a messenger of Allah to you?” So when they chose to deviate, Allah let their hearts to deviate, for Allah does not guide the rebellious people.
And [remember] when Jesus, son of Mary, said, “O Children of Israel, I am truly a messenger of Allah to you, confirming the Torah which came before me, and giving glad tidings of a messenger after me whose name will be Ahmad.” But when he came to them with clear proofs, they said, “This is clear magic.”
Who could be more wrong than the one who fabricates lies against Allah when invited to Islam? And Allah does not guide the wrongdoing people.
They wish to extinguish the light of Allah with their mouths, but Allah will complete His light, even though the disbelievers dislike it.
He is the One Who has sent His Messenger with guidance and the religion of truth, so that He may make it prevail over all religions, even though the polytheists may dislike it.
O you who believe, shall I tell you about a trade that will save you from a painful punishment?
It is to believe in Allah and His Messenger, and struggle in the way of Allah with your wealth and your lives. That is better for you, if only you knew.
He will forgive you your sins and admit you to gardens under which rivers flow, and pleasant dwellings in gardens of perpetual residence. That is the supreme triumph.
And [He will grant you] another favor that you love: help from Allah and imminent conquest. Give glad tidings to the believers.
O you who believe, be supporters of Allah’s cause, as Jesus, son of Mary, said to the disciples, “Who will be my supporters for Allah’s cause?” The disciples said, “We are the supporters for Allah’s cause.” Then a group of the Children of Israel believed and another disbelieved. We then supported those who believed against their enemies, so they prevailed.
All that is in the heavens and all that is on earth glorifies Allah, the Sovereign, the Most Holy, the All-mighty, the All-Wise.
He is the One Who has sent among the unlettered [Arabs] a messenger from among themselves, reciting to them His verses and purifying them, and teaching them the Book and Wisdom [sunnah], although before that they were clearly misguided.
And [he is also sent] to others of them who have not yet joined them, and He is the All-Mighty, All-Wise.
That is the bounty of Allah that He gives to whom He wills, for Allah is the Lord of great bounty.
The similitude of those who were given the Torah but failed to uphold it, is like that of a donkey laden with volumes of books. How terrible is the similitude of those who reject the verses of Allah! And Allah does not guide the wrongdoing people.
Say, “O you who are Jews, if you claim that you alone are Allah’s allies without all other people, then wish for death, if you are truthful.
But they will never wish for it because of what their hands have sent forth. And Allah is All-Knowing of the wrongdoers.
Say, “The death from which you run away will surely overcome you, then you will be brought back to the Knower of the unseen and the seen, and He will inform you of what you used to do.”
O you who believe, when the call for prayer is made on Friday, then hasten to the remembrance of Allah and leave off trading. That is better for you, if only you knew.
When the prayer is over, disperse in the land and seek from the bounty of Allah, and remember Allah much so that you may be successful.
When they see some merchandise or amusement, they rush towards it and leave you standing. Say, “That which is with Allah is better than amusement and merchandise, and Allah is the Best Provider.”
When the hypocrites come to you, they say, “We bear witness that you are indeed the messenger of Allah” And Allah knows that you are indeed His Messenger, and Allah bears witness that the hypocrites are truly liars.
They have taken their oaths as a shield in order to hinder people from the way of Allah. Evil indeed is what they do!
That is because they believed, then disbelieved; therefore their hearts have been sealed, so they do not understand.
When you see them, their outward appearance pleases you, and when they speak, you listen to what they say. But they are like planks of wood leaned [against the wall]. They deem every cry to be against them. They are the enemy, so beware of them. May Allah destroy them; how are they deluded?
When it is said to them, “Come, so that the Messenger of Allah may seek forgiveness for you”, they shake their heads, and you see them turning away in arrogance.
It is the same to them whether you seek forgiveness for them or not, Allah will never forgive them. Indeed, Allah does not guide the wicked people.
They are those who say, “Do not spend on those who are with Allah’s Messenger so that they may disperse. But to Allah belong the treasures of the heavens and earth, but the hypocrites do not understand.
They say, “When we return to Madinah, the mightier will surely expel the weaker therefrom.” In fact, all might belongs to Allah and to His Messenger, and to the believers, but the hypocrites do not know.
O you who believe, do not let your wealth and your children distract you from Allah’s remembrance. For whoever does that, it is they who are the losers.
And spend from what We have provided for you before death comes to one of you, then he would say, “My Lord, If only You had delayed me for a short while, so that I would give in charity and be one of the righteous.”
But Allah will never delay a soul when its appointed time comes, and Allah is All-Aware of what you do.
All that is in the heavens and all that is in the earth glorifies Allah. To Him belongs the dominion, and to Him belongs all praise, and He is Most Capable of all things.
He is the One Who created you, yet some of you are disbelievers and some of you are believers. And Allah is All-Seeing of what you do.
He created the heavens and earth for a true purpose, He shaped you and perfected your form. And to Him is the final return.
He knows all that is in the heavens and earth, and He knows whatever you conceal and whatever you reveal. And Allah is All-Knowing of what is in the hearts.
Has there not come to you the stories of those who disbelieved before you? They tasted the evil consequence of their deeds, and for them there will be a painful punishment.
That is because their messengers came to them with clear proofs, but they said, “How can a human being guide us?” Thus they disbelieved and turned away, but Allah had no need for them, for Allah is Self-Sufficient, Praiseworthy.
The disbelievers claim that they will never be resurrected. Say, “Yes, by my Lord, you will surely be resurrected, then you will surely be informed of what you did. And that is easy for Allah.”
So believe in Allah and His Messenger, and in the Light [the Qur’an] that We have sent down. And Allah is All-Aware of what you do.
When He will gather you for the Gathering Day; that is the Day of great loss. But whoever believes in Allah and does righteous deeds, He will absolve them of their bad deeds and will admit them to gardens under which rivers flow, abiding therein forever. That is the supreme triumph.
As for those who disbelieve and reject Our verses, they will be the people of the Fire, abiding therein forever. What a terrible destination!
No calamity befalls except with Allah’s permission. Whoever believes in Allah, He will guide his heart. And Allah is All-Knowing of everything.
Obey Allah and obey the Messenger, but if you turn away, then the duty of Our Messenger is only to convey the message clearly.
Allah, none has the right to be worshiped except Him. So in Allah let the believers put their trust.
O you who believe, indeed, among your wives and your children are some who are enemies to you, so beware of them. But if you pardon and overlook, and forgive, then Allah is indeed All-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
Your wealth and your children are but a trial, and with Allah is a great reward.
So fear Allah as much as you can, listen and obey, and spend in charity; that is better for your souls. Whoever is protected from the stinginess of his soul, it is they who are successful.
If you lend Allah a goodly loan, He will multiply it for you and forgive you, for Allah is Most Appreciative, Most Forbearing,
Knower of the unseen and the seen, the All-Mighty, All-Wise.
O Prophet, when you [believers] divorce women, divorce them in [the start of] their waiting period and keep an accurate count of the waiting period, and fear Allah, your Lord. Do not force them out of their houses, nor should they leave unless they commit a clear shameful act. Such are the limits ordained by Allah. Whoever transgresses the limits ordained by Allah has truly wronged himself. You never know, perhaps Allah will bring about a change [of heart] later.
Then when they have approached the end of their waiting period, either retain them honorably or part with them honorably. Call two just men from among yourselves as witnesses, and give true testimony for the sake of Allah. This is an exhortation for those who believe in Allah and the Last Day. Whoever fears Allah, He will make a way out for him,
and He will provide for him from where he does not expect. Whoever puts his trust in Allah, He is sufficient for him. Indeed, Allah will surely accomplish His purpose, for Allah has set a destiny for everything.
As for those women from among you who reached their menopause, in case you doubt, their waiting period is three months, as well as of those who have not yet menstruated. As for pregnant women, their waiting period ends with delivery. And whoever fears Allah, He will make his matters easy for him.
This is the commandment of Allah that He has sent down to you. Whoever fears Allah, He will absolve him of his bad deeds and will reward him immensely.
Let them live where you live [during their waiting period], according to your means, and do not harass them to make their stay unbearable. If they are pregnant, maintain them until they deliver, and if they suckle your child, compensate them, and graciously settle the question of compensation by mutual understanding. But if you fail to reach an agreement, then another woman may suckle the child.
Let the wealthy man spend according to his means. As for the one with limited resources, he should spend according to whatever Allah has given him. Allah does not burden any soul beyond what He has given him. Allah will bring about ease after hardship.
And [imagine] how many towns rebelled against the commandments of their Lord and His messengers, so We called them to a severe account and punished them with a horrendous punishment.
Thus they tasted the evil consequence of their deeds, and the outcome of their deeds was a total loss.
Allah has prepared for them a severe punishment. So fear Allah O people of understanding who have faith. Allah has sent down to you a Reminder,
a messenger who recites to you the clear verses of Allah, so that He may bring those who believe and do righteous deeds out of depths of darkness into the light. Whoever believes in Allah and does righteous deeds, He will admit him to gardens under which rivers flow, abiding therein forever. Allah has prepared for him a good provision.
Allah is the One who has created seven heavens, and likewise for the earth. The Command descends between them so that you may know that Allah is Most Capable of all things, and that Allah has encompassed everything in knowledge.
O Prophet, why do you prohibit [yourself from] what Allah has made lawful to you, seeking to please your wives? Allah is All-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
Allah has ordained for you the way to absolve yourselves from your oaths. Allah is your Guardian, and He is All-Knowing, All-Wise.
And [remember] when the Prophet told one of his wives something in secret. Then when she disclosed it [to another wife], and Allah made it known to him, he told [the disclosing wife] part of what was disclosed and overlooked a part. When he informed her of that, she said, “Who informed you of this?” He said, “I was informed by the All-Knowing, All-Aware.
You both had better turn to Allah in repentance, for you have sinned. But if you insist on conspiring against him, then indeed Allah is his Protector, as well as Gabriel and the righteous believers, and moreover angels are his supporters.
Perhaps, if he were to divorce you all, that his Lord would replace you with better wives who are submissive to Allah, believers, obedient, repentant, devout in worship and fasting – previously married and virgins.
O you who believe, protect yourselves and your families from a Fire whose fuel is people and stones, and is overseen by rigorous and stern angels, who never disobey whatever Allah commands and do whatever they are commanded.
“O you who disbelieve, make no excuses this Day. You will only be recompensed for what you used to do.”
O you who believe, turn to Allah in sincere repentance. It may be that your Lord will absolve you of your bad deeds and admit you to gardens under which rivers flow, on the Day when Allah will not disgrace the Prophet and those who believed with him. Their light will stream ahead of them and on their right. They will say, “Our Lord, complete our light for us and forgive us, for You are Most Capable of all things.”
O Prophet, strive [and fight] against the disbelievers and the hypocrites, and be harsh with them. Their abode will be Hell. What a terrible destination!
Allah sets forth an example for the disbelievers: the wife of Noah and the wife of Lot, who were married to two of Our righteous slaves, but they betrayed them. Their husbands could not avail them anything against Allah, and they both were told, “Enter the Fire along with those who enter!”
And Allah sets forth an example for the believers: the wife of Pharaoh, who said, “My Lord, build for me a house in Paradise near You, save me from the Pharaoh and his [evil] deeds, and save me from the wrongdoing people.”
Also [the example of] Mary, daughter of ‘Imrān who guarded her chastity, so We breathed into her through Our angel [Gabriel], and she firmly believed in the words of her Lord and His Scriptures, and was one of the obedient.
Blessed is He in Whose hand is the dominion, and He is Most Capable of all things.
Who created death and life to test you as to which of you is best in deeds, and He is the All-Mighty, Most Forgiving.
Who created seven heavens one above another; you will not see any imperfection in the creation of the Most Compassionate. Look again; can you see any flaw?
Then look again and again; your sight will turn back to you humbled and weary.
We have adorned the lowest heaven with lamps and have made them as missiles to stone the devils, and We have prepared for them the punishment of the Blazing Fire.
For those who disbelieve in their Lord there will be the punishment of Hell. What a terrible destination!
When they are thrown in it, they will hear its roaring as it boils up,
almost bursting in fury. Every time a group is thrown in it, its keepers will ask them, “Did there not come to you a warner?”
They will say, “Yes, a warner did come to us, but we denied and said, ‘Allah has not sent down anything; you are greatly misguided.’”
And they will say, “If only we had listened or understand, we would not be among the dwellers of the Blazing Fire.”
Thus they will confess their sins. So away with the dwellers of the Blazing Fire!
Indeed, those who fear their Lord unseen will have forgiveness and a great reward.
Whether you speak secretly or openly, He is All-Knowing of that which is in the hearts.
Does He not know His Own creation, when He is the Most Subtle, All-Aware?
He is the One Who made the earth smooth for you, so travel through its regions and eat from His provisions. And to Him is the resurrection.
Do you feel secure that He Who is in the heaven will not cause the earth to swallow you up, as suddenly it would begin shaking?
Do you feel secure that He Who is in the heaven will not send against you a storm of stones? Only then would you know how [serious] My warning was!
Those who came before them rejected [the messengers]; then how severe was My response!
Do they not see the birds above them, spreading out and folding in their wings? None holds them up except the Most Compassionate. He is indeed All-Seeing of everything.
Which of your army can come to your aid against the Most Compassionate? The disbelievers are in utter delusion.
Who is there to give you provision if He withholds His provision? Yet they persist in arrogance and aversion.
Who is better guided: the one who walks stumbling and falling on his face or the one who walks upright on a straight path?
Say, “He is the One Who brought you into being and gave you hearing, sight, and hearts; little do you give thanks.”
Say, “He is the One Who has dispersed you throughout the earth, and to Him you will be gathered.”
They say: “When will this promise come to pass, if you are truthful?”
Say, “That knowledge is with Allah alone, and I am only a clear warner.”
Then when they see it approaching closer, the faces of the disbelievers will be distressed, and it will be said, “This is what you were asking for.”
Say, “What do you think, if Allah causes me and those who are with me to die or shows us mercy, who will save the disbelievers from a painful punishment?”
Say, “He is the Most Compassionate; we believe in Him and put our trust in Him. You will come to know who is clearly misguided.”
Say, “What do you think, if your water were to sink deep into the earth, who can bring you flowing water?”
Nūn. By the pen and what they write,
By the grace of your Lord [O Prophet], you are not madman.
You will surely have a never-ending reward.
Indeed, you are of a great moral character.
Soon you will see and they will see,
which of you is afflicted with madness.
Indeed, your Lord alone knows best who has strayed from His way and those who are rightly guided.
So do not obey the deniers.
They wish that you would compromise so they would too compromise.
And do not obey every disgraceful swearer,
backbiter, gossip-monger,
withholder of good, transgressor, sinful,
coarse, and furthermore, an illegitimate child.
Simply because he has wealth and children,
When Our verses are recited to him, he says, “Ancient fables!”
We will soon brand him on the snout.
Indeed, We have tested them [the Makkans] as We tested the people of the garden, when they swore to harvest its fruits in the early morning,
and made no exception [by saying: if Allah wills].
Then it was struck by an affliction from your Lord while they were asleep,
and it turned to ashes as black as night.
Then in the early morning they called out to one another:
“Go early to your garden if you really wish to harvest.”
So they set out, whispering to one another,
“Not a single poor person should enter your garden today.”
And they left early, fully determined to stick to their plan.
But when they saw the garden, they said, “We must have lost our way!
Rather, we have been deprived.”
The best among them said, “Did I not say to you to glorify Allah?”
They said, “Glory be to our Lord! We were truly wrongdoers.”
Then they turned to one another, throwing blame.
They said, “Woe to us! We were surely transgressors.
Our Lord may give us something better than this. We certainly turn to our Lord in hope.”
Such is the punishment [in this world]; but the punishment of the Hereafter is far worse, if only they knew.
Indeed, the righteous will have gardens of bliss with their Lord.
Should We then treat Muslims like the wicked?
What is the matter with you that you make such a judgment?
Or do you have a scripture in which you read
that you will be given whatever you choose?
Or do you have a solemn promise binding upon Us until the Day of Resurrection, that you will have whatever you decide for yourselves ?
Ask them which of them can guarantee that.
Or do they have associate-gods? Then let them bring forth their associate-gods, if they are truthful.
On the Day when the Shin [of Allah] will be uncovered, and they are invited to prostrate, they will not be able to do so.
Their eyes will be downcast and they will be overwhelmed with humiliation, for they were invited to prostrate when they were capable [but they refused].
So leave to Me those who reject this message [O Prophet]. We will gradually lead them to their ruin in ways that they do not perceive.
I will give them respite, but My plan is firm.
Or are you asking them for a reward, so they find it too burdensome?
Or do they have knowledge of the unseen, so they write it down?
So be patient with the decree of your Lord, and do not be like [Jonah], the man of Whale, when he cried out in anguish.
Had it not been for the grace that he received from his Lord, he would have surely been thrown at the barren shore, blameworthy.
But his Lord chose him, and made him one of the righteous.
The disbelievers would almost strike you down with their malicious gazes when they hear the Reminder, and they say, “He is certainly mad.”
But it is nothing other than a reminder to the whole world.
The Inevitable Hour!
What is the Inevitable Hour?
How do you know what the Inevitable Hour is?
Thamūd and ‘Ād denied the striking calamity of the Hour.
As for Thamūd, they were destroyed by a dreadful blast.
And as for ‘Ād, they were destroyed by a furious windstorm
which He unleashed against them for seven successive nights and eight days, so you would see the people lying dead as if they were hollow trunks of palm trees.
Do you see any trace of them now?
Also Pharaoh and those who came before him, and the overturned cities [of Lot] committed grave sin,
each disobeying the messenger of their Lord, so He seized them with a severe punishment.
Indeed, when the floodwater overflowed, We carried you [O humans] in the sailing Ark,
so that We might make it a reminder for you, and that attentive ears may take heed.
Then when the Trumpet is blown with a single blast,
and the earth and mountains are lifted up and crushed with a single blow,
on that Day the Inevitable Event will occur.
And the sky will split asunder and will be frail on that day,
with the angels on all its sides, and on that Day, eight [mighty angels] will bear the Throne of your Lord above them.
On that day, you will be brought forth [before Allah], and none of your secrets will remain hidden.
As for the one who is given his Record in his right hand, he will say, “Here is my Record, read it!
I was sure that I would meet my reckoning.”
So he will be in a pleasant life,
in a lofty garden,
with clustered fruit within his reach.
[They will be told,] “Eat and drink joyfully for what you did in the days gone by.”
As for the one who is given his Record in his left hand, he will say, “Would that I had not been given my Record,
nor had I known anything of my reckoning!
Would that it [death] had been the end of me!
My wealth has been of no avail to me.
My authority has vanished.”
[It will be said,] “Seize him and shackle him,
then make him burn in the Blazing Fire,
then tie him up with chain of seventy cubits long.
For he did not believe in Allah, the Most Great,
nor did he encourage feeding the needy.
So Today he will have no close friend here,
nor any food except the discharge of wounds,
none will eat it except the sinners.”
I swear by what you can see.
and what you cannot see!
Indeed, this is the word of a noble Messenger,
and it is not the word of a poet; little do you believe!
Nor is it the word of a soothsayer; little do you take heed!
It is a revelation from the Lord of the worlds.
If he had falsely attributed something to Us,
We would have surely seized him by the right hand,
then severed his aorta,
and none of you could have rescued him.
This [Qur’an] is indeed a reminder for those who are righteous.
And We surely know that some of you will be deniers,
and it will certainly be a source of regret for the disbelievers.
And this is indeed the absolute truth.
So glorify the name of your Lord, the Most Great.
A challenger asked for a punishment bound to come
upon the disbelievers, which none can avert,
from Allah, Lord of the pathways of ascent,
by which the angels and the Spirit will ascend to Him on a Day the length of which is fifty thousand years.
So be patient [O Prophet] with beautiful patience.
Indeed, they see this [punishment] far off,
but We see it to be close at hand.
On the Day when the sky will be like molten brass
and the mountains will be like dyed wool,
and no close friend will ask about another,
even though they will be within sight of one another. The wicked will wish he could ransom himself from the punishment of that Day by offering his children,
and his wife and his brother,
and his kindred who stood by him,
and everyone on earth, just to save himself.
By no means! It is a raging Flame,
that will strip off the scalps.
It will call everyone who turned their backs and disobeyed,
and amassed and hoarded wealth.
Indeed, man was created impatient:
when evil befalls him, he bewails,
but when good fortune comes his way, he becomes tight-fisted –
except those who pray,
who are steadfast in their prayers;
and who give a due share of their wealth
to the beggar and the dispossessed;
and who firmly believe in the Day of Judgment;
and those who fear the punishment of their Lord –
for none can feel secure from their Lord’s punishment –
and those who guard their private parts,
except from their wives or bondwomen whom they own, for then they are not to be blamed.
But whoever seeks beyond that, it is they who are the transgressors.
and those who fulfill their trusts and pledges;
and who are upright in their testimonies;
and who take due care of their prayers;
they will be honored in gardens.
What is the matter with the disbelievers that they are rushing towards you [O Prophet],
from the right and from the left, in crowds?
Does everyone of them aspire to enter a garden of bliss?
By no means! We have created them from what they know.
I swear by the Lord of the sunrises and sunsets that We are surely Capable
to replace them with others better than them, and none can escape Our decree.
So leave them to engage in their falsehoos and amuse themselves until they meet their Day which they are promised;
the Day when they will rush out of their graves as if they are racing towards a goal,
with their eyes downcast and overwhelmed with disgrace. That is the Day that they were promised.
Indeed, We sent Noah to his people, “Warn your people before there comes to them a painful punishment.”
He said: “O my people, indeed I am a clear warner to you,
that you worship Allah and fear Him, and obey me;
He will forgive you some of your sins and grant you respite until an appointed term. Indeed, when Allah’s appointed term comes, it cannot be delayed, if you only knew!”
He said, “My Lord, I have surely called my people night and day,
but my call only drove them further away.
Every time I call them so that You may forgive them, they thrust their fingers into their ears and cover their faces with their garments, and persist in obstinacy and grow extremely arrogant.
Then I called them openly,
then I addressed them in public and in private,
I said, ‘Seek forgiveness from your Lord. Indeed, He is Most Forgiving.
He will shower you with abundant rain from the sky,
and He will give you wealth and children, and bestow upon you gardens and rivers.
What is the matter with you that you do not fear the Majesty of Allah,
when He has created you in stages?
Do you not see how Allah has created seven heavens, one above another,
and has placed the moon therein as a light and the sun as a burning lamp?
Allah has produced you from the earth like a plant,
then He will return you into it, and then will bring you out again.
Allah has made the earth wide spread for you
so that you may tread its spacious paths.’”
Noah said, “My Lord, they have disobeyed me and followed those whose wealth and children did not increase them except in loss.
They have contrived a mighty plot,
They said, ‘Do not abandon your gods; and do not abandon Wadd, Suwā‘, Yaghūth, Ya‘ūq, and Nasr.’
They have led many astray. So [O Lord], do not increase the wrongdoers except in error.”
Because of their sins they were drowned and then were cast into the Fire, and they did not find any helpers against Allah.
Noah said, “My Lord, do not leave on earth a single disbeliever.
For if You leave them, they will surely lead Your slaves astray and beget none but wicked disbelievers.
My Lord, Forgive me and my parents, and whoever enters my house as a believer, and all the believing men and women, and do not increase the wrongdoers except in ruin.”
Say, “It has been revealed to me that a group of jinn listened [to the Qur’an,] and they said, ‘Indeed, we have heard a wondrous recitation
that guides to the right way, so we have believed in it, and we will never associate anyone with our Lord.
And that He – our exalted and glorified Lord – has neither taken a wife nor a child;
and that the fool among us [Satan] used to say outrageous things about Allah,
although we thought that humans and jinn would never tell lies about Allah.
And there were some men who used to seek refuge with some jinn, but they only increased them in burden.
They thought, just like you [jinn] thought that Allah would never send any messenger.
We have sought to reach the heaven but found it filled with stern guards and flaming fire.
We used to take up positions there for eavesdropping, but now anyone who eavesdrops will find a flaming fire waiting for him.
We do not know whether evil is intended for those on earth, or their Lord intends good for them.
Among us are some who are righteous and some who are otherwise, for we follow divergent ways.
We have realized that we can never escape Allah on earth, nor can we ever escape Him by fleeing.
When we heard the guidance [of the Qur’an], we believed in it. Whoever believes in his Lord will have no fear of curtailment [from his reward] or injustice.
Among us are some who are Muslims and some who are deviant. Those who accepted Islam have sought the true guidance,
but those who are deviant, they will be fuel for Hell.’”
“If they had remained steadfast on the right way, We would have given them abundant rain,
as a test for them. But whoever turns away from the remembrance of his Lord, He will make him suffer an arduous punishment.
The mosques are for Allah alone, so do not supplicate anyone along with Allah.
Yet when the slave of Allah stood up supplicating Him, they swarmed around him.”
Say [O Prophet], “I only supplicate my Lord and I do not associate anyone with Him.”
Say, “I have no power to harm or benefit you.”
Say, “None can ever protect me from Allah [if I should disobey Him], nor can I ever find a refuge other than Him.
I only convey what I receive from Allah and His messages.” And whoever disobeys Allah and His Messenger will certainly be in the Fire of Hell, abiding therein forever.
Until when they see what they were promised, they will realize who is weaker in helpers and fewer in number.
Say, “I do not know if what you are promised is near or my Lord has appointed a distant time for it.
[He is] Knower of the unseen, He does not reveal His unseen to anyone,
except the messenger whom He chooses, then He appoints angel-guards before him and behind him
to ensure that the messengers fully conveyed the messages of their Lord. He encompasses in His knowledge all about them, and keeps count of all things.”
O you the enwrapped one,
Stand up in prayer at night except a little,
half of it, or a little less,
or a little more, and recite the Qur’an at a measured pace.
We will send down upon you a heavy revelation.
Indeed, prayer at night is more effective and more conducive to proper recitation.
In daytime, you have plenty of time for your worldly matters.
And remember the name of your Lord, and devote yourself completely to Him.
[He is] Lord of the east and the west; none has the right to be worshiped except Him, so take Him as Disposer of your affairs.
Bear patiently what they say, and avoid them in a gracious manner.
Leave to Me the deniers who are having a life of luxury, and bear with them for a little while.
Indeed, We have heavy shackles and a Blazing Fire,
and food that chokes, and a painful punishment,
on the Day when the earth and the mountains will convulse, and the mountains will be like dunes of loose sand.
Indeed, We have sent to you a messenger to be a witness over you, just as We sent to Pharaoh a messenger.
But Pharaoh disobeyed the messenger, so We seized him with a severe punishment.
If you disbelieve, then how will you protect yourselves against a Day that will turn children’s hair gray?
It will cause the sky to break asunder. His promise will certainly be fulfilled.
Indeed, this is a reminder; so whoever wills may take a way to his Lord.
Indeed, your Lord knows that you [O Prophet] stand up in prayer for nearly two-thirds of the night, or half of it, or one-third of it, as do others among your Companions. Allah determines the night and the day; He knows that you [O Muslims] cannot keep an accurate count of it, so He pardoned you. Recite then as much of the Qur’an as is easy for you [in the night prayers]. He knows that there are some among you who will be ill, and others traveling in the land, seeking the grace of Allah, and others fighting in Allah’s way. So recite as much of it as is easy for you; establish prayer and give zakah; and lend to Allah a goodly loan. Whatever good you send forth for yourselves, you will find it with Allah, much better in condition and much greater in reward. And seek forgiveness of Allah, for indeed Allah is All-Forgiving, Most-Merciful.
O you who are covered [in your cloak],
arise and warn,
and proclaim the greatness of your Lord,
and purify your garments,
and shun idol worshiping,
and do not do a favor for a greater return,
and be patient for the sake of your Lord.
When the Trumpet is sounded,
that Day will be a difficult day,
not easy for the disbelievers.
Leave me alone to deal with the one whom I created,
and gave him abundant wealth,
and sons by his side,
and gave him a life of comfort and power,
yet he aspires that I should give him more.
By no means! For he has been stubborn against Our verses.
I will subject him to an unbearable punishment.
For he reflected and plotted [against the Qur’an].
May he perish, how he plotted!
Again, may he perish, how he plotted!
Then he looked around,
then he frowned and scowled,
then turned away with arrogance,
then said, “This is nothing but magic from the past.
This is nothing but the words of a man.”
Soon I will make him burn in the Scorching Fire.
How do you know what Scorching Fire is?
It leaves nothing and spares no one,
scorching the skin.
It is overseen by nineteen [angels].
We have only appointed angels as keepers of the Fire, and We have only made their number as a test for the disbelievers, so that those who were given the Scripture may have certainty and the believers may increase in faith; and neither those who were given the Scripture nor the believers may have any doubts; and so that those [hypocrites] in whose hearts is sickness and the disbelievers may say, “What does Allah mean by this number?” Thus Allah causes to stray whom He wills and guides whom He wills, and none knows the soldiers of your Lord but He. This is but a reminder to mankind.
No indeed! By the moon,
and by the night when it departs,
and by the dawn when it brightens,
Hellfire is indeed one of the greatest matters,
a warning to mankind,
to whoever among you chooses to advance or regress.
Every soul is held in pledge for its deeds,
except the People of the Right,
who will be in gardens, asking one another
about the wicked:
“What brought you to Hell?”
They will say, “We were not among those who prayed,
nor did we feed the poor,
and we indulged in falsehood along with those who indulged in it,
and we denied the Day of Judgment,
until the certainty [of death] came to us.”
So the intercession of intercessors will not benefit them.
Then what is the matter with them that they turn away from the Reminder,
as if they were terrified wild asses,
fleeing from a lion?
In fact, each one of them desires that open [divine] letters be sent to each of them.
By no means! They rather do not fear the Hereafter.
No indeed! This [Qur’an] is a reminder.
So whoever wills may take heed.
But they will not take heed unless Allah so wills. He is most worthy to be feared and most worthy to forgive.
I swear by the Day of Resurrection,
and I swear by the self-reproaching soul!
Does man think that We cannot reassemble his bones?
In fact, We are able to restore even his very fingertips.
But man desires to persists in his evil ways,
and asks [derisively], “When is the Day of Resurrection?”
But when eyes are dazzled,
and the moon is darkened,
and the sun and the moon are brought together,
on that Day man will say, “Where is the escape?”
No indeed! There will be no refuge.
On that Day all will end up before your Lord.
On that Day man will be informed of what he has sent forth and left behind.
In fact, man will be a witness against himself,
despite the excuses he may put forward.
Do not move your tongue [O Prophet] in haste trying to memorize it.
It is upon Us to make you memorize and recite it.
Then when We recite it [through Gabriel], follow its recitation attentively;
then it is upon Us to explain its meanings.
No indeed! You [people] love this fleeting world,
and neglect the Hereafter.
On that Day some faces will be bright,
looking at their Lord.
And on that day, some faces will be gloomy,
knowing that a crushing calamity will befall them.
Indeed, when the soul reaches the throat,
and it is said, “Is there any healer?”
And he realizes that it is time to depart,
when legs are brought together [in a shroud];
on that Day, he will be driven to your Lord.
He neither believed nor prayed;
rather he denied and turned away,
then went swaggering to his people,
Woe to you [O man], and woe!
Again, woe to you, and woe!
Does man think that he will be left neglected?
Was he not once a drop of semen emitted,
then he became a clinging clot, then He created him and perfected his form,
and made from him both genders, male and female?
Is not He able to bring the dead back to life?
Was there not a period of time when man was not a thing [even] mentioned?
Indeed, We created man from a drop of mixed fluids, in order to test him. So We gave him hearing and sight.
Indeed, We showed him the way, whether he is grateful or ungrateful.
We have surely prepared for the disbelievers chains, shackles, and a Blazing Fire.
Indeed, the righteous will drink from a cup [of wine] flavored with camphor,
a spring from which Allah’s slaves will drink, which will flow as they wish.
They fulfill their vows and fear a Day whose evil will spread far and wide,
and they give food, despite their love for it, to the needy, the orphans, and the captives,
[saying to themselves] “We feed you only for the sake of Allah; we seek from you neither reward nor gratitude.
We fear from our Lord a grim and distressful Day.”
So Allah will protect them from the evil of that Day, and will grant them radiance and delight,
and will reward them for their perseverance with Paradise and garments of silk.
They will recline therein on adorned couches; neither feeling scorching heat nor freezing cold.
with shady branches spread above them, and clusters of fruit will be made within their reach.
They will be served frequently with silver vessels and crystal cups,
crystalline goblets of silver, filled precisely as desired.
They will be given a glass [of wine] flavored with ginger
from a spring therein called Salsabīl.
They will be served by eternal young boys; if you see them, you would think that they are scattered pearls.
If you were to look around, you would see bliss and a vast dominion.
They will be dressed in garments of fine green silk and rich brocade, and will be adorned with bracelets of silver, and their Lord will give them a pure drink.
[And they will be told,] “Indeed, this is your reward, and your efforts have been appreciated.”
Indeed, it is We Who have sent down the Qur’an to you in stages.
So be patient with your Lord’s decree, and do not obey any sinner or disbeliever from among them.
And remember the name of your Lord morning and evening,
and prostrate to Him at night, and glorify Him long at night.
Indeed, these [pagans] love this fleeting life and pay no heed to a heavy Day ahead of them.
It is We Who created them and strengthened their built. If We will, We can replace them with others like them.
Indeed, this is a reminder; so let anyone who wills may take a way to his Lord.
But you cannot will unless Allah wills. Indeed, Allah is All-Knowing, All-Wise.
He admits whom He wills into His mercy, but for the wrongdoers He has prepared a painful punishment.
By those [winds] sent forth in succession,
those that blow violently,
and scatter [rainclouds] far and wide,
And by those [angels] who bring criterion;
and those who deliver revelation,
leaving no excuse or giving warning –
what you are promised will surely come to pass.
So when the stars are extinguished,
and when the sky is split apart,
and when the mountains are blown away,
and when the messengers are summoned,
until which Day has all this been postponed?
Until the Day of Judgment.
How do you know what the Day of Judgment is?
Woe on that Day to the deniers!
Did We not destroy the earlier nations?
Then We will do likewise to the later ones.
This is how We deal with the wicked.
Woe on that Day to the deniers!
Did We not create you from a worthless fluid,
then We placed it in a secure repository
for a determined period?
For We determined it; How excellently We determine!
Woe on that Day to the deniers!
Have We not made the earth a receptacle
for the living and the dead,
and placed therein firm towering mountains, and given you fresh water to drink?
Woe on that Day to the deniers!
[They will be told,] “Proceed to that [Fire] which you used to deny!
Proceed to the shadow [of smoke] ascending in three columns,
that provides neither shade nor protection from the flames.
Indeed, it [Hell] throws up sparks as big as castles,
as if they were tawny camels.
Woe on that Day to the deniers!
On that Day they won’t speak,
nor will they be allowed to make excuses.
Woe on that Day to the deniers!
[They will be told,] “This is the Day of Judgment: We have gathered you along with the earlier generations.
So if you have any scheme, then plot it against Me.”
Woe on that Day to the deniers!
Indeed, the righteous will be amid shades and springs
and will have whatever fruit they desire.
[They will be told,] “Eat and drink joyfully, as a reward for what you used to do.”
This is how We reward those who do good.
Woe on that Day to the deniers!
“Eat and enjoy yourselves for a while; you are truly wicked.”
Woe on that Day to the deniers!
When it is said to them, “Bow [in prayer]”, they do not bow.
Woe on that Day to the deniers!
In which message after this [Qur’an] will they believe?
What are they asking one another about?
About the momentous tidings,
about which they differ.
No indeed; they will come to know.
Again no; they will come to know.
Have We not made the earth a resting place?
And the mountains as stakes,
and created you in pairs,
and made your sleep for rest,
and made the night a covering,
and made the day for seeking livelihood,
and built above you seven mighty heavens,
and made therein a blazing lamp,
and sent down from the rainclouds abundant water,
so that We may produce thereby grains and vegetation,
and gardens with dense foliage?
Indeed, the Day of Judgment is a time appointed,
the Day when the Trumpet will be blown, you will come forth in crowds,
and the sky will be opened up and will become gateways,
and the mountains will vanish, becoming like a mirage.
Indeed, Hell is lying in wait,
a resort for the transgressors,
wherein they will abide for endless ages.
They will neither taste therein any coolness nor any drink,
except scalding water and discharge of wounds,
a fitting recompense.
Indeed, they did not expect a reckoning,
and utterly rejected Our verses.
But We have enumerated everything in a record.
So taste [the punishment], for We will not increase you except in torment.”
Indeed, the righteous will have salvation,
gardens and vineyards,
and youthful maidens of equal age,
and a full cup [of wine].
They will not hear therein vain talk or lies –
a reward and a generous gift from your Lord,
[from] the Lord of the heavens and earth and all that is between them, the Most Compassionate; none will dare to speak to Him.
On the Day when the Spirit and the angels will stand in rows; none will dare to speak, except those to whom the Most Compassionate granted permission, and they will say what is right.
That Day is sure to come. So whoever wills may seek a path leading to his Lord.
Indeed, We have warned you of an imminent punishment on the Day when everyone will see what his hands have sent forth, and the disbeliever will say, “Oh, I wish that I were dust!”
By those who pull out [evil souls] harshly,
and by those who draw out [good souls] gently,
and by those who glide swiftly,
and those who overtake one another as in a race,
and those who carry out the command [of Allah],
on the Day when the earth convulses [by the first Blast],
followed by the second Blast,
hearts will be pounding on that Day,
and their eyes will be downcast.
They say, “Will we be brought back to life,
after we have turned into decayed bones?”
They say, “Then that would surely be a losing return!”
It will only be a single Blast,
then they will immediately be above the ground.
Has there come to you the story of Moses,
when his Lord called out to him at the sacred valley of Tuwa?
[Saying,] “Go to Pharaoh, for he has transgressed all bounds”.
And say: ‘Are you willing to be purified,
and I will guide you to your Lord so that you may fear Him?’”
Then Moses showed him the greatest sign.
But Pharaoh denied it and disobeyed.
Then he turned back striving to plot.
He gathered [his people] and proclaimed,
saying, “I am your lord, the most high.”
So Allah seized him for an exemplary punishment in this life and in the Hereafter.
Indeed, there is a lesson in this for those who fear Allah.
Are you more difficult to create or the heaven that He built?
He raised it high and proportioned it,
and darkened its night and brought forth its daylight.
And thereafter He spread out the earth,
brought forth from it its water and its pasture,
and set the mountains firmly,
as a provision for you and your grazing livestock.
But when the Supreme Calamity comes,
on that Day man will remember all what he did,
and the Blazing Fire will be exposed for all to see.
As for those who transgressed,
and preferred the life of this world,
the Blazing Fire will be their abode.
But those who feared standing before their Lord and restrained themselves from evil desires,
Paradise will surely be their abode.
They ask you concerning the Hour, “When will it be?”
How could you possibly mention that?
Its knowledge rests only with your Lord.
You are only a warner for those who fear it.
On the Day when they see it, it will be as if they had remained [in this world] no more than an evening or a morning.
He frowned and turned away,
when the blind man came to him.
How would you know? Perhaps he might be purified,
or he might take heed and benefit from the reminder?
But he who was indifferent,
you give him your full attention,
although you are not to be blamed if he does not purify himself.
But as for the one who came to you striving [for purification],
and he fears Allah,
you let yourself to be distracted from him.
No indeed; this is a reminder –
so whoever wills may give heed to it –
on venerable pages,
exalted and purified,
[preserved] in the hands of angel-scribes,
honorable and obedient.
Woe to man; how ungrateful he is!
From what did He create him?
He created him from a drop of semen and proportioned him,
then He made the way easy for him;
then He caused him to die and be buried;
then when He wills, He will resurrect him.
Yet he has not fulfilled what He commanded him.
Let man consider the food he eats:
How We poured down rainwater in torrents,
and caused the soil to split open [for sprouts],
and cause grains to grow in it,
as well as grapes and fodder,
and olive trees and date palms,
and dense orchards,
and fruits and grass,
as provision for you and your livestock.
But when the Deafening Blast comes,
on that Day everyone will flee from his sibling,
and from his mother and father,
and from his wife and children.
On that day, everyone will have enough concern of his own.
On that Day, some faces will be bright,
cheerful and rejoicing;
while other faces will be dust-stained,
covered in darkness.
Such are the disbelievers, the wicked.
When the sun is wrapped up in darkness,
and when the stars are scattered,
and when the mountains are vanished,
and when pregnant camels are left unattended,
and when wild beasts are gathered,
and when the seas are set on fire,
and when the souls are sorted,
and when the baby girl buried alive is asked,
for what crime she was killed,
and when records of deeds are spread open,
and when the sky is stripped away,
and when the Blazing Fire is flared up,
and when Paradise is brought near –
then every soul will know what it has brought about.
I swear by the receding stars,
that rise and hide,
and by the night as it departs,
and by the day as it breaks –
Indeed, this [Qur’an] is a word conveyed by a noble angel-messenger.
extremely powerful, highly revered with the Lord of the Throne,
obeyed [by other angels] and moreover, trustworthy.
Your fellow [the Prophet] is not madman.
He indeed saw him [Gabriel] on the clear horizon.
He does not withhold [knowledge of] the unseen.
This [Qur’an] is not the word of an accursed devil.
So which way are you going?
It is but a reminder to the worlds,
for those among you who wish to take the straight path.
But you cannot wish except by the Will of Allah, the Lord of the worlds.
When the sky breaks apart.
and when the stars fall, scattered,
and when the seas burst forth,
and when the graves are overturned,
then each soul will come to know what it has done and what it has left undone.
O mankind, what has lured you away from your Lord, the Most Generous,
Who created you, then shaped and proportioned you,
and assembled you in whatever form He willed?
No indeed; but you deny the Judgment Day,
while there are watchers over you,
honorable scribes,
who know whatever you do.
Indeed, the righteous will be in bliss,
and the wicked will be in the Blazing Fire,
which they will enter on Judgment Day,
and will never come out of it.
How do you know what Judgment Day is?
Again, how do you know what Judgment Day is?
It is the Day when no soul will be of any help to another, and all command on that Day will be with Allah.
Woe to the defrauders,
those who take full measure when they take from others,
but they give less when they measure or weigh for them.
Do they really not think that they will be resurrected
for a momentous Day,
a Day when people will stand before the Lord of the worlds?
No indeed! The record of the wicked is surely in Sijjīn.
How do you know what Sijjīn is?
It is a clearly inscribed record.
Woe on that Day to the deniers,
those who deny the Judgment Day!
None denies it except every sinful transgressor.
When Our verses are recited to him, he says, “Ancient fables!”
No indeed! Their hearts have been stained by what they used to commit!
No indeed! On that Day they will be barred from seeing their Lord.
They will then surely enter the Blazing Fire,
then they will be told, “This is what you used to deny.”
No indeed! The record of the righteous is certainly in ‘illiyyīn –
and how do you know what ‘illiyyūn is? –
It is a record inscribed,
witnessed by those who are close to Allah.
Indeed, the righteous will be in bliss,
seated on the couches, gazing in wonder.
You will see on their faces the radiance of bliss.
They will be served to drink pure wine from a sealed container,
whose last sip is musk – let those who strive, strive for that –
and it will be mixed with water from the spring of Tasnīm,
a spring from which those who are close to Allah will drink.
Indeed, the wicked used to laugh at the believers;
when they passed by them, they would wink at one another,
and when they went back to their people, they would return exulting.
When they saw the believers, they would say, “These people are truly misguided,”
although they were not sent as their keepers.
So Today the believers will laugh at the disbelievers,
while sitting on the couches, gazing around.
Have the disbelievers been rewarded except for what they used to do?
When the sky is rent asunder,
and hearkens to its Lord, as it must,
and when the earth is leveled out,
and casts out all what it contains, and becomes empty,
and hearkens to its Lord, as it must,
O humans, you are toiling towards your Lord, and you will surely meet Him.
Whoever is given his record in his right hand,
he will have an easy reckoning,
and he will return to his people joyfully.
But whoever is given his record from behind his back,
he will call out for destruction,
and he will enter the Blazing Fire.
Indeed, he used to live among his people joyfully.
and he thought that he would never return [to Allah].
Indeed he will! His Lord was always watching him.
Indeed, I swear by the twilight,
and by the night and what it covers,
and by the moon when it becomes full,
You will surely pass from one stage to another.
Then what is the matter with them that they do not believe,
and when the Qur’an is recited to them, they do not prostrate?
Rather, the disbelievers persist in denying it,
but Allah knows best whatever they harbor in their hearts.
So give them the tidings of a painful punishment.
But those who believe and do righteous deeds will have a never-ending reward.
By the sky full of constellations,
and by the promised Day,
and by the witness and the witnessed,
cursed be the makers of the trench,
the fire full of fuel,
when they sat around it,
and were witnessing what they did to the believers.
Their only grievance against them was that they believed in Allah, the All-Mighty, the Praiseworthy,
to Whom belongs the dominion of the heavens and earth, and Allah is Witness over all things.
Indeed, for those who tortured the believing men and women, then did not repent, there will be the punishment of Hell and the punishment of the burning fire.
But those who believed and did righteous deeds will certainly have gardens under which rivers flow; that is the great triumph.
Indeed, the punishment of you Lord is severe.
Indeed, it is He Who originates [the creation] then repeat it,
and He is the All-Forgiving, the Most Affectionate,
the Lord of the Glorious Throne;
He does whatever He wills.
Has there not come to you the story of the forces
of Pharaoh and Thamūd?
But the disbelievers are in persistent denial,
although Allah encompasses them from all sides.
But this is a glorious Qur’an,
[inscribed] in a Preserved Tablet.
By the sky and the night comer –
and how do you know what the night comer is?
It is the star of piercing brightness –
there is no soul except that there is a watcher over it.
Let man reflect on what he was created from.
He was created from a spurting fluid,
emerging from between the backbone and the ribs.
Indeed, Allah is able to bring him back to life.
On the Day when all secrets will be disclosed,
he will then have no power, nor any helper.
By the sky and its recurring rain,
and by the earth that cracks open [with the sprout of plants],
Indeed, this [Qur’an] is a decisive word,
which is not for amusement.
Indeed, they are planning schemes,
I am too planning schemes.
So bear with the the disbelievers, and respite them for a while.
Glorify the name of your Lord, the Most High,
Who created and fashioned in due proportion,
and Who determined [the creation] then guided them,
and Who brings forth the pasture,
then makes it into withered chaff.
We will teach you [the Qur’an], so you will not forget,
except what Allah wills, for indeed He knows what is manifest and what is hidden.
We will guide you to the easy way.
So remind, if the reminder should benefit.
He who fears Allah will take heed,
but the wretched will avoid it,
who will enter the Great Fire,
wherein he will neither die nor live.
Indeed, he who purifies himself will attain success,
and remembers his Lord’s name and prays.
But you prefer the life of this world,
even though the Hereafter is better and more lasting.
Indeed, this was in the earlier Scriptures,
the Scriptures of Abraham and Moses.
Has there come to you the story of the Overwhelming Event?
On that Day, some faces will be humiliated,
toiling and weary,
as they burn in a scorching Fire.
They will be made to drink from a boiling spring,
and they will have no food except bitter thorny plants,
that neither nourishes nor satisfies hunger.
Other faces on that Day will be joyful,
well-pleased with their past striving,
in an elevated garden,
wherein no idle talk will be heard.
There will be a flowing spring;
and couches raised high,
and cups placed ready,
and cushions lined up,
and splendid carpets spread out.
Do they not reflect on camels, how they are created;
and the sky, how it is raised high;
and the mountains, how they are firmly set up;
and the earth, how it is spread out?
So remind [O Prophet]; your duty is only to remind;
you are not assigned to compel them.
But whoever turns away and disbelieves,
Allah will inflict upon him the greatest punishment.
Indeed, to Us is their return,
then it is for Us to call them to account.
By the dawn,
and the ten nights,
and the even and the odd,
and by the night when it comes,
are these oaths not sufficient for those who have sense?
Have you not considered how your Lord dealt with ‘Ād
of Iram, who were people of great stature,
the like of whom had never been created in the land;
and Thamūd, who carved out the rocks in the Valley;
and the mighty and powerful Pharaoh?
All of them transgressed in the land,
and spread therein much corruption,
so your Lord poured upon them a scourge of punishment.
Indeed, your Lord is ever vigilant.
As for man, when he is tested by his Lord by honoring him and bestowing blessings upon him, he says, “My Lord has [deservedly] honored me!”
But when he is tested by restricting his provision, he says, “My Lord has [undeservedly] humiliated me!”
No indeed! You are not kind to the orphan,
nor do you urge one another to feed the needy,
and you greedily consume the entire inheritance,
and love wealth immensely.
No indeed! When the earth is crushed over and over,
and your Lord comes with the angels, rank after rank,
and Hell is brought near on that Day – this is when man will understand, but what is the use of that understanding?
He will say, “Would that I had sent forth something for my [eternal] life!”
None can punish as He punishes on that Day,
and none can bind as He binds.
[It will be said to the believer,] “O the tranquil soul!
Return to your Lord, well pleased and pleasing [to Him].
Join My [righteous] slaves,
and enter My Paradise.”
I do swear by this city [of Makkah] –
and you are free of restriction [for a while] in this city –
and by every parent and offspring,
We have created man in hardship.
Does he think that none can ever have power over him?
He says, “I have squandered enormous wealth!”
Does he think that no one sees him?
Have We not given him two eyes,
and a tongue and two lips,
and shown him the two ways [of right and wrong]?
Yet he did not make his way through the steep path,
and how do you know what the steep path is?
It is freeing a slave,
or giving food on a day of hunger,
to an orphan relative,
or to a needy person in misery,
then [most importantly] to be one of those who believe and exhort one another to patience and exhort one another to compassion.
Such are the people of the Right.
As for those who reject Our signs, they are the people of the Left,
who will be locked up in the Fire.
By the sun and its brightness,
and by the moon as it follows it,
and by the day as it displays it,
and by the night as it covers it,
and by the sky and He Who made it,
and by the earth and how He spread it,
and by the soul and how He fashioned it,
then inspired it [to know] its wickedness and righteousness,
Indeed, he who purifies his soul will attain success,
and he who corrupts it will be doomed.
Thamūd rejected [the messenger] because of their transgression,
when the most wretched among them rose [to kill the camel].
Although the messenger of Allah warned them, “Hands off the she-camel of Allah and her drink!”
Yet they rejected him and hamstrung her. So their Lord destroyed them for their sin and leveled them to the ground.
And He has no fear of the consequences thereof.
By the night when it covers,
and by the day when it appears,
and by His creation of male and female,
surely your efforts are divergent.
As for the one who gives in charity and fears Allah,
and truly believes in the best reward,
We will make easy for him the way of salvation.
But as for the one who is miserly and deems himself self-sufficient,
and denies the best reward,
We will make easy for him the way of perdition.
His wealth will be of no avail to him when he tumbles [into Hell].
Indeed, it is upon Us to show the right way,
and surely to Us belong the Hereafter and the present life.
So I warn you of a raging Fire,
none will enter it except the most wretched,
who denied and turned away.
But the most righteous will be saved from it,
who spends his wealth to purify himself,
not in return for someone’s favors,
but to seek the pleasure of his Lord, the Most High.
He will surely be well pleased.
By the morning brightness,
and by the night when it is still,
your Lord has not forsaken you [O Prophet], nor does He hate you;
the Hereafter is better for you than the present life;
and your Lord will certainly give you so much that you will be well pleased.
Did He not find you an orphan then take good care of you?
Did He not find you unguided then guide you?
Did He not find you in need then enrich you?
So do not mistreat the orphan,
nor repulse the beggar;
and proclaim the blessings of your Lord.
Have We not reassured your heart for you [O Prophet],
and relieved you of your burden
that weighed down your back,
and raised high your fame for you?
For indeed, with hardship comes ease,
indeed, with hardship comes ease.
So whenever you are free, strive in worship,
and turn to your Lord in hope.
By the fig and the olive [of Jerusalem],
and by Mount Sinai [of Egypt],
and by this secure city [of Makkah],
Surely We have created man in the best form,
then We will reduce him to the lowest of the low,
except those who believe and do righteous deeds; they will have a never ending reward.
Then, what makes you deny the Judgment Day?
Is not Allah the Most Just of all judges?
Read in the name of your Lord Who created,
created man from a clinging clot.
Read, and your Lord is the Most Generous,
Who taught by the pen,
taught man what he did not know.
Indeed, man transgresses
when he deems himself to be self-sufficient.
Indeed, to your Lord is the return.
Have you seen the one who prevents
a slave [of Allah] from praying?
What if this [slave] is rightly guided,
and enjoins righteousness?
How about the one who denies and turns away?
Does he not know that Allah is watching all?
No indeed; if he does not desist, We will surely drag him by the forelock –
a lying, sinful forelock.
So let him call his associates;
We will call the wardens of Hellfire.
No indeed; do not obey him, but prostrate and draw near [to Allah].
Indeed, We sent this [Qur’an] down in the Night of Decree.
How do you know what the Night of Decree is?
The Night of Decree is better than a thousand months.
On that night the angels and the Spirit [Gabriel] descend by their Lord’s permission with all decrees.
It is all peace untill the break of dawn.
Those who disbelieve from the People of the Book and the polytheists were not going to desist [from disbelief] until there came to them clear proof,
a messenger from Allah, reciting pure pages
containing upright commandments.
Yet those who were given the Scripture did not disagree except after the clear proof came to them,
although they were commanded only to worship Allah with sincere devotion to Him, being inclined to true faith, and to establish prayer and give zakah; that is the true religion.
Those who disbelieve from the People of the Book and the polytheists will be in the fire of Hell, abiding therein forever. It is they who are the worst of creatures.
As for those who believe and do righteous deeds – it is they who are the best of creatures.
Their reward with their Lord is gardens of perpetual residence under which rivers flow, abiding therein forever. Allah is pleased with them and they are pleased with Him. This is for those who fear their Lord.
When the earth is shaken with a mighty quake,
and the earth throws out its burdens,
and man says, “What is the matter with it?”
On that Day it will recount all its news,
because your Lord has commanded it [to do so].
On that Day all people will come forward in separate groups to be shown their deeds.
So whoever does an atom’s weight of good will see it,
and whoever does an atom’s weight of evil will see it.
By the galloping, panting horses,
striking sparks of fire [with their hooves],
launching raids at dawn,
stirring up thereby clouds of dust,
plunging thereby into the midst of the enemy,
indeed, man is very ungrateful to his Lord –
and he himself is a witness to that –
and he is truly extreme in his love of wealth.
Does he not know that the contents of graves will be overturned,
and the secrets of the hearts will be brought to light?
Indeed, their Lord is All-Aware of them on that Day.
The Striking Calamity!
What is the Striking Calamity?
How do you know what the Striking Calamity is?
On that Day people will be like scattered moths,
and the mountains will be like carded wool.
Then the one whose scales of good deeds are heavy,
will have a pleasant life.
But the one whose scales of good deeds are light,
his abode will be the abyss.
And how do you know what it is?
It is a blazing Fire.
Competition for worldly gains distracts you [from Allah],
until you come to your graves.
No indeed! You will come to know.
Again no! You will come to know.
No indeed! If only you knew for certain.
You will surely see the Blazing Fire,
Again, you will see it with absolute certainty.
Then on that Day you will surely be asked about your worldly pleasures.
By the time,
man is in utter loss,
except those who believe and do righteous deeds, and exhort one another to the truth and exhort one another to patience.
Woe to every backbiter and slanderer,
who amasses wealth and counts it over and again,
thinking that his wealth will make him live forever.
No indeed! He will surely be cast into the Crushing Fire,
and how do you know what the Crushing Fire is?
It is the kindled Fire of Allah,
which reaches the hearts.
It will be closed down upon them,
locked with towering columns.
Have you not seen how your Lord dealt with the people of the Elephant?
Did He not turn their scheme into a total loss?
He sent against them swarms of birds,
pelting them with stones of baked clay,
leaving them like chewed up and trampled chaff.
For the accustomed security of Quraysh,
secure in their winter and summer journeys.
Let them worship the Lord of this [Sacred] House,
Who fed them against hunger and made them secure against fear.
Have you seen the one who denies the Recompense?
Such is the one who repulses the orphan harshly,
and does not urge others to feed the needy.
So woe to those who pray,
but are heedless of their prayer;
those who only show off,
and withhold even small kindnesses.
We have surely given you [O Prophet] abundance,
so pray and sacrifice to your Lord alone.
Indeed, the one who hates you is truly cut off [from all goodness].
Say, “O disbelievers,
I do not worship what you worship,
nor do you worship what I worship.
Never will I worship what you worship,
nor will you ever worship what I worship.
You have your religion and I have my religion.
When there comes Allah’s help and the conquest,
and you see people entering Allah’s religion in multitudes,
then glorify the praise of your Lord, and ask His forgiveness. Indeed, He is ever Accepting of Repentance.
May the hands of Abu Lahab perish, and may he perish!
Neither his wealth nor his worldly gains will avail him.
He will burn in a Flaming Fire,
and so will his wife, the carrier of firewood,
around her neck will be a rope of palm fiber.
Say: He is Allah, the One;
Allah, the Eternal Refuge.
He neither begets nor is He begotten,
and there is none comparable to Him.”
Say, “I seek refuge with the Lord of the daybreak,
from the harm of all what He has created;
from the harm of night’s darkness when it spreads around,
from the harm of the sorceresses who blow on knots,
and from the harm of the envier when he envies.
Say, “I seek refuge with the Lord of mankind,
the Sovereign of mankind,
the God of mankind,
from the harm of the lurking whisperer,
who whispers into the hearts of people,
from among jinn and mankind.”
{
    "language": "english",
    "author": "www.islamhouse.com",
	"source": "www.islamhouse.com"
}